21939595
Sence_Valley_Forest_Park
Sence Valley Forest Park is located to the north of Ibstock in West Leicestershire, and within the Forest, England.It is situated on the site of a former cast mine where, between 1982 and 1996, eight million tonnes of coal were extracted by opencast mining.(Sence Valley Forest Park) The 60-hectare site has since been transformed by tree planting and the creation of lakes, and is now managed by the Commission. A series of paths provides access to a picnic area and the various fishing opportunities. There are also toilets and parking facilities for both the able bodied and the disabled.ReferencesExternal links* Sence Valley Forest Park
21950446
History_of_the_Powerhouse_Museum
The Powerhouse Museums origins date to 1879, when the International Exhibition was held in the Palace, a purpose-built exhibition building located in the grounds of the Royal Botanic Gardens. At the conclusion of the Exhibition the Museum (Sydneys museum of natural history) appointed a committee to select the best exhibits, with the intention of exhibiting them permanently in a new museum to be sited within the Garden Palace. The new museum was to be called The Technological, Industrial and Sanitary Museum of New South Wales, and its purpose was to exhibit the latest industrial, construction and design innovations, with the intention of showing how improvements in the living standards and health of the population might be brought about.Unfortunately, in September 1882 before the new museum could be opened a fire completely destroyed the Garden Palace, leaving the museums first curator, Henry Maiden with a collection consisting of only the most durable artefacts including a Ceylonese statue of an elephant carved in graphite that had miraculously survived the blaze despite a 5-storey plunge. Undaunted, Maiden commenced rebuilding the collection, but for the subsequent decade the new museum found itself housed in a large tin shed in the Domain  a facility it shared with the Hospital morgue. The ever-present stench of decaying corpses was not the best advertisement for an institution dedicated to the promotion of sanitation, and eventually, after intense lobbying the museum was relocated to a three storey building in Harris Street, Ultimo, and simultaneously given a new name  the Technological Museum. The new location placed the museum adjacent to the Technical College, and as such it was intended to provide material inspiration to the students. As time passed, its name was changed to The Museum of Applied Arts and Sciences and it also established branches in some of New South Wales main industrial and mining centres, including Broken Hill, Albury, Newcastle and Maitland. It also quickly outgrew the main Harris Street site and by 1978 the situation had become dire, with many exhibits literally stuffed into its attic, and left unexhibited for decades. On August 23 of that year, South Wales Premier Wran announced that the decrepit Power Station, several hundred metres north of the Harris Street site had been earmarked as the museums new permanent home. The Museum spent an interim period exhibiting as the Powerhouse Museum - Stage One in the nearby tram sheds before re-opening as the Powerhouse Museum at the new site on March 10, 1988. The main museum building contains five levels, three courtyards and a cafeteria, as well as some offices.  Workshops, library, storage and additional office space is located in the annexed tram sheds (still known in-house as Stage One) - however the size and continually expanding nature of the museums collection means that offsite storage facilities are also maintained.Following its closure as a working observatory in 1982, Observatory was incorporated into the Powerhouse Museum.External links* History of the Museum at the official website.
21970327
Uceku
UCE-KU stands for University College of Engineering - University is the only college offering engineering degree in Pradesh. The two departments Department of Computer Science and Engineering and Department of Electrical and Electronics Engineering were established in 1996.In 1957, The Department of Mining engineering was started, as a wing of College of Engineering University and was shifted to Kothagudem, the town of coal industry in 1976.Presently holding the name, University College of Engineering, Kakatiya University is the only college offering mining engineering degree in Andhra Pradesh. The two departments Department of Computer Science and Engineering and Department of Electrical and Electronics Engineering were established in 1996 along with the library were shifted to new academic block in 2001.The college with annual intake of 107 engineering students, 60 MBA students and 40 MCA students having qualified and experienced faculty in home to the cream of talent in this area.External links*Official site
21984364
Schalker
Schalker may refer to:*Schalker Eisenhtte Maschinenfabrik GmbH - a German company based in Gelsenkirchen involved in medium and heavy engineering. Manufacturers mining locomotives and coking ovens.*Schalker Verein a former ironworks at Gelsenkirchen, closed in 1982.*Schalker Kreisel (Schalker gyro/twist/turn) - A playing tactic in football, attributed to Kuzorra and his brother in law Szepan whilst at the football club of Schalke 04
22003515
VPH_NoE
The Virtual Physiological Human Network of Excellence (VPH NoE))(VPH NoE website)  project is funded by the Commission under the FP7 (7th Framework Programme )  Objective ICT  2007.5.3: Physiological Human (VPH).  The European Commission allocated 72 Million to Virtual Physiological Human projects under Framework 7, Call 2 of the Information and Communication Technologies Programme in October 2007 (Clapworthy et al. 2008).The Virtual Physiological Human Network of Excellence (VPH NoE) was launched in June 2008 and runs until May 2012. The stated aim of the project is to help connect the diverse VPH projects, from those funded by the 7th Framework Programme as VPH initiative Projects(VPH-I)(VPH Initative Projects) to encompass related projects funded under previous EC frameworks and national funding schemes, industry, healthcare providers and international organisations. The 7th Framework Programme consists of projects which seek solutions to key issues of the Physiome (Fenner et al. 2007). The Physiome is described as an umbrella term that refers to human modelling with mathematics and computational methods, accommodating cross-disciplinary science (chemistry, biology, physics) and a breadth of dimensional and temporal scale (sub-cellular to organs, sub-microsecond to tens-of-years (Clapworthy et al, 2007 pg. 549).The interconnection of different disciplines is one of the aims  of the VPH NoE and of the VPH Initiative as a whole. Modellers and engineers may not be aware of the clinical implications of their work (Fenner et al. 2008) and clinicians may not have any prior knowledge of engineering. The development of tools, standards and ontologies is another one of the declared aims of the VPH Initiative and software tools are needed for authoring, visualizing, and operating models based on widely adopted modelling standards (Hunter 2006). The VPH NoE also has a stated aim to provide the necessary infrastructure including computational methodologies, tools and databases that will enable academic, clinical and industrial researchers to communicate, and to exchange data and technologies in a standardised way(.History of VPH NoEThe VPH forms a core target of the 7th Framework Programme of the Commission, and aims to support the development of patient-specific computer models and their application in personalised and predictive healthcare (Kohl & Noble 2009). The VPH Initiative constitutes an integral part of the international Project (Hunter & Borg 2003).  The Physiome Project is a worldwide public domain effort to develop the computational framework for quantitative description of biological processes in living systems across all relevant levels of structural and functional integration, from molecule to organism, including the human. There are many different physiome and VPH projects being pursued across the world.The VPH NoE is a follow on from the STEP (STEP) project which was a European Coordination Action and was funded to recommend effective strategies that promote the development of the VPH Seeding the EuroPhysiome: a roadmap to the virtual physiological human ((VPH Seeding the EuroPhysiome: a roadmap to the virtual physiological human).STEP formally commenced in January 2006 (Viceconti et al. 2008) and concluded in March 2007 and played a leading part in developing worldwide links so that data and software can be shared freely across the international community. It is a fundamental precept of EuroPhysiome that its work should be as compatible and convergent as possible with similar work that is taking place in other parts of the world. Since the conclusion of the STEP project in 2007, this mantle has now been passed on to the VPH NoE (.VPH  Initiative projectsThe European Commission has, to date, allocated over 72 million euros to projects funded under the Objective ICT  2007.5.3: Virtual Physiological Human. The main target outcome of this objective is: patient-specific computer models for personalised and predictive healthcare and ICT  based tools for modelling and simulation of human physiology. Collaborative projects within this call will meet specific research objectives related to computational modelling of human physiology. VPH-I projects range from those developing advanced computational models of the heart, predictive models for dementia, osteoporosis and drug safety, through to projects furthering a common health information infrastructure to facilitate easier access to European supercomputing power. The VPH NoE was set up to lead the coordination of diverse activities within the VPH-I, with the hope that this will deliver:* integration of basic research findings across organ systems and levels of investigation* acceleration of device and drug intervention* development through predictive in-silico modelling,* improvement of efficacy and safety and the creation of* new environments for predictive, personalised evidenced based healthcare  (STEP research road map)The VPH initiative targets the level of the whole human body as the system of interest. The aim of the VPH initiative is to understand human physiology quantitatively and at all relevant levels between genes and the organism (.See also* Physiome* Physiology* EuroPhysiome* Cytome* anatomy* Human Project* VPHOP (Osteoporotic Virtual Physiological Human) References Bibliography*Clapworthy, G., Kohl, P., Gregerson, H., Thomas, S., Viceconti, M., Hose, D., Pinney, D., Fenner, J., McCormack, K., Lawford, P., Van Sint Jan, S., Waters, S., & Coveney, P. 2007, Digital Human Modelling: A Global Vision and a European Perspective, In Digital Human Modelling: A Global Vision and a European Perspective , Berlin: Springer, pp. 549558.*Clapworthy, G., Viceconti, M., Coveney, P.V., & Kohl, P. 2008. The Virtual Physiological Human: building a framework for computational biomedicine I. Philosophical Transactions of the Royal Society A: Mathematical, Physical and Engineering Sciences, 366, (1878) 2975-2978 available from: http://rsta.royalsocietypublishing.org/content/366/1878/2975.short*Fenner, J.W., Brook, B., Clapworthy, G., Coveney, P.V., Feipel, V., Gregersen, H., Hose, D.R., Kohl, P., Lawford, P., McCormack, K.M., Pinney, D., Thomas, S.R., Van Sint Jan, S., Waters, S., & Viceconti, M. 2008. The EuroPhysiome, STEP and a roadmap for the virtual physiological human. Philosophical Transactions of the Royal Society A: Mathematical, Physical and Engineering Sciences, 366, (1878) 2979-2999 available from: http://rsta.royalsocietypublishing.org/content/366/1878/2979.abstract*Hunter, P.J. 2006. Modeling living systems: the IUPS/EMBS Physiome project. Proceedings IEEE, 94, 678-991*Hunter, P.J. & Borg, T.K. 2003. Integration from proteins to organs: the Physiome project. Nature, 4, (237) 243*Kohl, P. & Noble, D. (in press). Systems biology and the Virtual Physiological Human. Molecular Systems Biology*Sadiq, S.K., Mazzeo, M.D., Zasada, S.J., Manos, S., Stoica, I., Gale, C.V., Watson, S.J., Kellam, P., Brew, S., & Coveney, P.V. 2008. Patient-specific simulation as a basis for clinical decision-making. Philosophical Transactions of the Royal Society A: Mathematical, Physical and Engineering Sciences, 366, (1978) 3199-3219*Viceconti, M., Clapworthy, G., & Van Sint Jan, S. 2008. The Virtual Physiological Human  A European Initiative for in silico Human Modelling. Journal of Physiological Sciences, 58, (7) 441-446Links to External Resources* VPH NoE The VPH NoE was launched in 2008 and aims to provide the necessary infrastructure including computational methodologies, tools and databases that will enable academic, clinical and industrial researchers to communicate, and to exchange data and technologies in a standardised way. The website has the latest news, events and progress of the VPH NoE, contains further information on the VPH I projects and is a useful resource to find out more about the VPH.* EuroPhysiome The Europhysiome initiative was coordinated by the STEP Coordination action, which aimed to establish a better coordination between European Physiome projects. STEP is now completed; its primary results were the establishment of the Virtual Physiological Human (VPH) concept, and the production of a European research roadmap to the realisation of the VPH.*STEP Roadmap STEP Consortium. Seeding the EuroPhysiome: A Roadmap to the Virtual Physiological Human. Online 5 July 2007,* IUPS Physiome Project The Physiome Project is a worldwide public domain effort to provide a computational framework for understanding human and other eukaryotic physiology. It aims to develop integrative models at all levels of biological organisation, from genes to the whole organism via gene regulatory networks, protein pathways, integrative cell function, and tissue and whole organ structure/function relations. University of Auckland, Auckland, New Zealand.*BioMed Town is an online resource, borne out of the Sixth Framework Programme Coordination Action STEP (A Strategy for the Europhysiome).  It is a meeting place open to Biomedical Research & Technology, Biomedical Industry and Clinical Practice, and aims to support networking and information sharing - key activities underpinning any integrative/interdisciplinary research community.  It is open to all those who have a professional or educational interest in biomedical research & technology.* Operating on the Virtual Human BBC news feature on Heart Surgery as part of the VPH Initiative (January 2009)External Links to VPH projectsEU FP7  VPH related ProjectsThe VPH Initiative (VPH-I) constitutes 15 projects funded within the EU call FP7-ICT-2007-2: Virtual Physiological Human. This initiative was preceded by a number of FP6 projects and other National and International projects/programmes.  These include:*euHeart (IP) Personalised and integrated cardiac care: Patient-specific cardiovascular modelling and simulation for in silico disease understanding and management and for medical device evaluation and optimisation. (Project dates: 06/08 - 05/12).*VPHOP (IP) Osteoporotic Virtual Physiological Human. Multi scale modelling technology based on conventional diagnostic imaging methods that makes it possible to predict for each patient the strength of their bones and how this strength will change over time. (Project dates: 08/08 - 08/12).*ARTreat (IP) Multi-level patient-specific artery and atherogenesis model for outcome prediction, decision support treatment, and virtual hand-on training. (Project dates: 09/08 - 08/11).*Sim-e-Child (STREP) is developing a trans-Atlantic grid-enabled platform for large scale simulations in paediatric cardiology, providing a collaborative environment for constructing and validating multi-scale and personalized models of the anatomy, function and hemodynamics of the growing left heart. The project is building an international cooperation environment linking leading institutions such as the American College of Cardiology, Johns Hopkins University, in the USA, with the Technical University of Munich, Siemens Corporate Research and the Ospedale Paediatric Bambino Ges in Europe. *preDiCT (STREP) Virtual research environment for in silico assessment of efficacy and safety of specific drugs (cell to ventricle-level models) and faster than-real-time simulation. (Project dates: 06/08 - 05/11).*ContraCancrum (STREP) Clinically oriented translational cancer multilevel modelling. Composite multilevel platform for simulating malignant tumour development and tumour and normal tissue response to therapeutic modalities and treatment schedules. (Project dates: 08/08 - 07/11).*ARCH (STREP) Patient specific image-based computational modelling for improvement of short- and long-term outcome of vascular access in patient on hemodialysis therapy. (Project dates: 06/08 - 05/11).*PASSPORT (STREP) Patient specific simulation and preoperative realistic training for liver surgery. Patient specific liver modelling combinging anatomical, mechanical, appearance and biological preoperative modelled information. (Project dates: 06/08 - 05/11).*PredictAD (STREP) From patient data to personalised healthcare in Alzheimers Disease. New biomarkers and clinically useful tools for early Alzheimers disease diagnosis. (Project dates: 06/08 - 05/11).*NeoMARK (STREP) ICT enabled prediction of cancer reoccurrence. Multiscale and multilevel modelling, aimed at advancing models and methods currently in use to predict neoplastic reoccurrences, and to apply it to the study of oral cancer. (Project dates: 06/08 - 08/10).*VPH2 (STREP) Virtual pathological heart of the virtual physiological human. Patient-specific computational modelling and simulation of the human heart to assist the cardiologist and cardiac surgeon in defining the severity and extent of disease in patients with post-ischemic Left Ventricular Dysfunction (LVD), with or without ischemic mitral regurgitation. (Project dates: 07/08 - 06/11).*IMPPACT (STREP) Image-based multi-scale physiological planning for ablation cancer treatment. Physiological model of the liver and simulation of result of Radiofrequency Ablation (RFA) of malignant liver tumours, accounting for patient specific physiological factors. (Project dates: 08/08 - 08/11).*HAMAM (STREP) Highly accurate breast cancer diagnosis through integration of biological knowledge, novel imaging modalities, and modelling. (Project dates: 08/08 - 08/11).*Action-Grid (CA) International cooperative action on grid computing and biomedical informatics between the European Union, Latin America, the Western Balkans and North Africa. (Project dates: 08/08 - 11/11).*RADICAL (CA) Road mapping technology for enhancing security to protect medical and genetic data. In depth study to determine policy roadmap for security and privacy enhancement in Virtual Physiological Human. (Project dates: 00/00 - 00/00).*NOEMALIFE VPH2 aims at developing a patient-specific computational modelling and simulation of the human heart to assist the cardiologist and the cardiac surgeon in defining the severity and extent of disease in patient with  Left Ventricular Dysfunction (LVD), with or without Functional Mitral Regurgitation (FMR).EU FP6  VPH related Projects*@neurIST (IP) @neurIST will develop an IT infrastructure for the management of heterogeneous data associated with the diagnosis and treatment of cerebral aneurysms. (Project dates: 02/06 - 01/10).*ACGT (IP) Advancing Clinico-genomic trials on cancer: Open Grid services for improving medical knowledge discovery The ACGT project aims to develop a GRID platform to support and stimulate further exchanges of both clinic and genetic information, with a particular focus on breast cancer treatment. (Project dates: 02/06 - 01/10).*Health-e-Child (IP) The Health-e-Child project aims at developing an integrated healthcare platform for European paediatrics, providing seamless integration of traditional and emerging sources of biomedical information. (Project dates: 01/06 - 12/09).*I KNOW (STREP) I-Know is a knowledge discovery IT -based tool designed to aid early stroke diagnosis, stroke treatment, drug development and identification of risk factors as targets in disease prevention for the benefit of European industry and citizens. (Project dates: 05/06 - 04/09).*Sealife (NoE) A Semantic Grid Browser for the Life Sciences applied to the study of Infectious Diseases. The development of a browser, which will link the existing Web to the currently emerging eScience infrastructure. (Project dates: 04/06 - 03/09).*VIROLAB (STREP) ViroLab enables easy access to distributed resources as well as the sharing, processing, and analysis of virological, immunological, clinical and experimental data. (Project dates: 03/06 - 03/09).*ImmunoGrid (STREP) The project will focus on establishing an infrastructure for the simulation of the immune system that integrates processes at molecular, cellular, and organ levels.It will be designed for applications that support clinical outcomes. (Project dates: 02/06 - 01/09).*LHDL (STREP) Living Human Digital Library: interactive digital library services to access collections of complex biomedical data on the musculoskeletal apparatus. (Project dates: 02/06 - 01/09).*Simap (STREP) Simulation modelling of the MAP kinase pathway SIMAP will develop a simulation model of the cancer related MAP-kinase pathway, integrating and analyzing data from various types of resources, which may assist in the development of better cancer treatment. (Project dates: 01/06 - 12/08)*ASSIST (STREP) Association studies assisted by inference and semantic technologies. The main objective of ASSIST is to facilitate the research for cervical cancer through a system that will virtually unify multiple patient record repositories, physically located in different medical centres/hospitals. (Project dates: 01/06 - 12/08).*STEP (CA) STEP was a Coordination Action that sought to coordinate European activity relating to the physiome  a description of human physiology that will span multiple levels from the whole body down through the organs to the cells and beneath in an integrated manner. (Project dates: 01/06 - 03/07).*BIOPATTERN (NoE) Computational intelligence for Bio-pattern analysis in support of eHealthcare. The goal of BIOPATTERN is to develop a pan-European, coherent and intelligent analysis of a citizens bio-profile. (Project dates: 01/04 - 12/07).*MATCH (STREP) MATCH project entitle the development of an automatic diagnosis system that aims to support treatment of colon cancer diseases by discovering mutations that occurs to tumour suppressor genes (TSGs) and contributes to the development of cancerous tumours. (Project dates: 08/06 - 07/08).*MULTI - KNOWLEDGE (STREP)The MULTI-KNOWLEDGE Project aims to integrate different biomedical information from heterogeneous sources (clinical, laboratory and metabolic) with data on gene and protein expression provided by new high throughput technologies in a system committed to cardiovascular risk profiling. (Project dates: 01/06 - 03/08).*NEUROWEB (STREP) NEUROWEB project improved healthcare delivery achieving knowledge-based, personalised diagnosis and therapy through vertical integration of existing clinical and genetic databases. (Project dates: 08/06 - 07/08).*e-Health ERA (CA) The overall goal of the eHealth ERA project is to contribute to greater transparency of national eHealth strategies and implementation activities as well as innovation oriented research and technology development (RTD) initiatives. (Project dates: 04/05 - 06/07).*SemanticHEALTH (CSA) SemanticHEALTH aims to develop a European and global roadmap for deployment and research in health-ICT, focusing on semantic interoperability issues of e-Health systems and infrastructures. (Project dates: 01/06 - 12/07).*SemanticMining (NoE) Semantic Interoperability and Data Mining in Biomedicine. The aim of this project is to establish Europe as the international scientific leader in medical and biomedical informatics. The long-term goal was to develop generic methods and tools to support the critical tasks of the field. (Project dates: 01/04 - 07/07).*SYMBIOmatics (SSA) SYMBIOmatics is a Specific Support Action that aims to identify and exploit synergies between bioinformatics and medical informatics.The project will document the state-of-the art in biomedical informatics in Europe. (Project dates: 05/05 - 11/06).*INFOBIOMED (NoE) INFOBIOMED aims at enforcing European Biomedical Informatics as an integrative discipline with a view on supporting individualised healthcare. (Project dates: 01/04 - 06/07).*TACIT(STREP) Technologies Augmenting Clinical InsighT. The TACIT project aim is to unlock the tacit knowledge of Europes senior clinicians both by linguistically analysed multimedia recording and by expert location and communications. (Project dates: 06/04 - 08/06).*WoundMonitor (STREP) WOUNDMONITOR will apply gas sensor array technology in an innovative diagnostic system that will enable non-invasive sampling of volatiles, helping diagnosis of the onset and type of bacterial infections in critically ill patients suffering from burns or serious wounds. (Project dates: 01/06 - 12/08).*SHARE (SSA) The goal of SHARE was to ensure the successful take up of HealthGrids in the next 10 years by creating a roadmap for essential technology development years. (Project dates: 01/06 - 03/08).*EuResist (STREP)  The EuResist project aims to develop a European integrated system for the clinical management of antiretroviral drug resistance. (Project dates: 01/06 - 06/08).*normaCOR The aim of normaCOR is to provide novel insight into novel arrhythmogenic mechanisms, quantify their interrelation, target preventive and therapeutic interventions to reduce the societal and economical impact of cardiac arrhythmia.
22023966
Global_Census_of_Marine_Life_on_Seamounts
Global Census of Marine Life on Seamounts (commonly CenSeam) is a global scientific initiative, launched in 2005, that is designed to expand the knowledge base of marine life at seamounts.( Seamounts are underwater mountains, not necessarily volcanic in origin, which often form subsurface archipelagoes and are found throughout the worlds ocean basins, with almost half in the Pacific. There are estimated to be as many as 100,000 seamounts at least one kilometer in height, and more if lower rises are included.() However, they have not been explored very much&mdash;in fact, only about half of one percent have been sampled&mdash;and almost every expedition to a seamount discovers new species and new information. There is evidence that seamounts can host concentrations of biologic diversity, each with its own unique local ecosystem; they seem to affect currents, resulting among other things in local concentration of plankton which in turn attracts species that graze on it, and indeed are probably a significant overall factor in biogeography of the oceans. They also may serve as way stations in the migration of whales and other pelagic species. Despite being poorly studied, they are heavily targeted by fishing, including dredging. In addition they are of interest to potential seabed mining.()The overall goal of CenSeam is to determine the role of seamounts in the biogeography, biodiversity, productivity, and evolution of marine organisms, and to evaluate the effects of human exploitation on seamounts. To this effect, the group organizes and contributes to various research efforts about seamount biodiversity.( Specifically, the project aims to act as a standardized scaffold for future studies and samplings, citing inefficiency and incompatibility between individual research efforts in the past.( To give a scale of their mission, there are an estimated 100,000 seamounts in the ocean, but only 350 of them have been sampled, and only about 100 sampled thoroughly.()( Although sampling all 100,000 seamounts is infeasible, major seamounts can be sampled in such a way.()()()CenSeam is a subdivision of the of Marine Life program.() Organisationally, the components of CenSeam consist of a secretariat (Malcolm Clark, Mireille Consalvey, Ashley Rowden and Karen Stocks) which is hosted by the Institute of Water and Atmospheric Research in Wellington, Zealand; an international steering committee; a taxonomic advisory panel; and two working groups, Data Analysis and Standardisation.()In 2008 CenSeam began collaborating with the Seabed Authority to study effects of seabed mining on seamount ecosystems.()See also* Seamount#Conservation* Seamount* Seamount* Bay Aquarium Research InstituteExternal links* SenSeam website* Seamounts Online, SenSeams ecological sampling database.* Encyclopedia of Earth entryReferences
22027786
Coal_Creek_(Alaska)
#REDIRECT Creek Historic Mining District
22041918
COMSA
Grupo COMSA is a Spanish construction and infrastructure company whose main business historically has been railway infrastructure work. Later the business expanded into more general construction and infrastructure work.Since the 1990s the group has diversified into other business areas,The majority of the groups employees were in Spain, with ~40% in other countries - the two other main areas by employee number being Australia and Poland.In July 2009 Grupo Comsa and SA (Estudios, Montajes y Tendidos Elctricos) merged to form EMTE.()() History  Comsa The groups beginnings can be traced back to 1891 when railway employee Jos Miarnau Navs set up company to carry out railway infrastructure work in Reus (Tarragona). By 1930, the company became a public company and moved its headquarters from Reus to Barcelona. By the 1940s, the company had expanded into the general civil engineering field - building bridges, buildings and roads. By the 1980s, the company had expanded from its base in Catalonia having projects in Asturias, Andalusia, Galicia and and Len, and had also entered the real estate and aggregates businesses. The 1990s brought further diversification as well as the beginnings of an international presence with a subsidiary Fergrupo in Portugal.( Company structure and activities The main railway and infrastructure businesses within Spain were organised within the company COMSA Empresa Constructora.In Spain COMSA carried out all aspects of railway building from the planning stage to construction and maintenance; high profile projects included work on the infrastructure of the high speed Asturias link and Vitoria-Bilbao line. Other work included the construction of sidings for manufacturing companies including BASF, Ford Espania, Repsol Butano and Volkswagen, rolling stock shed and workshop construction, and electrification projects.(COMSA - Railway Railway activities comsa.com)In the general construction field the group carried out road, bridge, industrial, public and office building projects, as well as water infrastructure, harbour and airport construction.(COMSA Construction comsa.com)Additionally through subsidiaries under the umbrella organisation COMSA Medio Ambiente the company was involved in waste water and industrial and urban waste management, recycling, hazardous waste management, as well as being involved in renewable energy projects - including wind farm, photovoltaic and biodigestion technologies.(COMSA environment comsa.com) Logistics Rail Transport was set up in 2002 and was the first private company in Spain to acquire a license for the de-monopolised rail system. A subsidiary operated in Poland as Fer Polska.(COMSA Transport, logistics and equipment comsa.com)The firm GMF (Geston de Maquinaria Ferroviaria) managed the groups rolling stock including the track infrastructure equipment (track tampers etc).( Other business activities *Through IOSA Inmuebles and Tamisa Hotels the group undertook its real estate and hotelling businesses respectively*The CUMESA and Ubladesa companies were involved in quarrying/mining of aggregates*TRAVIPOS - a joint venture with GmbH(Rail.One company website railone.com) produced precast concrete sleepers and other structures for the rail industry.*TAMISA Agrcola is the groups agricultural division - producing olive oil and wine. International operations Subsidiaries were operated in Poland, Portugal, Argentina, Australia and Chile: Argentina The rail infrastructure subsidiary COMSA de Argentina was created in 1994. Australia COMSA had a 40% shareholding in MVM Rail Pty Ltd (along with Macmahon Holding @ 60%) - the company undertakes most aspects of railway infrastructure work including signalling and overhead cable installation. Outside Australia MVM worked on rail projects in South-East Asian countries. The company was founded in 1992 by COMSA and Valditerra of Italy.(MVM rail - about us mvmrail.com) Chile The rail infrastructure subsidiary COMSA de Chile was created in 1995. Poland COMSA owned a majority share in the three subsidiaries that make up the company Trakcja Polska:*PKRE - involved out the design and implementation of railway electrical power systems.(Tracja Polska S.A. company website pkre.pl)*PKRiI (Przedsibiorstwo Robt Kolejowych i Inynieryjnych SA) The companies main line of business was the groundwork for and installation of railway track and associated infrastructure.(Railway Engineering Joint Stock Company of Wrocaw (PKRiI S.A.)  company website prkii.com.pl)*PRK7 (Przedsibiorstwo Robt Komunikacyjnych 7 S.A) became part of Trakcja Polska in 2007; the company specialises in public building construction(eg Railway stations, housing estates, warehousing, sports halls etc) and in rail and tramway creation and repair.(PRK7 S.A. company website prk7.com.pl) Portugal Fergrupo (FERGRUPO , Construes e Tcnicas Ferrovirias, S.A.) was founded in 1989 as a venture between stockholders COMSA, the Italian company Valditerra Spa and the Portuguese company R. Delerue. The company carries out all aspects of railway infrastructure building and maintenance projects.(FERGRUPO  company website fergrupo.pt) References  External links * * 
22043846
Birim_River_(New_Guinea)
The Birim River or Ok Birim in the western province of Guinea is a tributary of the Tedi River, which is in turn a tributary of the north River. The Birim river joins the Ok Tedi river from the west between Ningerum and Bige. The Birim river area is inhabited by the Kaikaruk tribe. They practise tropical forest Swidden agriculture.() About 3,000 people, they speak the Ninggerum language of the Ok group.()There has been ongoing controversy about impacts on migratory fish stocks and on the environment in general from dredging and other  mining operations by the Tedi Mining Limited at what remains of Fubilan.() Since 1984, the people of the area have blamed the mine for general declines in crops and fish yields.()()References
22061334
Disston,_Oregon
Disston is an unincorporated community in Lane County, Oregon, States, southeast of Cottage Grove where Creek and Creek join to form the River. It is about a mile west of the National Forest.Disston post office was established in 1906 and ran until 1974.() Cranston Jones, the first postmaster, was also one of the founders of the first sawmill in Disston and the name of the town came from the famous Disston saws.At one time there were two sawmills in Disston, the Wheeler-Osgood Lumber Company and the I. E.James Lumber Company.() Both mills closed down in the 1950s.(Disston was a sawmill and logging town and also a supply point for miners heading into the nearby Bohemia mining district.() The terminus of the Pacific and Eastern Railway logging railroad was also in Disston.(Row River Trail) Much of the former rail line has now been converted to the River National Recreation Trail, although the trail doesnt extend into Disston.( A hiking trail managed by the States Forest Service, the Noonday Wagon Road Trail, follows an 1896 wagon road that started in Disston and was used to haul supplies into the mining district.()See also*Guard Station, a historic Forest Service structure southeast of DisstonReferencesExternal links*Historic images of two covered bridges near Disston from the Salem Public Library*Historic image of students at Disston School from the University of Oregon LibraryOregon
22075629
Eylesbarrow_mine
Eylesbarrow mine was a tin mine on Dartmoor, Devon, England that was active during the first half of the 19th century. In its early years it was one of the largest and most prosperous of the Dartmoor tin mines, along with mine and the Tor and Vitifer mines.(Newman 1999, p.105) Its name has several variant spellings, such as Eylesburrow, Ailsborough, Ellisborough, Hillsborough etc.(Cook et al. 1974, p.163) It was also known as Wheal Ruth for a short period around 1850.(Cook et al. 1974, pp.173174) The extensive remains lie to the north of the Plym, less than a mile north-east of Drizzlecombe, on the southern shoulder of the hill called Eylesbarrow on top of which are two prominent Age barrows.GeologyThe country rock of the mine is granite. The large sett (about 3 miles by 2 miles) is crossed by many tin-bearing lodes which are substantially vertical and trend east-north-east. Most of the mines excavations were made into just three of these lodes and were relatively shallow.(Cook et al. 1974, Appendix A, pp.200-201) The formation of the lodes was accompanied by extensive metasomatism which converted much of the feldspar in the surrounding granite into the soft mineral kaolinite,(Edmonds et al. 1985, p.49) and made excavation easier than it would have been in unaltered rock.The lodes varied in width up to a maximum of around 2.4 ft (0.73 m) and were, at least in the early years of the mines operation, sometimes of very high quality ore, uncontaminated with other unwanted metalliferous ores.( The existence of these high quality ores near the surface led the miners to believe that even better ore existed deeper down, but the history of the mine suggests that this is not the case and the mineralisation becomes patchy at depth.(HistoryStreaming and open-cast mining for tin have taken place in this part of Dartmoor for many centuries. It is believed that the industry on the moor was at its peak as early as the 12th century.(Newman 1999, p.110 (citing Worth 1953)) For instance, in 1168 men from the nearby village of Sheepstor are known to have been tinners.( Around 550 years later a document of 1715 stated of Sheepstor Parish that all the parishioners are tinners,(Cook et al. 1974, p.164) but by this time working for tin on the moor was already in decline, probably because of the exhaustion of the easily-accessible deposits.(Newman 1998, p.55)Revival came in the late 1780s, fired by the needs and innovations of the industrial revolution.(( It is possible that some underground working took place on the site of the mine as early as 1790,(Newman 1999, p.110) but the first documentary evidence is an offer for sale of shares in a mine called Ailsborough in 1804, and records of tin dues paid from 1806 to 1810.(Newman 1999, p.109)By 1814 demand had caused the price of tin to rise to about 150 per ton and in that year a sett called Ellisborough Tin Set was granted.( Extraction started at the mine in February 1815 and by 1820, despite several business difficulties, it was sending quantities of tin to Cornwall for smelting.(Cook et al. 1974, p.165) In 1822 the mine opened its own smelting house on the sitethe only one in operation on the moor. There is evidence that black tin was bought from nearby mines for smelting here.(The next ten years or so were the mines most productive period, despite there being a fall in the price of tin from 1826.(Cook et al. 1974, Appendix C, pp.212-213) In addition to tin, some Forest Clay (kaolin) was sold.( In 1831 the mine employed over sixty men, but at the end of that year the smelter ceased operation( and there is then a four-year gap in the records.DeclineIn June 1836, when the price of tin was again at a high, a prospectus for Dartmoor Consolidated Tin Mines was published in the recently-founded trade magazine The Mining Journal, offering 7,500 shares at 5 each.(Cook et al. 1974, p.167) The mine apparently operated unsuccessfully on a small scale for the next few years while the price of tin fell again. In August 1838 the shares on which 3. 10s had been paid were worth only 2. By early 1840 the shares, by then fully paid-up were worth just 1.(Cook et al. 1974, pp.169170) By 1841 only three or four men were employed and in 1844, with the price of tin at an all-time low of just over 60 per ton, the mine closed.(Cook et al. 1974, p.170)In early 1847, with tin back up to around 90 per ton, the mine was again advertised (this time as Dartmoor Consols Tin Mining Company), offering 2,048 shares at 2 each. This resurgence of activity was bolstered with glowing reports on the quality of its ore and the previous high returns that had been made despite the shafts being of no great depth. It was also said that the smelting house can be made fit for use at a very trifling cost which will make it a source of great profit.(Cook et al. 1974, p.171)In June 1847 the mine captain, John Spargo, proposed a number of improvements, including the installation of a 50 ft (15 m) waterwheel and new stamps, and the sinking of new shafts, the whole costing a total of nearly 1,000.( Much of this work was undertaken, but by October the same year, the first signs that all was not well appeared in The Mining Journal. The shares had not been well taken up and the lack of money was causing problems. By the following March it was reported that the mine could not continue in operation and a final call of 1 per share was being made to clear the debts of the company. It was clear that no tin had been sold.(Cook et al. 1974, p.172)Yet another company, calling itself Aylesborough, was formed during 1848, and sold over 50 worth of black tin. In 1849 Captain Spargo reported that the stamps were working well and a shaft had been deepened to 20 fathoms below adit.( But problems reappeared and in 1851 it was advertisedfor the last timeas Wheal Ruth with 2,700 shares offered at 2 each.(Cook et al. 1974, p.174) This new concern employed only a few men, but operated successfully for a time, selling 1 ton 4 cwt 11 lb of ore for 61. 9s in September 1851 and over two tons for more than 107 in the last quarter of the year.( However on 25 September 1852 The Mining Journal ran an advert for the sale of all the mines equipment by auction. Since the price of tin was rising again at this time, it is most likely that the mine had become exhausted of tin that was recoverable economically.(Cook et al. 1974, p.175)DocumentationAlthough it was once a large and important mine, there are no known plans of its extensive underground workings,(Hamilton Jenkin 1974, p.87) and there are few extant records of its output of tin ore. What is known, however, is that a total of about 276 tons of tin was coined (i.e. recorded and taxed) at Tavistock, the nearest town, between the years 1822 and 1831, and this may have been worth almost 30,000.(Cook et al. 1974, p.166) The mines most productive year was 1825, when 403 blocks of tin weighing over 1,220 cwt in total were coined.(Field remainsThe large site was extensively surveyed by Heritage in 1999 with full details entered into the Monuments Record.(Newman 1999, p.106)()In common with most Dartmoor valleys, the entire valley floor of the upper Plym and its tributaries are disturbed by the remains of streamworks. There are also a number of openworks that follow the lodes, and signs of leats and reservoirs and hundreds of pits. These all represent the efforts of the old men who worked the area for tin in the centuries before the mine came into being.(Shafts and aditsThere are 25 shaftheads visible at Eylesbarrow, most of which are on a single curved alignment along the line of the main lode, which is roughly followed by part of the main track that runs through the mine. The shaftheads exist as conical pits, the smallest being 9m in diameter and the largest, marking Pryce Deacons Shaft near the eastern end of the alignment, 16m in diameter. Some of them (for instance New Engine Shaft, shown here) have the original masonry collar still visible. Each pit has a spoil heap nearby, usually in the shape of a crescent on the downhill side of the pit. These heaps vary in size; the largest, at Pryce Deacons Shaft, is over 3m high and covers about 665 square metres.(Newman 1999, p.111)(Newman 1999, Appendix 1, pp.144146) Much interpretative work has taken place to match the visible shafts with the names mentioned in the contemporary documentation, with the result that about half of them can be named and dated with some confidence.(Newman 1999, pp.111115)Four adits are referred to in the mine documents. Shallow Adit and Deep Adit both date from the early phase of working, around 1815. Shallow Adit is blocked, its position marked by a stream issuing from the hillside just to the south of the main track. Deep Adit, however, is still open. Its entrance is lined with sturdy granite slabs and is about 2.2m high and 0.9m wide.Two Brothers Adit is also still open and discharges an abundant stream of water into the steep-sided gulley that surrounds it. It evidently belongs to the later phase of the mine, being first mentioned in the 1840s. The fourth adit, referred to as Deacons Adit, is untraceable in the field and may never have passed the planning stage.(Newman 1999, pp.115117)Leats, reservoir and wheelpitsDespite the extensive underground workings, no more than one waterwheel was used for pumping water out of the mine. The first waterwheel, whose wheelpit can still be seen just to the north of the main track,(Newman 1999, p.120) was built in 181415 and was powered by water carried by a leat that curved around the south side of Higher Hartor Tor drawing water from the upper reaches of the River Plym. In 1818 this leat, known as Engine Leat, was extended over the Plym to also collect water from the Langcombe Brook, a tributary on its south bank. Another leat built in the 1820s attempted to collect water from the hillside to the north.( That the water supply was still inadequate at times is shown by the construction, before 1825, of a large linear reservoir on the line of the main leat, the northern end of which is now cut off by the main track which used to pass over it by a bridge. This reservoir was up to 13 m wide and up to 1.3 m deep and its 192 m long dam was about 10 m thick and reinforced with substantial granite blocks on the inner face.(Newman 1999, p.140) Crossing reported that the mine owner, a man named Deacon, used to entertain guests by taking them out on the reservoir in a small boat.(Newman 1999, p.140, quoting Crossing (1905) Gems in a Granite Setting, p.157.)Construction of a more powerful waterwheel, the one proposed by Captain Spargo in 1847, was completed by March 1849 at the latest. It replaced the earlier wheel and was sited in the head of the disused Deep Adit Shaft, close to the Two Brothers Adit. This waterwheel had a diameter of 50 ft (15 m) and 3 ft (1 m) breast and was almost certainly the largest on the moor at the time.(Cook et al. 1974, pp.180-181) Being located about 30 m lower down the hillside, it could take advantage of a richer water supply which included the outfall from the nearby adit, an earlier leat drawing water from the Plym, some further leats to the north that attempted to collect water from the runoff on the hillside, as well as the re-routed Engine Leat.(Newman 1999, pp.121, 123)Traces of all the above-mentioned features can still be seen in the field.The flatrod systemAs a matter of principle a power source (such as a waterwheel) is installed as close as possible to the equipment that it drives (such as a water pump), to minimise the inevitable loss of power incurred in its transmission. When the distance between source and target is significant an efficient means of transferring the power is necessary, and in the 19th century the best method available was the flatrod system. This was used at a number of mines and consisted of a series of linked iron or wooden rods connected to a crank on a waterwheel (or steam engine). The crank converted the circular motion of the wheel into an oscillatory back-and-forth motion of the rods which, suitably supported, could be extended for some distance along the ground. A heavy weight, known as the bob, pivoted on one or both ends of the run of the rods kept them under tension and allowed the conversion of the horizontal motion to vertical motion down the shaft.From the advert for the auction of the mines equipment. The Mining Journal, 25 September 1852(At Eylesbarrow the engine shafts in which the water pumps were situated were located high on the brow of the hill where there was no adequate water supply for a waterwheel to be located nearby. Consequently the power from the waterwheel was carried by a flatrod system up the hillside to the shafts. The rods were made of iron and were supported by pulleys with flanged rims that ran on short axles supported by pairs of granite pillars around 0.4 m apart. These pillars had distinctive notches cut into their tops to support the axles. Parts of four runs of these paired posts can be seen today. They vary in height from just above ground level to around a metre, and some run through shallow cuttings, representing the varying contour of the ground.(Newman 1999, p.121)From the wheelpit of the first waterwheel, two series of double pillars head eastwards up the hill, just to the north of the main track. The northern series heads towards Old Engine Shaft, a distance of 663 metres. This shaft was in use from 1814 onwards. The southern, less well preserved series, probably led to Pryce Deacons Shaft, 777 metres away, and may have been in use in the 1840s.(In the second, later, wheelpit, pictured here, the wheel itself was on the south side of the pit (on the right in this photograph). The short length of wall on the right is the end wall of the wheelpit. The mechanism operating the flatrod system was on the north side, aligned with the short section of wall visible further away on the left: this probably formed part of the first support for the flatrods, which are believed to have travelled underground until they reached a V-shaped gulley, just visible towards the top of the photograph.(This flatrods from this wheel led towards Pryce Deacons Shaft, 961 metres away and also to Henrys Engine Shaft, 854 metres away. A spur leads off at an angle to another unnamed shaft to the north, 1192 m distant. The chronology of the use of these systems is not certain, though the extension to the northern shaft probably represents the very last phase of underground mining at the site.(Newman 1999, pp.123124)Stamping mills and smelting houseThe purpose of a stamping mill is to crush the mined ore to a fine sand which is then processed at an adjacent dressing floor to separate the heavier tin ore from the waste material or gangue, which is dumped. There are remains of six stamping mills at Eylesbarrow mine, an unusually high number, although they were not all in use at the same time. They form a rough line down the hillside into the head of the Drizzlecombe valley and in the literature they are numbered from 1 to 6: No. 1 is the highest, located just below the first pumping waterwheel to the north of the main track; No. 6 is about 0.75 km distant and some 35 m lower down the slope. The prominent wall with a hole in it just below the main track is the side wall of the wheelpit of stamping mill No. 2, the hole marking the location of the axle.(Cook et al. 1974, p.187)The oldest mill is No. 4 which was operating in 1804, followed the next year by No. 6., a large construction which had its waterwheel in the centre of the floor with machinery on both sides. Both these were powered by the lower of the two leats that took water from the River Plym. The major works undertaken on the mine in 1814 included the construction of three new mills (Nos. 1, 2 and 3) and the cutting of the higher (Engine) leat to power them.Mill No. 5, which had the smelter attached, was completed by 1822.(Newman 1999, pp.126127) The smelting house (shown here as it looks today) had two furnaces. There was a furnace(Cook et al. 1974, p.194) the large squared block in the foreground was part of this; and an older-style blast furnace, similar in design to a house, but with a unique flue running up the hillside behind to a short stack.(Cook et al. 1974, pp.1934, 1967) The two large standing and three fallen granite blocks towards the back of the building are the remains of this furnace.(Newman 1999, p.137)The wheelpit for the waterwheel that powered the bellows of the blast furnace was immediately behind the short length of standing wall, and the small stamping mill and dressing floor were behind again, on the other side of the wheel.( The three stone pillars in the background are believed to have supported a roof structure later in the history of the mine, after smelting ceased.(Other remainsSome of the shafts have balance-bob pits associated with them, and there are traces of horse-whims, which were used to raise or lower items in the shafts.(Newman 1999, pp.124126) Several reck houses, used for further processing of the crushed ore, are also visible.(Newman 1999, p.135) The ruins of the mansion or mine captains house and its associated buildings can be seen to the north of the main track.(Cook et al. 1974, p.178198) There are further remains of an associated mine known as Wheal Katherine about a kilometre to the eastthese include six shafts, a wheelpit and another stamping mill (known as No. 7).(Newman 1999, pp.117, 120, 125, 127, 130)Notes(ReferencesSources*********Search results for Eylesbarrow. (Note that according to the grid reference, image da000129 is a photograph of the Mansion House, not the smelting-house; and da000130 is clearly spurious). Dartmoor Archive. Retrieved on 2009-04-01.
22091919
Merton_Yarwood_Williams
footnotes          Merton Yarwood Williams (June 21, 1883 &ndash; February 3, 1974) was a Canadian geologist and academic.EducationBorn near Bloomfield, Ontario, of Loyalist descent,  Williams graduated from Picton High School in 1902 and was a teacher for three years before starting University. He received a Bachelor of Science degree in mining engineering from University in 1909.  While a student at University, he was a student assistant for the Survey of Canada and did geological work in Columbia, the Yukon and Scotia. In 1912, he received a Ph.D. degree from University where he studied stratigraphy and paleontology under Schuchert. He married Lula Mund Philip in 1915.()CareerIn 1912, he joined the Geological Survey of Canada and worked in Ontario on the regional stratigraphy of Ordovician and Silurian formations of the Peninsula, the Island, and the Bay area. In 1921, he became an associate professor of paleontology and stratigraphy at the of British Columbia (UBC) where helped to build the Department of Geology. While at UBC he studied the geology of the River and the Franklin Mountains.(In 1920s, he went to Kong where he made a geological study which produced a map in 1935 and a description of the geology in 1943. In 1926, he was made a full professor of paleontology and stratigraphy and was appointed head of the Department of Geology and Geography in 1936. He taught courses in introductory geology, historical geology, and paleontology. He retired in 1950.(In 1916, he was made a Fellow of the Society of America and served as its vice-president from 1945 to 1946. In 1926, he was made a Fellow of the Society of Canada and served as its president from 1960 to 1961.(References
22108807
Palace_of_Iturbide
The Palace of Iturbide is a large palatial home located in the historic center of City on Madero Street #17. It was built by the Count of San Mateo Valparaso as a wedding gift for his daughter. It gained the name Palace of Iturbide because de Iturbide lived and accepted the crown of the Mexican Empire (as Agustin I) there after independence from Spain. Today, the restored building houses the Fomento Cultural Banamex and has been renamed the Palacio de Cultura Banamex.History of buildingThis residence was never owned by Agustn de Iturbide. It was constructed by Miguel de Berrio y Saldvar, Count of San Mateo Valparaso and Marquis of Jaral de Berrio. Berrio y Saldvars fortune was based in mining and livestock and he was also the mayor of Mexico City. Supposedly he had this palace built elaborately to equal the sum of his daughters dowry,() approximately 100,000 pesos,() with the hopes of keeping his son-in-law, the Marquis of Moncada of Sicily from squandering his daughters wealth. It was built as a replica of the royal palace of Palermo. This couples son, the grandson of homes builder, preferred not to live in the palace but rather offered it to visiting dignitaries such as viceroy Calleja and later Iturbide.  From this palaces balcony, Iturbide accepted the offer to be Mexicos first emperor after independence from Spain and during his reign (18211823) this house served as the royal palace.(After the Conquest, the site was part of land granted to Gonzalo Jurez de Crdoba.() Until the 17th century, the site was a convent for the Sisters of Saint Brigit, until they sold the land to Berrio y Saldvar.()Design of buildingThis Mexican Baroque building was designed and begun by Antonio Guerrero y Torres and finished by his brother-in-law Agustn Duran between 1779 and 1785.(( ) The building has three floors and a mezzanine and shows Italian influence in its Baroque design. Its faade of tezontle and cantera stone() is flanked by two fortified towers at the ends of the faade and it has a central gallery or loggia, which is now closed to the public. The faade is decorated with carved stone that features organic and geometric motifs such as flowers, small double-tailed mermaids and graceful male figures. Inside, the porch has a vaulted roof and there is a large archway leading to the courtyard decorated with geometric figures.(  The courtyard is surrounded by eighteen arches supported by Tuscan columns.(Later uses of buildingEarly in the 19th century, the building housed the College of Mining, then remodeled in 1855 for use as a hotel. In 1965, it was purchased and restored by the Bank of Mexico. In 1972, it became the home of the Banamex Cultural Foundation (Fomento Cultural Banamex). The foundation spent two years from 2002 to 2004 doing significant restoration work on the building and then reopened it as the Palacio de Cultura Banamex. It hosts a large number of temporary art exhibitions and art workshops for adults and children.(Referencesde IturbideSaray
22116313
Skelmersdale
SESkelmersdale is a town in Lancashire, England. It lies on high-ground on the Tawd,  to the west of Wigan,  to the northeast of Liverpool,  south-southwest of Preston. As of 2006, Skelmersdale had a population of 38,813,(Great Britain World Gazetteer) down from 41,000 in 2004. The town is known locally as Skem.The first recorded use of the name Skelmersdale appears in the Book of 1086. It was under the rule of Uctred as part of the hundred of West Derby.The urbanisation and development of Skelmersdale largely coincided with the Revolution. Industrial scale mining began in the early 19th century and continued to expand during that century to give rise to Skelmersdale as an important colliery village.Skelmersdale was designated as a new town in 1961.GeographyThe Tawd flows through Skelmersdale into a country park. The main country park is at Ashurst Beacon, a hillside location that is also home to a golf club.HistoryToponymySkelmersdale means Skjaldmarrs valley, from the Norse personal name Skjaldmarr + probably Old Norse dalr (or English dl) dale, valley. The name was recorded as Skalmeresedel in 1136. One placename book suggests that it may be of Celtic origin, with the placenames being in Celtic placename order: Element/personal name/word, rather than Personal name/word/element, as with Old English placenames.It is known locally as Skem,(Ward, David. Back to the drawing board, The Guardian, January 18, 2006. Retrieved on May 12, 2008.) with a further distinction being made between Old Skem (the area which was a small mining town prior to 1961) and the broader swathe of development which has now developed.Early historyUntil the creation of Skelmersdale Urban District Council at the end of the 19th century, the town was part of the Parish of Ormskirk in the West Derby hundred, an ancient subdivision of Lancashire, covering the southwest of the county.In the mid-14th century, the manor of Skelmersdale was held by Dacre, 2nd Baron Dacre.(Edward Baines, William Robert Whatton, Brooke Herford, James Croston, The history of the county palatine and duchy of Lancaster, vol. 5 (J. Heywood, 1893), p. 2)Skelmersdales population in 1851 was only 760, but 50 years later it had increased to 5,699. It was a busy coal mining town.(Pevsner, Nikolaus, Sir (2002) North Lancashire Yale University Press, New Haven ISBN 0-300-09617-8 p. 226;) Sadly, there were over 100 fatalities in Skelmersdale collieries from 1851 to 1900, according to the Reports of the Inspectors of Coal Mines, and an unknown number of serious injuries. In 1880 there were 14 Skelmersdale colleries - most of them closed in the 1920s and 30s.thumb|left|Skelmersdale war memorial.The miners, many of whom were Welsh immigrants, brought with them their own brand of Nonconformist Christianity. By the start of the 20th century there were at least six dissenting chapels in the town: two Wesleyan (Berry Street, closed in the 1920s, and Liverpool Road, closed 1969), an independent Methodist, a Methodist, a Congregational, and a Welsh Chapel (closed in 1963).Today, there is little to remind people that the town was ever associated with the once great Coalfield.There were also numerous brickworks in the area, and in the early-20th century County History, Skelmersdale was described as a particularly bare, unpleasing district owing to its mines and brickworks.()New townSkelmersdale was designated a New Town in 1961, designed to house overspill population from the north Merseyside conurbation. The town was the first in the second wave of designations. Due to the arrival of a large number of former Liverpool residents, the town retains a strong cultural association with Liverpool.Skelmersdale endured mixed economic fortunes during the last three decades of the 20th century. With the economic downturn in the late 1970s large industrial employers left the town en masse, resulting in an increase in crime, drug abuse and poverty. Today, West Lancashire has a crime rate well below the national average.()2006 was to see a regeneration drive for the town coordinated through Partnerships and the Northwest Regional Development Agency and publicly headed by the designer Hemingway.(welcome to skelmersdale vision > progress diary) Among the proposals was a new central focus for the entertainment and commerce for the town in the evening.(Cadet ForcesSkelmersdale has units of the Training Corps, Cadet Force and Cadet Corps. These units take part in the local community life and are routinely seen attending the Remembrance Sunday parade in the old town.thumb|right|1439 Sqn Crest showing Ashurst Beacon and Canadian Maple LeafAir Training Corps(Skelmersdale) Squadron, Air Cadets, formed at Upholland Grammar School in 1941 as The Beacon Squadron and provided airmanship training for young men and those about to join the RAF in time for the Battle of Britain. The Squadron continues to provide airmanship training to young men and women in addition to other activities.Army Cadet ForceThe Army Cadets are part of S Company of the Lancashire Force. They are based at Daniels Lane.Sea Cadet CorpsThe Sea Cadets are also well established in Skelmersdale as Skelmersdale and West Lancs District and are based at Tawd Road.TransportRoadthumb|right|Hope Island, one of many roundabouts found within Skelmersdale.The layout of the town is unique for the oversized roundabouts (the largest of which is Half Mile Island) and a complete absence of lights. Skelmersdales road system has improved with better signage, although visitors still frequently get lost.The motorway (Liverpool - Wigan Motorway) runs along the south of Skelmersdale from the nearby motorway to the Island interchange at Liverpool. The A570 and the A577 both provide connections.The New Town areas of Skelmersdale have a road-naming system where Road and Street are rarely used and single-name roads are common, e.g. Abbeywood, Fairburn, Brierfield, Thornwood. Road, Street, Lane and Drive do appear in road names, but only in the parts of the town (bordering on Ormskirk, St. Helens and Wigan) that pre-date the New Town development. The road names in New Town areas are also arranged in a loosely alphabetical format with large areas being defined by a single letter, for example Larkhill, Leeswood, Ledburn and Lindens all connect to Ashley Road in the Ashurst area.Roads in the industrial estates and the main roads in the town such as Gillibrands Road follow the usual naming conventions, although the industrial estates do feature street names beginning with the same letter (such as Pikelaw Place, Penketh Place, Pinfold Place, Priorswood Place) all forpart of the Pimbo Industrial Estate.++Bus On the 21st April 2011, the company providing Skelmersdales bus services, Arriva, announced that it was consulting with staff about the proposed closure of their depot in Skelmersdale, which employs 129 people.() .  The depot was first constructed for Ribble Motors in the 1970s, and the premises will now be sold. Skelmersdale will now be served by buses from St. Helens, Bootle and Southport.RailSince the closure of railway station in 1956, the town has become the second most populous town in the North West Region without a railway station.(Network Rail (November 2008) Merseyside Route Utilisation Strategy (RUS) Draft for Consultation, Page 93) The nearest railway station is railway station on the Wigan Wallgate to Kirkby branch line (historically part of the and Bury Railway line.(Disused Stations:Skelmersdale Subterranea Britannica)) The Branch previously connected Skelmersdale to Ormskirk and Rainford Junction.In March 2009, Rail proposed to extend the existing quarter-hourly Liverpool Central to Kirkby service, to terminate at a new station in the centre of Skelmersdale. Rainford will then become an interchange station for services to and from Wigan Wallgate.(Network Rail Merseyside RUS Draft) In June 2009, the of Train Operating Companies published a report, Connecting Communities, which also recommended the opening of a new rail link to Skelmersdale.(Train operators back half billion rail reopening blitz, Transport Briefing, 15/06/09) This time the recommendation was via the Skelmersdale Branch from Ormskirk.EducationSkelmersdale has a number of primary schools, and has three high schools. These are Our Lady Queen of Peace Catholic High School an Engineering College, Lathom High School a Technology College and Glenburn Sports College.Lancashire College has a campus in the centre of the town. The college merged with College in 2007() and was recently graded as outstanding in a recent OFSTED inspection.( )There is a Meditation movement community within Skelmersdale, called European Sidhaland.(http://www.maharishi-european-sidhaland.org.uk/) It has a School  that has performed well in OFSTED and school league tables. In 2011, it was one of 24 schools that applied for and received government funding as a flagship free school.() Skelmersdale also is home to a large public library whose facilities include free internet access and an extensive local history section.()EconomyAlthough consisting predominantly of housing estates, Skelmersdales industry includes the Bank() (Skelmersdales single largest employer), distribution centres for Asda() and P&G,() a Walkers snack food factory,() the international headquarters and UK manufacturing centre of Wax() and many others. Skelmersdale houses the corporate base and a distribution centre for Matalan, the discount clothing and homewares store.() Dairies is located in Skelmersdale who make ice cream for Cadbury ()Shopping centresSkelmersdales town centre is made up of The Concourse Shopping Centre,(Welcome to The Concourse Shopping Centre, Located in Skelmersdale) colloquially known as The Conny, and an Asda supermarket.There are an abundance of smaller shopping parades in Skelmersdale which include Sandy Lane, Digmoor Parade and Ashurst Shopping Center. One of the biggest shops in skelmersdale is Retail Bargains (Welcome to Retail Bargains, Located in Skelmersdale)SportsThe towns football team, Skelmersdale United, plays in the Unibond Premier League Division One North and was a Vase winner in 1971. One of its former players was Heighway, who went on to play for F.C. for many years.The town is also host to an archery club, The Bowmen of Skelmersdale(Bowmen of Skelmersdale) whose collective members hold 19 county records(Flight World Records) and 14 World Records held by three individuals from the same family (Daniel, Harriet Daniel and Gary Daniel), 6 of which were claimed at the National Flight Championships on the 19th August 2006 held at RAF Fenton.(Result from National Flight Championshions 2006)ReferencesFurther reading* Wilson, L. Hugh (1964) Skelmersdale new town planning proposals : report on basic plan prepared for the Skelmersdale Development Corporation by L. Hugh Wilson, Hugh Wilson & Lewis Womersley Chartered Architects & Town Planners, with a foreword by A.J. Kentish Barnes, Chairman of the Skelmersdale Development Corporation, Skelmersdale Development Corporation;* Riley, Frank (1986) People in Need of a Future: A Survey of the Long-term Unemployed in Skelmersdale Ecumenical Centre, Northway, Skelmersdale;* Howe, Don and Frank Riley (1982) Skem - The Broken Promise: Unemployment in Skelmersdale New Town Liverpool Industrial Ecumenical Mission;External links*Skem News*Skelmersdale Heritage Society website*Potential Rail Improvements in North Western England - Evidence presented to the Transport Select Committee, 200203*Ormskirk & Skelmersdale Advertiser*Champion Newspapersit:Skelmersdalenl:Skelmersdalenn:Skelmersdalepl:Skelmersdalero:Skelmersdaletr:Skelmersdalevo:Skelmersdale
22142912
Hiram_Augustus_Calvin
Hiram Augustus Calvin (April 6, 1841 &ndash; January 13, 1932) was a businessman and political figure in Ontario, Canada. He represented Frontenac as an Independent Conservative from 1892 to 1896 and as a Conservative from 1900 to 1904.He was born on Garden Island, West, the son of Dexter Calvin and Marion Breck, and was educated there, at the Woodstock Literary Institute and at University. Calvin joined his fathers business and later succeeded him as lumber merchant, ship builder and forwarder. He also helped establish the Kingston Foundry and Machinery Company. In 1879, he married Annie W. Marsh. He served as reeve for Garden Island from 1884 to 1892. Calvin was first elected to the House of Commons in an 1892 by-election held after Airey Kirkpatrick was named Lieutenant-Governor. Calvin did not run for reelection in 1896. He served on the board of governors for Kingston Hospital, was a trustee for Queens University and was vice-chairman of the School of Mining and Agriculture at Kingston. References **The Canadian men and women of the time a handbook of Canadian biography, HJ Morgan (1898)
22163104
Donner_Metals
 homepage    www.donnermetals.comDonner Metals Ltd. () is a Canadian advanced exploration company, listed on the Venture Exchange. Its headquarters are in Vancouver, Columbia, Canada.  Donners principal project is a 50-50 joint venture with Zinc Canada in Matagami, Quebec.(Xstrata Zinc Canada)HistoryThe Company was founded in 1995 as a mining exploration company prospecting in South Voiseys Bay, and Labrador.(Donner History) While this project eventually stalled, along the way a relationship with Falconbridge was developed.In 2006, Donner signed a deal with Falconbridge, wherein Donner is required to spend $20 million by May 31, 2011, plus another $5 million if a brand new discovery was made. The deal effectively makes Donner the funding vehicle for exploration within the Matagami base metal camp.(Kaiser Bottom-Fish Online) Xstrata can earn back a 15% interest on the project by spending up to $20 million on a feasibility study.thumb|235px|right|Donner Metals Ltd.s CEO Harvey Keats in front of Xstrata Zincs Matagami MillMatagami ProjectSince signing the deal, the joint-venture partners have focused their efforts on the Bracemac-McLeod property.  The property is located 6 km southeast of Xstratas Matagami Mill.(Bracemac-McLeod Property) A drill program, ongoing since 2006, was wrapped-up in 2008.  In February 2009, Donner released a Instrument 43-101 compliant resource estimate of 3,623,000 tonnes at 11.52% zinc, 1.60% copper, 31.55 g/t silver and 0.49 g/t gold.(Resource Estimate News) Since completing a scoping study (Scoping Study News) Xstrata has completed drilling on an accelerated feasibility study on the Bracemac-McLeod area (http://www.donnermetals.com/uploadedFiles/images/NRJune3.pdf) Xstrata begin construction in July 2010, with full production scheduled for January 2013. Xstrata is the operator of the project.Bracemac-McLeod MineOn July 9, 2010, Xstrata Zinc announced they will immediately begin development of the Bracemac-McLeod deposit. In an official public statement Xstrata News Room July 9, 2010 made at 11:30am (EST) in Matagami, Xstrata Zinc announced this exciting next step for the Matagami Mining Camp and credited the success of the combined Xstrata-Donner exploration team that made the discovery of this deposit. Xstrata Zincs expedient decision to develop Bracemac-McLeod was made in order to meet a timeline that is expected to enable production from Bracemac-McLeod to replace production from Xstratas wholly owned Perseverance mine without a gap in feed to the Matagami mill. CTV News reported that Xstrata Zinc Canada is going ahead with a new base metals mine in northwestern Quebec that will create about 250 jobs. The combined Xstrata-Donner exploration team discovered the ore deposit and the two companies will spend $158-million to develop the project. Jean Desrosiers, vice-president of mining operations for Xstrata Zinc Canada, said he is delighted with development of the Bracemac-McLeod mine, which will produce 80,000 tonnes of zinc and 10,000 tonnes of copper annually when it opens in 2013. The project is a low capital cost, high return project that will provide a continued feed of ore to Xstratas Matagami concentrator once the Perseverance Mine comes to the end of its life, he said in a release. The new mine will use existing processing infrastructure and will provide ongoing employment opportunities for the existing work force at Perseverance. The new mine will also minimize its environmental footprint by using the closed Bell-Allard South mine pit to dig the new ramp.Exploration AwardsIn November 2007, Donner was presented the Prospector of the Year Award by the Quebec Mineral Exploration Association.(AEMQ Prospector Award)In December 2008, Donner won Mining Journal (trade magazine)s Outstanding Exploration Achievement Award.(Mining Journal Award)In November 2010, Donner and Xstrata accepted the Development of the Year award from the Quebec Mineral Exploration Association.ReferencesExternal links*Donner Metals Ltd.*Xstrata*Matagami, Quebec
22192523
Master_of_Science_in_Information_Technology
A Master of Science in Information Technology (abbreviated MSIT, MScIT, M.Sc.IT, MSc.IT or M.Sc IT.) is a type of postgraduate academic masters degree awarded by universities in many countries. This degree is typically studied for in technology and science. An alternate degree title is Master of Information Technology (M.I.T.).() The MS/MSc in Information Technology aims to impart the understanding and skills todevelop advanced software systems to professional standards. It covers core skills in InformationTechnology (IT) at MS/MSc level, while letting students studyspecialist advanced topics and designed to provide the skills and knowledge to understand and be able to exploit the rapidly advancing technologyassociated with IT and, in particular, with its use in acommercial environment.The objective of the programme is to mould students to acquire analytical, creative and problem solving skills to meet the industry standards and be well prepared for research activities.MSIT/MScIT is offered by many university across the globe for the professionals working in the software industry or related fields. This program is intended to enhance their existing academic foundations with comprehensive understanding of the use and application of information technology. The programme focuses on Advanced Operating Systems, Data Structures, Software Project Management, Networks, Data Warehousing and Data Mining.StructureThe Master of Science in Information Technology is a one to three years Degree, depending on the program, some may even start with 2 year preparation classes. It covers various areas of information technology and may be focused on engineering, development, programming, testing, or security.Topics of study may include:* languages* design and optimization* networks* management systems* database management system* engineering* communication* graphics* system* development* mining* E-commerce* shell scripting* electronics* Multimedia Technology* information systems* securityCertain countries in Europe (such as France) demands that Topics on Accounting, Project, Management, Management and Law be included to better prepare their members into their careers.IndiaThe M.ScIT is typically a taught postgraduate degree, involving lectures, examination, and a short project. Taught masters programmes involve 1,2 or 3 years of full-time study (or the equivalent period part-time). Some universities also offer research MSc programmes, where a longer project or set of projects is undertaken full-time. See also * ABET - Accreditation Board for Engineering and Technology (United States)* of Science in Information Technology * of Information Technology; Other degrees * of Science in Accounting* of Science in Corporate Communication* of Science in Project Management* of Science in Economics* of Science in Engineering* of Science in Finance* of Science in Information Systems* of Science in Management* of Science in Nursing* of Science in Taxation* of Science in Geographic Information Science and SystemsReferences(http://www.jainuniversity.ac.in/Admissions_ProgOffered.htm)http://www.jainuniversity.ac.in/AdmissionsIndStd_courses.htmhttp://www.smude.edu.in/Admissions/AboutDE/Pages/Overview.aspxhttp://www.christuniversity.in/Computer%20Science%20and%20Applications/progdetails.php?divisionDeanery%20of%20Sciences&dept62&prid182#crhttp://ksoumysore.edu.in/admission.htmlhttp://www.vit.ac.in/http://annamalaiuniversity.ac.in/http://liverpool.ohecampus.com/index.php?refcodewwgoo4xxxxhttp://entrance-exam.net/forum/general-discussion/colleges-india-offering-msc-msc-management-eligibility-criteria-fee-structure-exam-81584.html
22213558
Johann_Gottfried_Tulla
Johann Gottfried Tulla (born 20 March 1770 in Karlsruhe; died 27 March 1828 in Paris) was a German engineer, who in the nineteenth century accomplished the straightening of the Rhine, improving navigation and alleviating the effects of flooding. His measures gave the upper Rhine a completely new appearance. The river was deepened and channeled between embankments, new sections were dug to straighten out the rivers original meandering course, and numerous small islands were removed. The effect was to reduce the rivers length between Basel and Worms from 355 km to 275 km (220 to 170 miles).(Crump, T. A brief history of the Age of Steam. Robinson, London, 2007) The straightening of the upper Rhine dramatically increased the flood risk in the region of the middle and lower Rhine. (Blackbourn, D. The Conquest of Nature. Water, Landscape and the Making of Moder Germany. Random House, London, 2006)CareerTulla began his training in 1792 with Christian von Langsdorf. In 1795 he began to study chemistry and mineralogy at the Mining Academy in Saxony. Subsequently, he was transferred to the government service in Baden. Further training in Paris followed in 1801, but he was called back to Karlsruhe after a year. There he was appointed to the rank of captain in 1803. Starting in 1807 he worked in Switzerland on the channeling project on the Linth river. Also in 1807 he was one of the founders of the school of engineering, which was the predecessor of the of Karlsruhe. He was promoted several times in subsequent years, in 1809 to major and in 1814 to lieutenant colonel. In 1817 he was appointed director of the Oberdirektion des Wasser- und Straenbaues (Command of water- and road construction). In this office he was instrumental in planning the stabilizing and straightening of the course of the upper Rhine, a huge engineering project that continued until 1879, long after his death.The appointment to officer of the French dhonneur followed in 1827; one year later Tulla died of the consequences of malaria.Tulla was buried at the Cemetery in Paris. His gravestone shows the so called Altrip corner, one of the technically most difficult sections of the Rhine straightening, near the Palatinate village of Altrip.ReferencesGottfried TullaGottfried TullaGottfried TullaGottfried Tulla
22224628
BID2WIN_Software
BID2WIN Software Inc. is a privately held company based in New Hampshire that develops, manufactures, sells, and supports estimating and bidding, field tracking and analysis, and resource planning and dispatching software for the construction industry.Originally founded in 1993 under the name Niche Software, the company was the first to build an estimating and bidding program using .NET and SQL Server, as well as the first in its field to become a Microsoft certified partner.(BID2WIN 2005 Named Best Upgrade By Construction Executive Magazine) By using Microsoft development standards, BID2WIN Software has created products that look and perform like other Microsoft applications, making them intuitive and easy to use.(Companies That Get the Job Done and the Software They Use to Do It.) The company currently sells two products, BID2WIN Estimating & Bidding and the BUILD2WIN Integrated Construction Management Suite, which currently includes two modules - Field (field tracking & analysis), released in January of 2008(BID2WIN Software Launches New Field Tracking Solution) and Logistics (resource planning & dispatching), released in June of 2011(BID2WIN Software Launches New Resource Planning & Dispatching Solution). The suite will also include a third module, Maintenance (equipment maintenance & repair management), which is scheduled to be released next year(BUILD2WIN Maintenance).In May of 2011, BID2WIN Software released new versions of their estimating and bidding and field tracking solutions, BID2WIN 2011(BID2WIN 2011 Released) and BUILD2WIN Field Version 2.3,(BUILD2WIN Version 2.3 Released) which feature updates based on user feedback gathered via BID2WIN Softwares 24/365 technical support hotline, client surveys and annual User Conference.(BID2WIN Software Annual User Conference)BID2WIN Software has been the recipient of several recent industry awards. The company received a Contractors Choice Award(Roads & Bridges Contractors Choice Awards) from Roads & Bridges Magazine for the past three years, with BID2WIN Estimating & Bidding receiving the award in 2008 and 2009, and BUILD2WIN Field receiving the award in 2010. BID2WIN Estimating & Bidding was named a Top Enhanced Product of the year in 2008(Constructech Magazines Top Products of 2008) and 2009(Constructech Magazines Top Products of 2009), and BUILD2WIN Field was named a Top New Product of the year in 2010(Constructech Magazines Top Products of 2010), by Constructech Magazine. The company was also named one of Constructech Magazines 50 Hottest Companies(Constructech Magazines 50 Hottest Companies) for a third consecutive year.Target MarketBID2WIN Softwares solutions are targeted toward both private and public construction companies, from mid-size construction firms to large national and international corporations. BID2WIN and BUILD2WIN are specialized for companies who build bridges, tunnels, elevated highways, concrete, demolition, earthwork, environmental, golf course construction, grading and excavation,  landscaping, marine, mining, paving, railroad, street and highway, traffic signalization, utility and water and sewer.(Review of BID2WIN Software at SoftwareAdvice.com)Top clients include Lafarge, Inc., Industries, Enbridge, Group, Schlumberger and CEMEX.User ConferenceBID2WIN Software hosts a User Conference to provide hands-on training and networking opportunities to its clients on an annual basis. The 2011 User Conference was held at Las Vegas, in conjunction with CONEXPO-CON/AGG 2011. Other recent User Conference locations include The Boca Raton Resort & Club in 2010 and 2007; The Hyatt Regency Coconut Point Resort & Spa in 2009; and The Grand Del Mar in 2008. Dates and location for the 2012 conference will be announced this summer.Partners(BID2WIN Software Partners)*AEM*AGC*ARTBA*CFMA*Computer Guidance*Dexter + Chaney*Explorer Software*Foundation Software*Intuit*Maxwell Systems*Microsoft*Project*NAPA*Oracle*Systems*Sage*UCANE*Viewpoint Construction SoftwareCommunity Involvement(BID2WIN Software Community Involvement)*American Red Cross*Cross Roads House*The First Tee*Banke*Camp Sunshine*Seacoast Repertory Theatre*The Music HallReferencesExternal links*Official website
22241826
Donbas_State_Technical_University
 website       http://dmmi.edu.uaDonbas State Technical University (DonSTU) () is the university located in Alchevsk. It is a large centre of technical education and science in Ukraine. History The Donbas State Technical University was formed on October 12, 1957. At that time it had the name Voroshylovsk Mining-Metallurgical Institute.In 1964 due to the changing of the towns name it possessed the name Kommunarsk Mining-Metallurgical Institute. In 1992 it became Donbas Mining-Metallurgical Institute (DMMI).By the order of Ministry of Education and Science of Ukraine  622 from July 27, 2004 Donbas Mining-Metallurgical Institute was reorganized as the Donbas State Technical University (DonSTU). Structure DonSTU is the largest training center, a higher institution of the IV (highest) level of accreditation. It has the following departments:* Mining;* Metallurgical;* Civil Engineering;* Economics and Finances;* Mechanical Engineering;* Management;* Automation and Electro-technical Systems;* Foreign Students department;* Training-consulting center Osvita;* Institute of advanced study and advanced training courses for managers and leaders;* College;* Scientific Library.University has seven separate departments in the regional cities:* Luch;* Lisichansk;* Krasnodon;* Sverdlovsk;* Rovenki;* Pervomaisk;* Yenakiyevo.University has two technical schools:* industrial in Alchevsk;* mining in Perevalsk.DonSTU has in its structure the scientific-research department, scientific-research design institute Parameter, State Inter-institutional Center for Laser-Location Observation for manmade Earth satellites Orion, having the status of National heritage of Ukraine, Donbas Department of East-Ukrainian branch of Archeology Institute of NASU, Alchevsk Branch of Institute of Physics of mining processes NASU and Ministry of education and science. Scientific and technological activity of Donbas Sate Technical University is carrying out according to priority development trends in science and engineering in Ukraine.University issues its own newspaper Impulse, which has become one of the best students newspapers and obtained the official recognition among youths mass media.Universitys faculty is proud of its historical museum, as well as mining-mineralogical museum with its unique collection of minerals.DonSTU has its sanatorium-preventorium, sport-recreation camp Altagir at Azov seacoast, culture and leisure centre Talant, art production centre Lado. Teachers & Scientists 614 regular teachers works at university (on January, 2009). Students 15963 students studies at university (on January, 2009). Among them:* day form of training - 5535;* correspondence form of training - 10428. Education & Science Training and advanced training of specialists is carrying out on multilevel system, adopted in Europe. During students training we use present-day technologies. Much attention is paid to practical training of our students. They have practical trainings at the largest industrial enterprises and companies of Ukraine.DonSTU is one of the Ukrainian first institutions which put into teaching process the Bologna system and was recognized as the major institution leading in the implementation of new teaching methods.The main partners in scientific and educational spheres are the universities in Great Britain, Hungary, Poland, Russia, Slovakia and Turkey. DonSTU initiate starting cooperation with German and Chinese universities. Among the most successful recent projects are the following ones:* training the group of 20 students of DonSTU in Dunaujvarosh Institute (Hungary) on specialty Management in Metallurgical industry, which is organized through the support of Industrial Union of Donbass Corporation;* successful accreditation of DonSTU with Higher Education Board of Turkish Republic (such accreditation in Turkey possessed only three Ukrainian universities) means, that our diploma will be validated in Turkey and allows Higher Educational Board of Turkey send their students for getting higher education in our university;* international investigations of the ancient mines Kartamysh, holding the international conferences Problems of mining archeology;* scientific research of ancient underground constructions on the territory of Ukraine and Poland, having performed by the scientists of DonSTU and Kracow Mining-Metallurgical Academy.Wide and stable international relations of the university in the field of education and science promote spreading the students mental outlook and adoption process of their preparation to international requirements.References External links * Donbas State Technical University Website    
22269073
Ranadeb_Chaudhuri
Ranadeb Chaudhuri (19 January 1907  2002) was a Barrister specialising in Company Laws and Mining matters with an extensive practice in India. He was called to the Bar from Inn, London.Ranadeb Chaudhuri hailed from Haripur, Upazila of District in Bangladesh. He was a grandson of Rashtraguru Surendranath Banerjee.He was Chairman of the Bar Council of Bengal, President of the Bengal Club for ten consecutive years, Vice-President of the Indian Lawn Tennis Association. Ranadeb Chaudhuri had also played cricket for Surrey during his student days in England.He was the founder of the Jogesh Chandra Chaudhuri College and of the Chandra Chaudhuri Law College, both named after his father and of the Centenary School, Ranchi named after his grandfather.
22291265
Thoricus
Thoricus (or Thorikos) was an Greek city in southern Attica, where lead and silver was mined. There is a theatre dating from ca. 525-480 BC.HistoryThe site was inhabited from the Age (4th millennium BC). Thoricus was the mining centre of the Laureotica. There is evidence of lead extraction from the Helladic period (3rd millennium BC) and of silver (now exhausted) from 1500 BC(). Mycenaean tholos tombs (15th century BC) and a Late Mycenaean installation (12th century BC), probably connected with the mines in the area, have been uncovered. The finds are housed in the Archaeological Museum, Athens.()There were significant town walls and a postern. The towns harbour was to the south of the acropolis; the island of Makronisi (Macri) provides natural protection.(.Cephalus is said to have died at Thoricus(.RemainsThe ancient citys centre and its acropolis are on Velatouri hill and the  theatre (ca. 525-480 BC) is a significant survival. The town was closely packed with irregular building of houses and smiths workshops (many dating from the 7th-4th century BC). A small temple, perhaps dedicated to Hygieia, next to stoas with benches. The large Doric temple (late 5th century BC), may have been a Telesterion for the cult of Demeter and Persephone.(In April of 1886, Walter Miller conducted the first excavation of the site, seeking the theater.()See also* The Theatre at ThoricusReferencesel:
22309327
Tim_Rollins_and_K.O.S.
Tim Rollins studied art at the of Maine and earned a BFA from the of Visual Arts in New York (19757).  After graduate studies in education and philosophy at York University (1977 and 1979), Rollins began teaching art for middle school students in a Bronx public school.(Falconer, Morgan, Art Online, University Press, 2009)  In 1984, he launched the Art and Knowledge Workshop in the Bronx together with a group of at-risk students who called themselves K.O.S. (of Survival).Since the founding of the & Knowledge Workshop in 1982, Tim Rollins & K.O.S. have produced allegorical paintings, sculptures and drawings by mining the vast wealth of printed matter - from the popular to the arcane, from the minor to the canonical, from legal documents to comic books (areas in no way mutually exclusive in Rollins & K.O.S.s view) - which are themselves understood as political allegories.(Myoda, Paul, Tim Rollins and K.O.S. at Mary Boone Gallery, Frieze Magazine, May 1995)The group has exhibited worldwide having participated in two Biennials (1985, 1991), Documenta (1987), the Biennale (1988), the International (1988) and in solo exhibitions at the Art Center, Minneapolis, MN (1988); Institute of Contemporary Art, Boston, MA (1988); Art Foundation, New York, NY (1989); Wadsworth Atheneum, Hartford, CT (1990); Museum fr Gegenwrtskunst Basel, Switzerland (1990); Museum of Contemporary Art, LA (1990); and the Hirshhorn Museum and Sculpture Garden, Washington, DC (1992).  Their work can be seen in public collections including the Museum of Modern Art, NY, theHirshhorn Museum and Sculpture Garden, the Museum of Fine Arts, Boston and the Tate Gallery, London. In February 2009, a retrospective survey of the groups work opened at The Tang Teaching Museum and Art Gallery at Skidmore College.References(External links*www.raucciesantamaria.com  *Museum of Modern Art, NY*Lehmann Maupin Gallery*Eva Presenhuber Gallery*Tate Gallery, London*Hirshhorn Museum and Sculpture Garden*Museum of Contemporary Art, LA*Tim Rollins and K.O.S. at Hufkens, Brussels
22332909
Kathryn_M._Daynes
Kathryn M. Kathy Daynes (born 1946)() is a professor of history at Young University (BYU) and a historian of Mormonism, specializing in Mormon polygamy.  She was president of the History Association in 2008-2009.Daynes began her studies as an undergraduate at BYU in 1964.  However she interrupted her studies and resumed them about ten years later at University, where she received her bachelors in history.  She then went on to receive an M.A. and a Ph.D. in history, both from University, completing the latter in 1991.  Daynes has been an instructor or faculty member at BYU since about 1991.  Daynes is married to Byron (Bill) Daynes, a professor of political science at BYU.  They are the parents of three children.  Daynes was appointed the director of the Center for Family History and Genealogy at BYU in 2007.WritingsShe is the author of the book More Wives than One: Transformation of the Mormon Marriage System, 1840-1910.  Among her major articles are Annual Tax Rolls from the Revolution to 1850: Mining Deep for Genealogical Gold in the Genealogical Journal 28, no. 4 (Dec. 2000), Single Men in Polygamous Society: Male Marriage Patterns in Manti, Utah in of Mormon History 24 (Spring 1998), p. 89-111 and Family Ties: Belief and Practice in Nauvoo in the Whitmer Historical Association Journal, 8 (1988) p. 63-75.In addition to her studies on Mormon polygamy and its social aspects, Daynes has written on broader topics in the history of families and marriage in the United States.NotesSources*Daynes vita*American Historical Review review of Daynes book*Center for Family History and Genealogy newsletter*BYU professor fills LDS history post Deseret News, Jan 24, 2008. External links * 
22345962
Johnny_Handle
The High Level RantersJohnny Handle is an English musician and singer/songwriter. Starting as a skiffle player in 1957 he soon crossed into folk music both as a soloist and as a member of The High Level Ranters. His repertoire is heavily influenced by the traditional music of East England and, in particular, songs about mining. In 1958, with Killen, he founded the and Ballad Club in the Bridge Hotel, Newcastle.()He plays accordion, keyboards, banjo, whistle and the pipes.Selected recordings*The Collier Lad - 1975 (Topic 12TS270)*Shes A Big Lass - 1979 (EMI)*Stottin Doon The Waal  1963 -(Topic TOP78)*Along The Coaly Tyne  (with The High Level Ranters) (Topic TSCD498)ReferencesExternal links* Recordings by Johnny Handle
22372861
High_Peak_Junction
thumb|160px|right|Location of High Peak Junction in Derbyshire, EnglandHigh Peak Junction, near Cromford, Derbyshire, England, is the name now used to describe the site where the former and High Peak Railway (C&HPR), whose workshops were located here, meets the Canal.  It lies within Valley Mills Heritage Site, designated in 2001,(Cromford Canal Conservation Management Plan)  and today marks the southern end of the Peak Trail, a  trail for walkers, cyclists and horse riders.  The Valley Heritage Way also passes this point, and popular walks lead from here along the towpath in both directions.History as part of the High Peak Railwaythumb|250px|right|A diagram of High Peak Junction today.thumb|300px|right|The advertisement placed for the construction of the branch line from the Midland Railway Junction to the canal-side site.right|thumb|200px|A view inside the old workshop, showing the forge.right|thumb|200px|Specimen fish-belly rail laid on stone blocks.thumb|200px|right|Immediately above the bridge is the Sheep Pasture catch-pit built to trap runaway wagons.As first built, the C&HPR - built to standard gauge proportions after initial plans for it to be constructed as a canal route - originally terminated at this location, named in the original Act as beside the Cromford Canal, at or near to Cromford,( where freight was transferred between canal barges and railway wagons. The large wharf-side shed, with awning over the canal, still stands on the west bank of the canal, a small distance from the workshop complex.  From here the double-tracked line ran beside the workshops and up the steep Sheep Pasture incline.  Prior to the construction of this larger transit shed, use was made of another shed the other side of the workshops, which opened onto the river.  This later became a locomotive shed, but has now been demolished, and lies beyond the picnic area.()This first section of the line, from here to Hurdlow, opened on 29 May 1830, opening throughout in 1831.  At this point in time the railway was isolated from any other railway lines, being connected only to canals at either end, namely the Canal in the south, and the Forest Canal at Bridge in the north.  Cromford Canal had previously been finished in 1794 and linked Sir Arkwrights mills to the national waterway system.The workshop complex here was largely built between 1826 and 1830 (making them the second oldest railway workshops in the world (), specifically to serve the new line.(High Peak Junction Workshops Visitor Guide)  There were also limited sidings here. The endless chains for the inclines, for instance, were made here from  inch chain apparently supplied by Pritt & Co of Liverpool.()At the time of the railways opening, apart from on the inclines, horses were the main form of power, and only minerals and goods were carried.  These goods, which included coal, were primarily for local communities along the route.  The carriage of limestone also played a predominant part, for this mineral was required in the manufacture of steel, and was found in abundance in this upland area. Initially static steam engines powered the inclines, but in 1833 the first locomotive was acquired for the line, and as such was one of the countrys earliest railways, coming only 7 years after Stephensons and Darlington railway had opened.()  It was to take 30 years before all horse motive-power was replaced by steam, but whilst there were engines on the line, water wagons had to be carried up the inclines from the wharf, for use by the stationary engines, and later by the locomotives, and for supply at isolated properties.  There were over 20 rail tanks in total, many converted LNWR tenders, despatched from the wharf at a rate of about 100 a month and left in sidings along the route.(  Water was sparse up the line, but here at the wharf a hillside spring fed a tank which was located at Sheep Pasture bottom, across the line from the workshops.  Apart from repairing wagons and locomotives, the company stock list records that in 1859 two locomotives were built at the workshops, but in reality they were more likely assembled here, for from 1840 parts were being bought from the Union Foundry in Derby.(However, the railway was initially only a link in the canal network, and isolated from other railway lines.  It terminated here at its southern end, and it was not until two decades later that physical connection was made with any main line, eliminating its dependence for trade on the canal.  This connection was with the Buxton, Matlock and Midlands Junction Railway at a point between Cromford and Whatstandwell stations (now on the Valley Line). This was strictly the High Peak Junction, this name not being used for this canal-side site until after closure of the line. (See below.)The new main line Midland Railway junction was brought into use on 21 February 1853, increasing the length of the C&HPR by 58 chains (about  mile), and Bradshaws Railway Manual of 1870 describes the whole undertaking as now running from Peak Forest Canal to the Cromford Canal, and to a junction with the Manchester, Buxton, Matlock and Midlands Junction.( However, it took another decade before horse power on the High Peak Railway was entirely replaced by steam.()  Following this connection, and the development of the Midland Line through to Manchester, more and more traffic took this route. Tonnage rates on the canal were lowered to attract trade, but competition was fierce, not helped by the eventual selling of the Cromford Canal to the Railway Company in 1852.( A second collapse of the Butterley tunnel (2966yds) in 1900 - due to mining subsidence - rang the final death knell for the canal as an effective mode of transport. However, coal was still carried on this isolated section from Hartshay to Lea and Cromford until 1944, when the whole canal was officially abandoned.(Beside the Transit Shed a road crossed the Junction extension line at an ungated crossing.  A red iron plate on a post was turned 90 degrees to indicate stop to either the road or the railway.(From 1862 LNWR officials made regular inspections of the railway, and an inspection in June of this year led to an attempt to try and find a larger workshop site than that here at Cromford.  A level site at Ladmanlow, some  along the line, was considered, but a report by Charles Mason the following month suggested only a small maintenance shop there.  Given that 18 men were employed at Cromford, and that many of their children worked in Arkwrights mill, it was left here.A timetable of 1874 showed some 9 departures daily from the Junction, although there was only one through train daily along the whole length of the line, a journey of some 5 hours. Most of the others terminated at Hopton, but clearly all these workings passed through this Cromford wharf site.(High Peak Junction lies at the bottom of the steep Sheep Pasture incline (some 1320 yards in length at a gradient varying between 1:8 and 1:9), and following a runaway in 1888 a catch pit was constructed, the two lines passing either side of it.  In this accident (of which there are a number of varying versions), it would seem that a wagon loaded with lime and a brake van containing gunpowder broke free from a train, hurtling down the incline at speeds of up to 120mph. Failing to take the bend at the bottom, they then ran across the site, jumping across both the canal (damaging the bank) and the double tracks of the Midland Railway before one of the canisters exploded in the adjacent field.  Minutes later the London passenger train passed.(History page on Derby County Council website)(Bygone Derbyshire website) Wreckage seen in the catch pit today dates from a further runaway in the 1950s.(Discovering Derbyshire & the Peak District : High Peak junction)The line prospered, and quarries were serviced at Hopton, Hoptonwood, Middleton Top & Longcliffe.  Traffic was also generated at the Harboro Brick Works, Longliffe and the Derbyshire Firebrick Company at Friden.  Locomotives on the line were primarily sourced from Rowsley shed, but subsheds were also provided at Cromford, Middleton and Sheep Pasture.  These provided both accommodation and routine minor maintenance, and provided for the section of line between High Peak Junction and Friden.(Derbysulzers site)The Act of 1855 provided powers to carry passengers, and this was done - on certain trains - using a brake van with seats.  There was no proper timetable, but passengers could take advantage of the once-daily train which ran in both directions along the whole length of the  line.  Passengers were supposed to alight and walk up the inclines, but many risked the ride.  A fatality in 1877 provided a reason to discontinue what was an unprofitable service.()* Some photos of locomotives operating at High Peak Junction and on the C&HPR can be seen here.() * A photo taken on the last day of operation, Sunday 30 April 1967, can be seen here.()Alternative names for this siteAs has been mentioned, although today the name High Peak Junction refers to the canal-side workshop complex at the foot of Sheep Pasture incline, during the operating life of the High Peak Railway the name High Peak Junction was officially that of the signal box and Junction with the Midland Railway main-line, which lay some  mile away to the south-east.  Consequently the name High Peak Junction sidings referred to that adjacent siding. (See below.)Over the years this workshop site has had various names :On Survey maps of 1880 and 1884 the site is labelled Railwayend, as it was until the Junction line was built in 1852. (To canal users, the swing bridge at this point was known as Railwayend bridge.)  From at least 1900 onwards maps label this site High Peak Junction (or Highpeak Junction).(Old O.S. Maps website)A table dated 1891 detailing Particulars of Gradients for the line records Bottom of Sheep Pasture (ie. this being at the foot of the Sheep Pasture incline).() This name was retained for that section of line beside the workshops and the signal, ie. where the brake wagons currently stand.Jones and Bentley() refer to Cromford Wharf of the C&HPR, whilst Rimmer,( an authority on the railway, refers to the main site as Cromford Wharf, although today this name is used to refer to the original Wharf at the Canal end beside Mill, in Cromford.(Derwent Valley Mills site)(Derbyshire County Council website)  For this reason the name High Peak Wharf is also sometimes used.(Cromford canal history)The small goods yard and limited sidings to the north-west, beyond the workshops and parallel to the canal, were known as Cromford Goods.(()(Midland Lines) The Rule Book and timetables refer simply to Cromford.(The 1900 O.S. Map marks Cromford Goods Wharf beside the transit shed.An issue of Railway Magazine (1934) incorrectly refers to this site as Cromford Sidings (Railway Magazine, 1934), although this name was that used for the main line sidings at railway station.The changing use of the name High Peak Junction still causes confusion today. For instance, in Peak District Walking on the Level (Sigma Press, 2006), whilst correctly stating that the Cromford end of the (High Peak) railway was connected at High Peak Junction to the (Midland) main line, the authors diagram shows a direct link from here, the foot of Sheep Pasture incline, continuing directly over the canal to the adjacent mainline. The difference in height could never have allowed this.The signalbox and main line junctionThere was no Act of Parliament authorizing a branch line to connect the C&HPR to the Midland main line, but its construction and opening (on 21 February 1853) were confirmed in Section 6 of the C&HPR Act of 1855.Construction of this branch line had followed a fair bit of argument as to who should finance it - the C&HPR or the Matlock (later Midland) Railway.  The C&HPR ultimately agreed, on 19 January 1852, to build it at its own expense, but asked the Matlock Company for a siding at the junction, which was provided.  Following an advertisement in the Derby Mercury on 6 October of that year, asking for tenders to construct this line, 58 chains long (see illustration), the contract was let on 16 October, and opened the following year, running along a shelf above and largely parallel to the river Derwent.(A description of 1934 states that two exchange sidings are provided on the down side of the main line and from these the High Peak line turns off through the woods, on a rising gradient of 1 in 200, to Cromford Sidings sic, at the foot of Sheep Pasture incline, which is a mile distant from the junction. The first 500 yards are worked as a siding, after which a staff section extends to the foot of the incline. (  The 1858 Rule book, replaced in 1877 by one issued by the LNWR, refers to Section 1 of the C&HPR (of 9 in total) being High Peak Junction to Cromford, served by a square, black staff.  Here, the name High Peak Junction refers to the actual junction with the main line, Cromford referring to the canal-side site.A timetable of 1891 also uses this terminology, and shows a time of 10 minutes from Cromford to the Junction, with 20 minutes allowed in the uphill direction.  This section was operated as OES, i.e. One Engine in Steam.(At the Junction, looking north, the signal box was located to the right of the Main Line.  At this point there were in fact 5 parallel tracks, comprising - from west to east - the down siding (used by the C&HPR, with room for 35 wagons(Derby Signalling website)), the High Peak Branch (the main C&HPR line, operated by separate staff), the up Main Line, the down Main Line, and the Up Loop.(  The siding here, together with the adjoining High Peak Railway main-line, was used for shunting wagons by the engine in this section, and was known as High Peak Junction sidings.(The length of double track comprising the C&HPR siding (essentially main lain and loop) provided only the most basic of facilities, and operating flexibility was limited. If ever a main line train failed to pick up loaded wagons (a booked operation), or if the High Peak shunter was slow to remove empties, the result was considerable congestion.(The High Peak Junction signal box, designated D22, is described as being located E (Up) side of line 140m S of Lea Wood river bridge, at grid reference 32306 55495.  Distances to neighbouring locations were given as :* Cromford Sidings - 1mi 516yd* Whatstandwell Sidings - 1485yd* Cromford Goods (C&HP) - 1294yd.(The box closed in October 1967, and the foundations and a significant amount of timber still survives, including rear posts and cross beams.  The steel tubed Up Home bracket signal has been cut off at its base, and is still lying where it fell - presumably for intended collection later - although the arms and dolls are missing.(Derby Signalling archaeology) A line of telegraph poles still runs from Cromford Meadows to the Junction, between the River Derwent and the railway line, though the wires have long gone.* A photo of a main line locomotive passing the C&HPR exchange sidings can be seen here (http://www.davidheyscollection.com/userimages/001-erm-high-peak-1.jpg)* A map of 1930 showing both sites - High Peak (main line) Junction and Cromford Goods - can be seen here.() Closure, and the area todayThe High Peak Trailthumb|150px|left|The start of the High Peak Trail - looking back down to High Peak Junction from the A6 tunnel.The High Peak Railway closed fully in 1967, and in 1971 the Peak Park Planning Board and Derbyshire County Council purchased for 1 the trackbed from the High Peak Junction workshops as far as Hay, and it was turned it into the High Peak Trail.  At Parsley Hay it is joined by the Ashbourne branch, now part of the Trail, another long-distance walking/cycle trail, and the route continues northwards to Dowlow near Buxton, a total distance of 17 miles.The section of line from the workshops down to the original junction, although part of the C&HPR, was not purchased - although it remains a right of way - and High Peak Junction, beside the Cromford Canal, is therefore the southern start point of the High Peak Trail, from where it heads immediately uphill, passing through the tunnel and up Sheep Pasture incline towards Black Rocks and Top, from where cycles can be hired.The site todaythumb|300px|right|A schematic diagram of the site today.thumb|150px|right|Nearby is Leawood pump house.Most of the railway buildings remains, namely offices and the old workshops where the early locomotives were built and serviced, and where water tanks were repaired.  Beside the transit shed there is also the engine shed where the yard shunting engine resided. In 1985 the railway workshops and forge were restored and opened to the public, and there is also an information centre, shop and small cafe for visitors.  An audio guide of the site is available. The shop today is located in what was one of the offices, and the oil and lamp store. The room on the end was the drivers mess room.Beyond what is now the picnic site there was once an engine shed (a former transit shed), used to house the locomotive used between here and the mainline junction.  Opposite the old signal post was once a large water tank, used to fill the tenders which were then taken up the incline.In the workshops much remains virtually unchanged since closure, with many items on display in the way of artifacts, and a leaflet to help identify them (although some items of equipment are so rare that the Visitors Guide admits that it has not been possible to identify them all).  It is possible that the cast iron, fish-bellied rails on either side of the inspection pit form the oldest length of railway line in the world still in its original position.(  Other items of particular interest, as indicated in the Visitors Guide, include a drill, chain bays, an old photograph, line tools, the forge and bellows, beam engine parts, a joiners bench, and an oil tank.The former C&HPR agents house can be seen next to the A6 above.Some 1/4 mile from the workshops and other railway buildings stands the canal-side Wharf Shed (the former transit shed), the 10-ton crane, and the weighhouse, the Shed itself being of major historical significance.  Wagons could pass right through to the canopied area beyond.  A sign prohibiting engines from entering the shed - there are timber beams and floors - is still displayed. Now owned by County Council, the Wharf Shed was converted to a residential centre in the early 1970s. It is available for hire to schools, youth and adult community groups, with room for groups of up to 24 people.  Note that Cromford Wharf Shed is here, not at the Canal terminus by Mill, now known as Cromford Wharf.A  long section of the Cromford canal between Cromford and Ambergate is listed as a Biological of Special Scientific Interest (SSSI),()  and also forms part of the Valley Heritage Way.Another adjacent attraction is Pump House, built to pump water from the river Derwent in order to maintain the water level in the Cromford canal.  Originally conceived in 1844 following a very dry summer, the Pumphouse became operational in 1849.(Leawood Pumphouse website)The whole site at High Peak Junction is easily accessed from the large public car-park at Lea Bridge, in Lea Road, from where a footbridge crosses the river Derwent, the railway, and the canal.From High Peak Junction walkers can follow the level canal tow-path in both directions, or take the High Peak Trail up the incline.GalleryImage:Cromford Canal Wharf.jpg|The canal-side Wharf Shed at High Peak Junction, a little distance from the workshops. The awning overhangs the canal.File:Old transit shed at High Peak Junction.jpg|Another good view of the transit shed.Image:Chpr workshop.jpg|The workshops and offices at High Peak Junction today.Image:High peak junction water tank.jpg|The watertank was used to fill special wagons, for transport up the line.Image:High Peak Junction wharf shed sign.jpg|This sign shows the main line branch from the Junction proper running along the wharf, and passing to the right of the Wharf Shed.File:High Peak Junction - geograph.org.uk - 17305.jpg|The visitor area today.Image:High Peak Junction-by-trevor-willis.jpg|Two brake vans on display at Sheep Pasture bottom.  Beyond the bridge in the distance the incline leads up the hill towards Black Rocks and Middleton.File:High Peak Junction workshops.jpg|The centre as viewed from across the canal.File:Swing bridge at High Peak Junction.jpg|Railway End swingbridge across the Cromford Canal at High Peak Junction.File:Top of Sheep Pasture Incline.jpg|The top of Sheep Pasture incline, which leads up from High Peak Junction.File:High Peak Trail - geograph.org.uk - 139411.jpg|A cutting on the High Peak Trail. References  External links * High Peak Junction Workshops website* Derwent Valley Heritage Way website* High Peak Trail site* Photos of the Cromford & High Peak Railway, taken in the 1960s* YouTube - The Transit Shed now and then* Friends of Cromford Canal - A comprehensive site* A video of Leawood pumphouse
22390100
Kenya_Fluorspar_Company
Kenya Fluorspar Company (KFC) (formerly Fluorspar Company of Kenya) is a privately-held mining company in Kenya.  It is located near Eldoret in Valley Province of western Kenya, in the Valley, known for its significant fluorite deposits, first discovered in 1967. Fluorspar is the second most important mining commodity in Kenya after ash (The East African, September 15, 2008: Flourspar enters European market despite Chinese competition).  From fluorspar the company produces fluorites, which are a key component in the manufacture of some industrial commodities, including steel, acid and opalescent glass.(Mineralzone, Fluorite) Operations The company began producing fluorites in the early 1970s and its Kimwarer mine has been in operation since. In 1996, businessman Charles Field-Marsham acquired Kenya Fluourspar as part of a government reform effort of corporate privatization (.  The company produces about 100,000 tonnes of fluorspar annually and is the only major industry in District (The East African, September 15, 2008: Flourspar enters European market despite Chinese competition (page 2))(Kerio Valley Development Authority: Mineral Resources Exploration ). Kimwarer is the largest settlement in the Kerio Valley area and is effectively a company town due the mining activities (t Richard Trillo, Okigbo Ojukwu, Daniel Jacobs, Doug Paterson: Rough Guide to Kenya, Rough Guides,  7th ed, 2002. ISBN 1858288592)(Michael Hodd: East Africa handbook, Footprint Travel Guides, 7th ed, 2002).In 2005, production was valued at $14 million (KENYA CHAMBER OF MINES NEWS LETTER). most of its production is exported (Kenya Chamber of Mines: THE MINERAL INDUSTRY I Flourspar). Much of its product is exported to India and Europe.(USGS 2008 Fluorspar Survey) KFCs mining operations were halted in 2009 due to economic downturn, but are set to continue in June 2010 (The Standard, February 1, 2010: Kenya flourspar company resumes mining operations).KFCs main business offices are located in Nairobi. Community work and sponsorship It is a leading employer in the area with 400 workers and its corporate social responsibilities program provides health, education and other facilities to its employees and the local community (.The company sponsors an annual 10 Kilometres running competition in Kerio Valley (IAAF, September 21, 2008: Kibet and Kibarus overcome hot and humid conditions to win over 10km in Eldoret) and the Fluorspar FC playing in Nationwide League(Kenya Fluorpar Company, June 27, 2008: Fluorspar sponsored football team)(Kenyafootball, November 13, 2008: Nationwide Updates: AFC Leopards tops Zone A). Controversy People have been displaced from the area to make way for mining, but the evicted people claim they have not been compensated appropriately, although it is denied by the company and the government (The Standard, March 17, 2009: State insists it compensated residents). The company has also been accused of environmental damage (Kenya News Agency, December 5, 2005: Kenya: Kerio families plea over pollution).See also* Uses of Fluorites* MiningReferencesExternal links* Kenya Fluourspar Company official site* Reuters story, Firebird Fund investment news, Jan 13 2009* United States Geological Survey, Fluourspar in the Third Quarter 2008* Nyambok & Gaciri: Geology of the fluorite deposits in Kerio Valley, Kenya (abstract). Economic Geology; April 1975; v. 70; no. 2; p. 299-307.
22402054
Mitrais
Mitrais is a Bali-headquartered technology company which provides outsourced information systems and services. These are provided to organizations in Australia and elsewhere requiring the development of commercial software applications, to public and private hospitals and clinics in Asia, Africa and the Middle East and to the mining industry in Indonesia.{| classinfobox stylewidth: 20em; text-align: left; font-size: 95%;|+ stylefont-size: larger; | Mitrais|-! Type:| development and Implementation|- ! Founded:| 2000|- ! Headquarters:| Bali, Indonesia|- ! Key People:| David Magson M.B.E., Mike Page, Wiwie Harris, Ken McClellan, Djati Siahaan, Totok Sudarmanto|- ! Industry:| Software Development|- ! Products:| Mitrais Medical System, Mining Solutions, Software Development|- ! Employees:| 300|- ! Website:| www.mitrais.com|-| colspan2 stylefont-size: smaller; | {}|}Development HistoryMitrais was established in 2000 drawing on the background and skills of its founders who had been involved in the Indonesian mining industry. The company capitalizes on the pool of very talented IT professionals emerging from Indonesian universities, several of which are recognized for their specialization in IT&T.The corporate objective was to build a software development business which would, initially, concentrate on asset-intensive industries. A buoyant Australian economy and shortage of IT skills favoured the launch of such a business in Bali, a holiday destination which is close to Australia.In 2004 Mitrais entered the health industry, developing a proprietary hospital management information system which it sells globally. In 2007 it absorbed Mincom Indoservices to extend its operations into the sale and support of mining software, in particular from leading supplier Mincom, in Indonesia.Today Mitrais is a Microsoft Gold Certified developer, an Oracle Partner and has also certified products in SAP NetWeaver. Social ResponsibilityFounded on a strong corporate responsibility platform Mitrais is active in a number of social and community initiatives in Bali. This importance of this platform and the role subsequently played by Mitrais executives and staff was put into sharp focus by the Bali bombings in 2002 and 2005 when death, injury and social upheaval affected many of the Balinese population. The bombings brought about the establishment of YKIP (Yayasan Kemanusiaan Ibu Pertiwi) or the Humanitarian Foundation for Mother Earth which is dedicated to helping the needy in Bali through health and education programs. Mitrais has supported YKIP from its inception from managing the medical donations which arrived in Bali immediately after the bombing to providing pro-bono office space, accounting, IT, internet and other volunteer services. Senior Mitrais employees form the YKIP management board, cementing an already close bond between the two organisations.External links* http://www.mitrais.com Mitrais Home Page* http://www.ykip.org YKIP Home Page* https://solutionfinder.microsoft.com/default.aspx MS Gold Partner Site
22415280
Rose_(novel)
File:RoseNovel.jpg|thumb|right|1st edition (published by House)Rose is a novel published in 1996 by the  Cruz Smith.  The story is set in 19th century Wigan, Lancashire, England, a district with extensive mines. SynopsisJonathan Blair, a mining engineer, returns from Africas Gold Coast and, on finding his native England utterly depressing, falls into melancholy and alcoholism. Blair wishes desperately to return to Africa, so, in exchange, he agrees to investigate the disappearance of a local curate engaged to marry the daughter of Blairs patron. With the unexpected assistance of Rose, a Wigan pit brow girl, Blair solves the mystery and, in the process, finds himself as well.TranslationsThe book has been translated into*Spanish(http://www.worldcat.org/oclc/41286206?refererbr&htedition)*Dutch (http://www.worldcat.org/oclc/68783735&refererbrief_results)*Portughese(http://www.worldcat.org/oclc/40343904&refererbrief_results)*French(http://www.worldcat.org/oclc/67313046&refererbrief_results)*German(http://www.worldcat.org/oclc/222686376&refererbrief_results)*Greek(http://www.worldcat.org/oclc/222098442&refererbrief_results)*Polish (http://www.worldcat.org/oclc/55872724&refererbrief_results)*Russian (http://www.worldcat.org/oclc/42543755&refererbrief_results)*Hebrew (http://www.worldcat.org/oclc/79753310?refererbr&htedition)Reviews*Rose, a richly textured Victorian thriller from Martin Cruz Smith by Martin Cruz Smith in Time. 147, no. 23, (1996): 73,*Review by E. Weber, NEW YORK TIMES BOOK REVIEW, 101, no. 24, (1996): 50*Review by David Horspool in TLS, the Times literary supplement. no. 4861, (1996): 22ReferencesExternal links* Working in a coal mine - The bestselling author of Gorky Park finds literary gold in a notorious English mining town interview from Salon.com 
22428307
The_Better_Ole
The Better Ole, also called The Romance of Old Bill, is an musical comedy with a book by Bairnsfather and Elliott, music by Darewski, and lyrics by Percival Knight and James Heard, based on the cartoon character Old Bill, an infantryman, drawn by Bairnsfather.  In the musical, Old Bill intercepts a spys plan to destroy a bridge, trapping a French regiment after they cross it.  Bill saves them by blowing up the bridge before they pass; his actions are misunderstood, however, and he is arrested for disobeying orders and holding an enemy document.  After Victoire explains the situation, Bill is released and given a medal.The original London production in 1917 was a hit, running for over 800 performances, starring Bourchier as Old Bill.  The piece also had success on tour and on Broadway the following year and spawned two film adaptations and a sequel. Productions ;London and original tourOn 4 August 1917, The Better Ole opened in London at the Music Hall, where it ran for 811 performances, starring Bourchier as Old Bill.(Bourchier, Arthur. Who Was Who, A & C Black, 19202007, online edn, Oxford University Press, December 2007, accessed 28 October 2008.)(The Better Ole. Broadwayworld.com, accessed 12 September 2010.)  It was produced by B. Cochran.(B. Cochrans production of The Better Ole Or The Romance of Old Bill. The Play Pictorial, 32:191, January 1918, p. 18)  After the success of the London production was apparent, a provincial touring company was formed, led by Martin Adeson as Old Bill.( ;BroadwayIt later also ran successfully on Broadway, where Coburn starred as Old Bill opposite his wife, who played Victoire; the couple are also credited as the producers of the Broadway production.(Bairnsfather Play Down in Greenwich. The New York Times, 21 October 1918, accessed 27 October 2010.) The production first played downtown at the Greenwich Village Theatre, then moved to Broadway at the Theatre and later the Theatre.(The Broadway League. The Better Ole. IBDB: The Official Source for Broadway Information, accessed 11 January 2011.)( Choreographed by Lily Leonora, the show played from 19 October 1918 to 4 October 1919, lasting 353 performances.((;Subsequent productionsBy 1919, five productions of the smashing success were running in North America (including the New York premiere). These productions starred Wolf Hopper, Arbuckle, Gurney and K. Hackett as Old Bill in Chicago, Philadelphia, Boston and Canada, respectively.(The Stage. Munseys Magazine, Volume 66, p. 761, The Frank A. Munsey company (1919), accessed 23 June 2011)PlotTimes commented that there was not much plot, and what there was did not matter much.( Play Pictorial gave the following plot summary:There is  but one dramatic episode in the piece.  It is the acquisition of the Spys letter containing the information as to the mining of the bridge over which the French are going to attack, when with the aid of Victoire Bill realises its purport, he determines to frustrate the enemys intention by blowing up the bridge in advance. His mission fulfilled, he finds himself under arrest for disobedience to orders; he is further compromised by the possession of an incriminating enemy document; death by a firing party at dawn appears to be his imminent fate. But a kindlier fate has interposed in the person of Victoire. She has gone to the French Headquarters with the story of his gallantry, and an officer of the French Staff arrives, bearing with him the glorious Cross of Honour.( Musical numbers The following numbers were used in the New York production:(*Tommy  Suzette from France and Tommies*That Trip Across the Rhine  Captain of the Womens Workers Camp and Women War Workers*Carrying On  Bert, Alf and Old Bill*We Wish We Was in Blighty  Bert, Alf and Old Bill*When You Look in the Heart of a Rose  Company 	*de Milo  Old Bill*Je Sais Que Vous Etes Gentil (I Know You Are Nice)  Berthe and Bert*Regiment of Our Own  Bert and French Girls*Regiment of Our Own (reprise)  Bert and Mollie from IrelandRoles and original casts(The list below shows first the London, then the New York casts:*Old Bill  Bourchier; Charles D. Coburn*Victoire  Edme Dormeuil  (later, Peggy Foster); Mrs. Charles D. Coburn*Bert  Tom Wootwell; Charles McNaughton*Alf  Sinclair Cottee; Colin Campbell*Spy  M. Crommelynck; Lark Taylor*Angele  Chris Birss; Gwen Louis*Suzette  Glory Edgar; Mona Desmond*W.A.A.C.  Hilda Denton; Lillian Spenser*Berthe  Carrie Rose; Helen TildenCritical receptionIn The Play Pictorial, B. W. Findon wrote, Old Bill stands out with the vividness of a Shakespearean creation, as forcible as Falstaff, as quaint as Dogberry. It is for this reason that he has caught the imagination of the public, that he attracts myriads to the Oxford and fills them with the glory of their race.   A great entertainment, in brief; a revue of the war most admirable. It will be a prodigious success in America and the far lands.  We have had nothing like it, I repeat, and assuredly there is here  that which will make the whole civilised world akin.( The Times commented, The Bairnsfather jokes are as amusing on the stage as they are when printed.(The Better Ole:  A Bairnsfather Play at The Oxford, The Times, 6 August 1917, p. 9) Observer said of Bourchiers depiction of Old Bill, If others have been more sardonic and incisive, he is more good-natured and appealing. The paper thought the piece unduly spun out, perhaps, because there is a limit to the humorous side of war.(Dramatis Personae, The Observer, 12 August 1917, p. 5) Of the New York production, New York Times wrote that it sweeps an audience off its feet by the sheer force of sincerity. Sooner or later everyone will see it and those will be fortunate to do so while it retains the bloom of its first inspiration.(Adaptations and sequelTwo film adaptations of the musical were made during the silent film era.  The first, a 1919 British version, starred Charles Rock.()  The second version was a 1926 Bros. production.() This film &ndash; the second feature to use the Vitaphone sound process &ndash; starred Chaplin as Old Bill.(The success of the piece led to a West End  sequel, Old Bill, M.P., which opened at the Lyceum Theatre on 12 July 1922. Old Bill was played by Gwenn, and Bairnsfather appeared as himself.  Unlike The Better Ole, the later piece was not a musical.(Old Bill, M.P., The Times, 13 July 1922, p. 12) It ran until 11 November 1922.(Varieties &c, The Times, 11 November 1922, p. 8) References  External links *The Better Ole at the Broadway Database
22448655
Stratobowl
The Stratobowl is a compact natural depression within the limits of Black Hills National Forest in Dakota, south-west of Rapid City. In 19341935 it housed a stratospheric balloon launch site, initially known as Stratocamp, sponsored by the Geographic Society and the States Army Air Corps. In 19561959 the site was reused by the States Navy Stratolab project.Explorer balloonsFile:Explorer II Gondola.jpg|thumb|Explorer II gondola in the Air and Space MuseumIn 1934 the NGS and Air Corps co-sponsored the Explorer, a manned balloon capable of stratospheric flight. After the crash of the Soviet Osoaviakhim-1 that nevertheless set an altitude record of , the sponsors redefined their primary objectives from record-setting to scientific research and tests of new navigation instruments.( Air Corps Capt. William Stevens, Capt. Arson Anderson and Maj. E. Kepner were selected to fly the Explorer.(Ryan, p. 52) Kepner and Anderson, experienced balloonists, were in charge of locating a suitable launch site. According to Kepner, an ideal site would be a crater or canyon, a clear grassy valley encircled with rocky ridges high enough to shield the tall balloon from any wind.(For the same reasons, the U.S. Navys later Stratolab project used old mining pits near Minnesota  Ryan, p. 229) Ideally, the launch site it would have a high-voltage electric line, road and rail access, and a trout stream.( Kepner and Anderson eventually located their dream canyon near City, South Dakota. City officials, fascinated by the expected publicity campaign, agreed to build a road and electric line.(Ryan, p. 53)Anderson directed construction of a temporary village, housing over a hundred personnel, with the help of the Dakota National Guard and the armys 4th Cavalry Regiment.( The central pad, 200 feet in diameter, was cushioned with sawdust to protect the fabric of the balloon as it was spread on the ground prior to inflation. Preparation for flight was regularly reported by the national press. Explorer lifted off at 6:45, July 28, 1934, an event broadcast live over the radio and watched by 30,000 spectators on site.( After 7 hours in flight( the pilots noticed holes torn in the bottom of the gas bag; quickly losing gas, the balloon plunged into an uncontrolled dive, its gas bag disintegrating as the balloon picked up vertical speed.(Ryan, p. 54) At 5 thousand feet the remaining hydrogen exploded, sending the gondola in a free fall. According to Ryan, the pilots managed to bail out after the explosion, Kepner at a bare 500 feet altitude;( according to Shayler, they bailed out before the explosion; all three survived uninjured.( Later it turned out that the Explorer missed a world record by 624 feet.(Ryan, p. 55) The accident was linked to folds in the balloons fabric that put it under extreme stress as the balloon expanded in stratosphere.(Shayler, p. 22)The NGS and Air Corps vowed to launch a new balloon in June 1935,( but the new helium-filled Explorer II was not ready until November.(Ryan, p. 58) Watched by 20,000 spectators,( Explorer II lifted off at 8:00 November 11 and reached a new record height of .(Shayler, p. 20) Anderson, Kepner, and Stevens became the first men to view the Earths curvature.(Ryan, pp. 5859)Strato-Lab balloonsIn the 1950s, Manhigh(Ryan. pp.99100) and Strato-Lab launches were made from the man-made crater of an iron mining pit near Minnesota, and, if weather allowed, from Fleming Field in St. Paul, Minnesota.(Ryan, p. 79) The Stratobowl was a backup location. There was one Stratobowl launch in 1956, three in 1958, and seven in 1959. On November 8, 1956, the Strato-Lab I gondola lifted Malcolm Ross and M. L. Lewis from the Stratobowl to a world altitude record for manned balloon flight of . The purpose of the flight was to gather meteorological, cosmic ray, and other scientific data necessary to improve safety at high altitudes.(Ross and Lewis, 1957) The most publicized flight, Strato-Lab IV piloted by Malcolm Ross and  B. Moore, lifted off from Stratobowl on November 28, 1959, reached an altitude of , and landed safely in Kansas after 20 hours in the air. The purpose of the flight was to perform spectrographic analysis of the planet Venus with minimal interference from the Earths atmosphere.(Ryan, p. 233)Notes and referencesSee also* Wasserkuppe, a similar bowl-shaped natural landform in Germany, associated with historic aviation activitySources* * * * External links*History of the Stratobowl and list of balloons launched there since the 50s StratoCat - Historical recopilation project on the use of stratospheric balloons in the scientific research, the military field and the aerospace activity
22466496
Romblon_Provincial_Federation_of_the_Sangguniang_Kabataan
The Romblon Provincial Federation of Kabataan (PFSK) is composed of eighteen (18) members; seventeen (17) Municipal Kabataan Federation President and one (1) Provincial SK Federation President. It is their thrust to conduct and implement programs that would improve the youth of Romblon socially, intellectually, spiritually, politically, and morally to be dynamic, productive, and effective citizens and future leaders of the province of Romblon and the republic as a whole.Officers and MembersAll Municipal SK Federation Presidents of the seventeen (17) municipalities of Romblon gathered together on December 17, 2007 at the of Interior and Local Government Provincial Office at Odiongan, Romblon to elect their Local Executive Council.  The then Municipal SK Federation President of the municipality of San Jose, Hon. Philip Tandog, ran and won unopposed as Provincial SK Federation President and became the ex-officio member of the Sangguniang Panlalawigan of Romblon(http://www.romblonprov.gov.ph/Officials.html#boardmembers).  Pursuant to the SK Constitution and By-laws(http://www.youth.net.ph/download/SK%20Constitution%20and%20By-Laws.pdf), Hon. Angeneth Zacarias, the then Municipal SK Federation Vice President of San Jose, eventually replaced Hon. Mark Philip Tandog as President of the Municipal SK Federation.Hon. Mark Philip P. TandogJose, RomblonPresident(http://romblon.homestead.com/localgov.html)Hon. Greatchen TomboconRomblonVice PresidentHon. Anjanette PerezRomblonSecretaryHon. Catherine LilangRomblonDeputy SecretaryHon. Alexis Marie MontonRomblonTreasurerHon. Allen Dominique MacuhaAndres, RomblonAuditorHon. Ivy DalisayMaria, RomblonP.R.O.Hon. Frank Anthony RegalaRomblonSergeant at ArmsHon. Shalyn FalcutilaRomblonMemberHon. Kenn Stephen FallarmeRomblonMemberHon. John Bryan FerrancoRomblonMemberHon. Claire Ann FetalveroRomblonMemberHon. Gian Mark GonzalesFe, RomblonMemberHon. Maria Bella PradoRomblonMemberHon. Raisa RafolFernando, RomblonMemberHon. Charlie RomanosRomblonMemberHon. Joelyn Sixon (resigned)Hon. Kerwin Rey MayorAgustin, RomblonMemberHon. Angeneth ZacariasJose, RomblonMemberProjects, Programs and Activities2008 Sangguniang Kabataan Lakbay AralOn June 48, 2008, the Romblon Provincial SK Federation visited the Provinces of Batangas and Cavite.  The Romblon Provincial SK Fed had a courtesy call with Hon. Miguel Ilano, the Provincial SK President of Cavite, and had the chance to meet their counterparts and to observe SK projects of the province that are applicable to Romblon.  This 2008 Lakbay Aral gave new ideas to Romblons SK Leaders in terms of Youth Development and Empowerment.2008 Linggo ng Kabataan (LNK)Article 209 of the SK Constitution and By- Laws mandated that the Pederasyon ng Sangguniang Kabataan shall conduct the celebration of the Linggo ng Kabataan(http://www.pasay.gov.ph/sk%20code/RULE%20XXVIII.html).On December 1521, 2008, the Romblon PFSKs celebration of the 2008 Linggo ng Kabataan was to date the first ever celebration of the linggo ng kabataan in the SK history of the province of Romblon.  The celebration was participated by the Municipal SK Federation Presidents and their respective Vice Presidents.  SK leaders of the province assumed as Provincial Officials, elected and appointed, for one week.2008 LNK DesignationsHon. Mark Philip Tandog - GovernorHon. Greatchen Tombocon - Vice GovernorHon. Alexis Marie Monton - Provincial AdministratorHon. Allen Dominique Macuha - Provincial TreasurerHon. Frank Anthony Regala - Provincial AccountantHon. Angeneth Zacarias - Provincial Budget OfficerHon. Charlie Romanos - Provincial EngineerHon. Shalyn Falcutila - Provincial Social Welfare and Development OfficerHon. Anjanette Perez - Provincial General Services OfficerHon. Catherine Lilang - Provincial Planning and Development OfficerHon. Joelyn Sixon - Provincial NutritionistHon. Kenn Stephen Fallarme - Provincial AssessorHon. Gian Mark Gonzales - Provincial Health OfficerHon. Nery Glen Tugnao - Provincial Mining Regulatory Board OfficerRomblon Youth Development CouncilThe Provincial Board of Romblon on its session last July 7, 2009 recently passed an Ordinance Creating the Romblon Youth Development Council.  The ordinance covers the youth ranging from 15 to 30 years old and was based from R.A. 8044.Under the provincial ordinance the council is tasked to formulate policies and component programs in coordination with the various government agencies having youth related programs, projects and activitiesLast summer, the Committee on Youth and Sports Development chaired by Board Member Philip Tandog with members Board Member Dorado, Board Member Ylagan, conducted a hearing and dialogue with the Municipal SK presidents from different municipalities held at Municipality of San Jose in connection with the ordinance on Romblon Youth Development Council, the inputs and observations of youth participants from the meeting were also integrated in the final draft of the ordinance.After some amendment, and further consultations with various youth groups by authors BM Ylagan and BM Philip Tandog the ordinance was finally approved on final reading last July 21, 2009.At present the provincial government of Romblon is already actively supporting programs for the youth many of which are from its sports development program.  Under the leadership of the young Governor Beltran many youth activities have already been sponsored and supported by the provincial government.With the passage of the provincial ordinance it is believed that a more comprehensive and integrated approach to all youth programs and activities will be included in the annual development program of the province.Provincial Sangguniang Kabataan Congress2009 Provincial SK CongressTheme: SK 101: LEAD (Leadership, Excellence, Awareness, Dynamism)Date: May 1922, 2009Venue: Romblon State College, Odiongan, RomblonAs part of the Romblon Provincial SK Feds service and commitment, and pursuant to the 2001 Katipunan ng Kabataan and Sangguniang Kabataan Constitution and By-laws under Article XII: Meetings and Quorum, Section 7 stating that: An SK Provincial Congress shall be called every year for the purpose of a comprehensive consultation of the SK issues and concerns.  For this purpose the Congress shall be composed of all constituent Panlungsod and Pambayang Pederasyon presidents and the constituent SK chairmen.(, the Romblon PFSK, in cooperation with the Youth Commission (NYC), the Drug Enforcement Agency - MIMAROPA, the Provincial Government of Romblon, and the of Interior and Local Government (DILG) - Romblon, conducted the 2009 Provincial SK Congress on May 1922, 2009 at the State College - Main Campus, Odiongan, Romblon.2010 Provincial SK CongressTheme: Sulong Kabataan! Lakas ng Pwersa, Ipakita.Date: April 69, 2010Venue: Great Eastern Hotel, Quezon City.2009 Romblon PFSK Mangrove Planting ActivityAs support to the National SK Federations green program which was launched last April 1, 2009, the Sama-sama para sa Kalikasan(http://www.boholchronicle.com/2009/apr/1/front1.htm), and as conclusion to the 2009 Provincial SK Congress, the Romblon Provincial Federation, in cooperation with Odiongans Municipal Environment and Natural Resources Officer and barangay Canduyong officials, launched its first provincial environmental program, the 2009 Romblon PFSK Mangrove Planting Activity on May 22, 2009 at barangay Canduyong, Romblon.The mangrove planting activity was participated by more or less seven hundred (700) SK officials from around the province and was to date the largest mangrove planting activity spearheaded by the youth in the history of the province of Romblon.Ten Accomplished and Active Sangguniang Kabataan (TAAS Kabataan) AwardsWith the objective of recognizing the efforts of the SK youth leaders in the province, the Romblon Provincial SK Fed will launch the Ten Accomplished and Active Sangguniang Kabataan (TAAS Kabataan) Awards. Sangguniang Kabataan of each barangay are entitled to join by submitting their accomplishment report from November 2007 up to March 2010. The respective barangays of the Provincial SK Federation President and the 17 Municipal SK Federation Presidents are not allowed to join. The Ten Accomplished and Active Sangguniang Kabataan (TAAS Kabataan) awardees shall be recognized and awarded on April 7, 2010 in line with the celebration of the 2010 Provincial SK Congress.See also*Romblon*KabataanReferences(External links*National Youth Commission - Philippines*Province of Romblon Official Website*Romblon Travel Guide*Friendster Romblon PFSK 2007-present
22474530
Henrich_Krummedige
Henrich Krummedige (also recorded as Hinrik, Henrik or Henry with surname variations including  Krummedike and Krummendiek), was born circa 1464 in Norway and died in 1530. He was a Danish-Norwegian nobleman and a member of both the Norwegian and Danish National Councils (Rigsrd) and played an extensive role in the politics of the era. He served as commanding officer of the Fortress in Norway from 1489 to 1503.()()Family and youth Krummedige was Krummediges son by a second marriage. He is believed to have been born in Norway.( In about 1493 he married Anne Jrgensdatter Rud, daughter of Danish National Councilor Jrgen Mikkelsen Rud of Vedby and Kirstine Eriksdatter Rosenkrantz.( Careerthumb|left|Krummedige took command of Bhus fortress in 1489In 1484 or 85 he was knighted and entered service in 1487 at Fortress. In 1489 he was placed in charge of the strategically important Norwegian border defense, Fortress.  At the same time he was elevated to serve as a member of the Norwegian National Council (Rigsraad).(The Krummedige-Tre Rosor rivalryThe origin of the rivalryUpon the 1448 death of King of Bavaria, who was union king of Denmark (14401448), Sweden (14411448) and Norway (14421448), the Norwegian succession resulted in controversy. In Norway the new king had to be elected by the National Council. There were effectively two parties in the Norwegian National Council: The pro-Danish party led by Hartvig Krummedige (then the commandant at Akershus) and Bishop Jens of Oslo, and the pro-Swedish party led by the Archbishop Bolt and Saemundsson (then the commandant at Fortress). The pro-Danish party prevailed and I of Denmark was elected king, although not without subsequent strife. Karl Knutsson invaded from Sweden and proceeded to Hamar, where he called a thing, and was elected king by Archbishop Bolt, Erik Saemundsson and others who assembled there. King Karl proceeded to Trndelag. He then returned to Sweden, leaving Saemundsson as viceroy. Saemundsson invested Akershus, which was held by Krummedige, who still adhered to Christian I. Ultimately Saemundsson was killed by Krummedige, the leading pro-Swedish advocates fled to Sweden, and Karl Knutsson renounced his claim to the throne.() Swedish forces again invaded Trndelag in 1453, but were repelled and were forced to turn south across the Dovrefjell  and to Hamar, where they captured and occupied the Bishops palace. Hartvig Krummedige proceeded north, expelled the Swedish forces, and killed many of them. With this act, as well as his previous involvement in the death of  Saemundsson, he earned the enmity of pro-Swedish Knutsson; Saemundsson and Knutsson were members of the Tre Rosor family, which title comes from their coat of arms, which includes three roses.  Alv Knutsson had extensive holdings, over 276 farms in east and south Norway, and could bring substantial pressure to bear. He arranged that charges be brought against Hartvig Krummedige by one of the local farmers  as a result Hartvig Krummedige lost all of his fiefs. Knutsson also worked through the Pope to obtain a Papal Bull concerning Krummediges misuse of power. In spite of this dramatic setback, Christian I of Denmark restored Krummedige to Akershus by 1861. Hartvig Krummedige died in 1476, but his son Henrich remained a firm member of the pro-Danish party &mdash; the rivalry with the Tre Rosor family virtually guaranteed this would be so.(The rivalry in Knut Alvsonns timeWhen Henrich was elevated to similar positions in Norway as his Father had held, he also inherited the family conflict with the Tre Rosor family.(Pro-Swedish Alv Knutssons son, Alvsonn, of the family Tre Rosor was Lord of Giske, and Jonssons ultimate heir. Sigurd, the son of the Swedish nobleman Jon Marteinsson, was a Norwegian nobleman and knight, and the supreme leader of Norway during two interregnums in the mid-15th century. After the death of King Christopher in 1448 Sigurd Jonsson was offered the vacant throne of Norway, but declined to pursue a claim. Alv was a Royal Councilor of Norway, and holder of vast landed properties around Norway, having inherited land as well as a claim to the throne of Norway from his Giske-Bjarkoy-Sudreim ancestors. Knut Alvson was personal enemy of Lord Henrich Krummedige and a member of the pro-Swedish faction on the Norwegian National Council. Knut took over Akershus in 1497.()Knut Alvsonn soon came into conflict with Norwegian peasants who killed his bailiffs and otherwise resisted him, until he petitioned Henrik Krummedige for support, since Krummedige had demonstrated his ability to work constructively with the local land owners. Kummerdige not only failed to support, but informed the King of the matter. Knut Alvsonn was relieved of his command of Akershus Fortress by Griis, a Danish nobleman loyal to the king.(()    In 1500 King Hans of Denmark, Sweden and Norway made an ill-fated attempt to conquer the Ditmarshes (Dithmarschen) in Northern Germany. Knut Alvsson, who had married the granddaughter of Karl Knutsson, and was involved with the Swedish Independence Party, concluded it was time to act. His rebellion began in 1501 in Sweden, but soon came to Fortress on the Swedish-Norwegian border, which Henrich Krummedige commanded. Krummedige held his fief at Bhus, but Alvsson captured Akershus Fortress in March of 1502, although the citizens of Oslo remained pro-Danish while the nobles and bishops of the country remained neutral&mdash;presumably waiting to see which side prevailed.((   King Hans dispatched his son Christian (later crowned King II of Denmark) at the head of forces; they relieved the siege of Bhus Fortress, captured and reduced Fortress across the river from Bhus Fortress in Gothenburg. Krummedige then led forces north to finish off the rebellion by recapturing Fortress and invested Akershus Fortress, which Alvsson was defending.(  When it became clear that the rebellion had failed, Alvsson came on board one of Krummediges ships under a safe conduct. Krummedige killed Alvsson either by treachery or, as alleged by Krummedige, in response to Alvssons own violence. Alvsson was judged a traitor and Alvssons property was forfeit to the crown. Krummedige had prevailed, although Gjerset reports he was compelled to leave Norway and the uprising was not totally quelled until 1504 .((The death of Alvsson was used to set an anti-Danish tone in Ibsens  play Fru Inger til steraad, when he has Olaf Skaktavl acclaim: Recall the afternoon when Hendrik Krummedike came before Akershus fortress with his fleet? The captains of the fleet offered to discuss peace terms; and, trusting a safe conduct, Knut Alfsn went onboard. Only three hours later we had to carry him through the fortress gate ... Norways bravest heart was lost when Krummedikes minions struck him down... (. The original text which is translated above is provided here in Norwegian:Mindes I hin eftermiddag, da HendrikKrummedike kom med danske flden for Akershus?Skibsherrerne bd mindeligt forlig; og tryg ved lejdebrevetlod Knut Alfsn sig ro ombord. Tre timer efter barvi ham ind gennem slotsporten ...Norges bedste hjerte brast, da Krummedikeslejesvende fldte ham.)The rivalry in Karl Knutsons timeKnut Alvsson had two sons, Knut and Erik. Karl Knutsson, the son of Knut Alvsson, continued the multigenerational interfamily quarrel. Karl found favor with Christian II and used the opportunity to slander Krummeridge. On the basis of minor irregularities Christian II removed Krummedige of the command of Varberg Fortress as well as of all his Norwegian fiefdoms. As a result of this Krummeridge transferred his support to Frederick I and worked for his election as the king of Norway.()The conflict with Vincens Lungethumb|right|Nakskov, site of the Lbeck attackDanish-born nobleman Lunge married the daughter of Chancellor and Lord High Steward of Norway Henriksson (Gyldenlve) (~14581523) and his wife, the famous Ingerd Ottesdatter. He was one of several notable Danes who acquired land, resided permanently in Norway, became nominally thoroughly Norwegian and founded new Norwegian noble families, which replaced the old nobility of the first rank.()  Henrich Krummedige and Vincens Lunge appeared to have much in common: both were Danish-born nobles, both supported the Lutheran Reformation, both supported I of Denmark, both were members of the Norwegian National Council and both held extensive estates and other properties in Norway. They held another thing in common: ambition.  At the 1524 meeting of the Norwegian National Council &mdash; the first meeting which Vincens Lunge attended and one at which Henrich Krummedige was not present &mdash; Catholic of Nidaros Engelbrektsson and Vincens Lunge cooperated to force the newly elected Frederick I to accept a charter with terms designed to maintain Norways independence, including: * the king was not to impose taxes without the councils consent, * the king was not to infringe on the Catholic Churchs rights in Norway, and  * the king was to rule Norway only through native-born or married-in Norwegians who resided in Norway.( )thumb|left|Vstra Ingelstads church where Henrich Krummedige lies buried.The short-term effect of this charter was to enable Lunge, who had married into the noble Norwegian Rmer family, to remain in place while Henrich Krummedige lost his fiefs and was de facto expelled from the Norwegian National Council. King Frederick I was clearly pragmatic in achieving what he wanted, and never came to Norway to be crowned. He honored the charter only when it was convenient. The Catholic Church was undercut. Taxes were increased. And Danes continued to be placed in critical positions (particularly as commanders of major fortresses) &mdash; and Henrich Krummedige regained his position on the Norwegian National Council in 1528.The Mnstorp dispute sets up opposition to King Christian IIAlthough both Henrik and his father had a long history of strong support for the Danish Kings, the Mnstorp dispute placed Henrik in a new role as the kings opponents.()Economic accomplishmentsKrummedige was not only a nobleman of with political skills and the tough minded approach to accomplish difficult deeds; he was also an able investor, interested in commerce and industry. Krummedige inherited extensive land holdings, both in Norway (Brunlag) and in Denmark, which he increased further through purchase and legal process. As a result he was probably the largest Danish-Norwegian landholder of his period.  In addition to inheriting approximately 240 farms he invested the revenues from his Norwegian fiefdoms and purchased an additional 178 farms in Norway with most concentrated in Bhuslen.  In Denmark he increased his holdings by 300 tenant farms and four manors.((  Krummedige understood the value of maximizing the profit from his produce by selling it for the best price and participated actively in commercial trade  owning houses and commercial facilities in Bergen, Oslo, and Tnsberg in Norway as well as Roskilde, the Gothenburg area (Nya Ldse), Halmstad, Malm, and Copenhagen in Denmark. He also participated in foreign trade with his own vessels.(  thumb|Henrich Krummedige died at Mnstorps Gables His interests were not limited to agriculture and commerce. He may have run the earliest known copper mining venture in Norway, which was located at Sandsvr. The mine is mentioned in a 1490 letter from King Hans to Henrik Krummedike, and is the first written source that directly deals with a copper mine in Norway, mentioning our copper plant in Sandsvr. (Benedictow 1991:9). Although Krummedike and Plsson were granted the mining rights, there are no sources confirming the mine was cost effective.() He was among the first who used water-driven saws for the production of large quantities of lumber in Norway and may have introduced them.  He also constructed a large brick kiln capable of producing over 18,000 bricks at a firing on his estate in Mnstorp(Final yearsKrummedige died at Gables in 1530 and is buried in the Vstra Ingelstads church. His wife survived him by three years. With the death of his nephew, the male line of the Krummedige dynasty died out.References and notesKrummedigeKrummedige
22498067
He_Xiehou
He Xiehou (1873-1961) was a Chinese educator, politician and former President of University.BiographyHes another name was He Yushi (), style name was Zixing (), and was born in Zhuji, Shaoxing, Province in 1873. When he was 19 years old, he went to Hangzhou and in 1897 studied at Academy (current University).In 1898, He went to Japan, as one of Chinas first students to Japan. In 1902, He graduated from Tokyo First Advanced School (Japanese: ). In 1907, He graduated from the Department of Metallurgy of Imperial University (current of Tokyo). He is the first Chinese student who graduated from a Japanese university. (Baidu.com: Biography of He Xiehou)In spring 1908, He went back to Zhejiang and served as a technician in the Bureau of Mining of Zhejiang Provincial Government. In 1909, he went to Japan again. He was the supervisor of the engineering faculty of the Imperial Capital University (; current University) in Beijing.In 1911/1912, the Dynasty ended, and the Imperial Capital University was renamed as (National) Peking University. He was the first President of Peking University from then on. (Peking University: Presidents of Peking University - He Jushi ())In 1914, he visited South Asia. In 1954, he was elected the head of the Committee of the Kuomintang Zhejiang Branch. In 1961, he died in Hangzhou. His tomb is in Shaoxing, his hometown. Many people still visit there today.References(External links* Presidents of Peking University* Biography of He Xiehou (from Baidu.com Encyclopedia)* He Xiehous biography (from Zhejiang Local Archive)* Sohu.com Education: He Xiehou - a former Peking University President forgotten by history* Sohu.com Education: Former residence and tomb of He Xiehou in Zhuji* Shaoxing Government: He Xiehous biographyzh:
22522587
Lewenborg
NL Groningen - Lewenborg.PNG|thumb|right|225px|Location of Lewenborg inside the municipality of GroningenLewenborg is a green suburb in the east of the city of Groningen in the Netherlands. It had 8,800 residents as of 2008.(CBS: Kerncijfers wijken en buurten 2003-2008. The number is the sum of the districts Lewenborg-South, -North en -West http://statline.cbs.nl/StatWeb/publication/?DMSLNL&PA70904NED&D10-9&D2163-165,348,356,365,380-381,418-419,435,451,459,464,744,770,777,788,1121,1131,1139,1150,1159,1166,1176,1186,1191,1204&D31,l&HDRT&STBG1,G2&VWT) Its construction began in 1971.The heart of Lewenborg consists of the shopping mall and the community center, Het Dok. All of Lewenborgs street names are references to nautical terms. Even the institutions and schools in this neighbourhood carry nautical names. The streets of Zilvermeer (Silverlake), Mooiland (Prettyland), Waterland and Zonland (Sunland) (the last three in the ecological quarter, Drielanden) are also part of Lewenborg. However, they do not concur with Lewenborgs regular nomenclature.In the past few years, Lewenborg has undergone a suburban-renewal project. The plan consists of the creation of a canal which runs right through Lewenborgthe Lewenborgsingel. Before the digging began, three big flats had to be demolished: the Sloepflat in the fall of 1999, the Toplichtflat in the spring of 2000, and the Kombuisflat in 2005. The western portion of the canal was finished first, and the eastern portion is now also complete. As soon as Lewenborgs medical center has moved to its new location, both parts of the Lewenborgsingel will be connected. History Lewenborg is situated in a very old area. Originally the surroundings were terrains of bog-on-clay. The major development of bogs started around the year 1000, mostly because of the efforts of several monasteries. The harvesting (of peat) occurred on the higher located levees, which resulted in development (see for example Engelbert and Noorddijk) and relatively small lots (see for example the EDON-woods). In a later period, the mining of the bogs caused the ground to sink. At first, they tried to dig ditches (for example the Kardingermaar and the Zuidwending) to drain off the increasingly waterlogged lots. This proved to be insufficient, and major adjustments like boards, polders, and dikes were deemed necessary.In presumably the twelfth century, the Stadsweg arose. This was a route from Groningen via Noorddijk en Garmerwolde to the Ems. This old route disappeared with the construction of Lewenborg. However, two small pieces of it still remain: the bicycling path from the Stadsweg in Oosterhogebrug between the football fields of FC Lewenborg to Lichtboei; and on the other side of Lewenborg, the part of the bicycling path from Wimpel to the Bevrijdingsbos and in the direction of Garmerwolde. In 2007 a plan arose to dig up the Stadsweg in the Le Roygebied and pull it through from Wimpel.(Regiokrant 3 september 2007) Sport clubs The gymnastics club GV Olympia has used the gym in the sport centre on Valreep for almost fifteen years. The girls squad participates in competitions on a national level. Schools Lewenborg has four schools. It used to have six, but the Ketelbinkie and De Brandaris fused in 1995 into De Tweemaster. The schools Radar and De Swoaistee fused in 2005. After that, the old building of Radar was demolished to make way for the construction of new Swoaistee classrooms.The current elementary schools are:*De Swoaistee (public, Jenaplan), Kiel*De Catamaran (public), Vaargeul*De Tweemaster (public), Valreep*Het Kompas (Christian), MidscheepsOther schools*Alfa College (Vocational education), KluiverboomIn the past there were several schools that, albeit temporary, were based in Lewenborg. For example, there was a school on Baken for quite some time. Streets *Anker (Anchor)*Bakboord (Port)*Baken (Beacon)*Boeg (Bow)*Bolder (Bollard)*Fok (Jib)*Dek (Deck)*Dukdalf (Dolphin)*Gangboord (Gunwale)*Golfslag (wave)*Grootzeil (Mainsail)*Het Want (Stays)*Kajuit (Cabin)*Kiel (Keel)*Kluisgat (Hawsehole)*Kluiverboom (boom)*Kombuis (Galley)*Kraaienest (nest)*Langszij*Lichtboei (Light buoy)*Lijzijde (Leeward)*Loefzijde (Windward)*Loopplank (Gangway)*Mast (Mast)*Meerpaal (Bollard)*Midscheeps (Midships)*Overloop (Ship Corridor)*Patrijspoort (Porthole)*Ra (Yard)*Reling (Handrail)*Roer (Rudder)*Sloep (Sloop)*Stuurhut (Steering cabin)*Steiger (Pier)*Stuurboordwal (Starboard)*Toplicht (light)*Vaargeul (fairway)*Valreep (Gangway)*Vooronder (Frontcabin)*Wimpel (Pennon)References(External links*Lewenborg.nlnl:Lewenborg
22535673
MySims_Agents
StylusMySims Agents is a mystery-solving adventure game for the DS and Wii, in which the player must guide agents in an effort to stop the sinister plans of Morcubus, lord of the criminal underworld.(MySims Agents press release) This latest addition to the MySims franchise was released on September 29, 2009.OverviewIn MySims Agents players take on the role of a special agent hired to foil the sinister plans of Morcubus, lord of the criminal underworld. By recruiting different MySims, each with their own special characteristics, players can build up their very own crime-busting dream team. From tracking footprints and using forensics to picking locks, hacking into computers, following leads and collecting clues, players must rely on their wits, skills and trusty gadgets to piece together the clues to solve the mystery. Jump aboard the jet to reach an ancient temple, a spooky mansion or an icy mountaintop chalet in search of clues that lead players closer to the sinister Morcubus. Return from the adventure with cool treasures that players can use to construct and customize their headquarters and make it their own.FeaturesExplore the world -- explore your city and beyond, from a ski chalet on the top of an icy mountain to an ancient temple in the depths of the jungle*Solve the mysteries -- use your wits, skills and trusty collection of gadgets to solve puzzling myteries. Follow leads wherever they take you, whether it requires jumping, climbing, balancing, picking locks, or hacking into computers. All your sleuthing abiliites are brought into play, from interrogation to frensics, from following footprints to fixing machines*Bulid your own team of agents -- recruit MySims you meet along the way to come back to your headquarters and join your team. Send them out on missions to gather information and unlock rewards for you*Construct and customize -- deck out your headquarters with treasures from your adventures, customize it to look the way you want and equip it to maximize the skills of your teamLocationsHeadquartersYour center of operations, contains a : Basement, Patio, Lobby, Loft, & Hanger.( All floors except the lobby can be assigned to a maximum of three agents each.)Main StreetContains the park, the park forest, City Hall, Chef Ginos Pizzaria, Shirleys Hair Salon, Patricks Construction Site, Town Square, and Evelyns Apartment. And tops of Apartments and top of Shirleys Salon.The Lodge (cant return to)A Ski Lodge owned by Professor Nova that apparently is home to a yeti. Contains Lodge, Picnik area, Skiing areas, Cabins, Secret mines.Industrial DistrictThe Citys heavy Industrial district, home to The Junkyard, Dj Candys Club, & Dr.Fs Lab. Also contains sewer paths and a destinite (a fictional gem with few uses) mining areaCyrus Bordreauxs Mansion (cant return to)1800s style Southern Mansion with a Zombie Butler, A Foyer, Kitchen, Dining Room, A Large Library, and a room home to the worlds only sample of a mysterious crystal (called fortunite), a series of paths above the foyer, and a mysterious passage wayBoardwalkYour Towns Beachfront, home to Lukes Surf Shop, The M.U.B.A. Stand (Morcucorp + Scuba), Justices tattoo shop, Chef wantabes sushi stand, a Turkey-on-a-Fork stand, and The parking lot where Chazs stunt is held. Also includes, Secret Morcucorp Submarine holder, the tide pools where Mr. Suckers lives, and A sunken ship!Unknown Jungle (cant return to)A Mysterious jungle home to ruins of an ancient Civilizations Temple Complex. With a fire room, temple grotto, wind room, and key room. When not in the temple there is the Gia Tree, Sun and Moon shrines, a lounge-like area outside of the temple(Where you meet Morcubus), and  a hillside with a pure water pump.ReceptionThe Wii version recivied mostly positive reviews among critics, while the DS version was more mixed. GameSpot gave the Wii version 7.5, commenting on the games new adventure style and its good storyline, but felt the game was too easy and short.(http://uk.gamespot.com/wii/puzzle/mysimsagents/review.html) IGN gave the Wii version 7.8, praising the games gameplay and plot.(http://uk.wii.ign.com/articles/102/1028497p2.html) However they gave the DS version 4.9 commenting positivley on the games graphics, however lacked the appeal of the Wii version.(http://uk.ds.ign.com/articles/102/1029751p1.html)SequelA sequel is in the works, following the agents. In 2010 a new MySims game called MySims SkyHeroes was released. This however, is a new game altogether.ReferencesExternal links*Official Site*Sims AgentsAgentsAgents
22547260
Gnther_Clauss
Gnther F. Clauss (* 31 of December, 1939 in Munich, Germany) is a German professor for Naval Architectue and Ocean Engineering Scientific career Clauss studied technical physics at the Technical Universities at Munich (B.Sc.) and Berlin(M.Sc -1964.), and completed his doctorate at the Institute of Aerospace (University Berlin) in the year 1968. Inspired by Professor Alfred Keil, Dean ofEngineering at MIT he changed from outer space to inner space, and establishedthe new field ocean engineering at the University Berlin. After his habililtation - a postgraduate degree - he became professor of OceanEngineering in 1972, and - after research visits at the MIT-Department ofOcean Engineering, the Institute of NAOE, University of California at Berkely,and the Institute of Technology, Madras - he was offered the firstChair of Ocean Engineering in Germany at the TU Berlin in 1973. For many years he served as a Director of the Institute of Naval Architecture and OceanEngineering, three legislative periods he was the Dean of the Faculty ofMechanical Engineering and Transport Systems and 12 years Senator at theAcademic Council. Research ActivitiesThe extensive research activities of Gnther Clauss -focussing on the design and hydromechanics of offshore structures as well ason deep sea technology - cover projects on capsizing of ships, design andoptimization of offshore platforms, pipelaying vessels and floating cranes aswell as the development of oil skimming vessels, deepsea shuttles and oceanmining systems. For the deterministic analysis of cause-reaction chains he developed a seakeeping test procedure which uses tailored extreme waves -embedded in irregular seas - to investigate precisely wave/structureinteractions. With his research assistants, colleagues and industry partnershe published more than 200 papers http://www.naoe.tu-berlin.de/MT/publikationen/publications-mainframe.html (bestpaper award OMAE 2006) as well as the books Meerestechnische Konstruktionen(also in Korean) and Offshore Structures (Vol I - Conceptual Design andHydromechanics, Vol II - Strength and Safety for Structural Design). Under hisguidance more than 30 Ph.D. theses have been successfully completed - based onresearch projects of the European Union, the German Ministries BMBF (Researchand Development) and BMWi (Economy and Technology), the German ScienceFoundation (DFG) and the Association of Industrial Partners (AIF). GntherClauss served as chairman and member at ITTC and ISSC, is member of STG(executive board), RINA (F) and SNAME (M). In offshore platformdecommissioning he served as a member in the IRG of Brent Spar and iscurrently engaged in the Scientific Review Group (SRG) for the EkofiskField (ConocoPhillips) as well as  Brent-Feldes (Shell). Awards * 2005  K.E.R.N.-Maritime Technology Award* 2006  SOBENA (SOBENA) International Reward (for outstanding contributions to the naval architecture ans ocean engineering).* 2006/2007 he was awarded by the nomination for the Georg-Weinblum-Memorial Lecturer for outstanding research in the field of hydrodynamics ()| References Further reading* Clauss, G. F.; Lehmann, E., stergaard, C. : Meerestechnische Konstruktionen. Springer-Verlag, Berlin Heidelberg, New York Paris Tokyo 1988, ISBN 3-540-18964-5.* Clauss, G. F.; Lehmann, E., stergaard, C. : Offshore Structures Vol. 1 - Conceptual Design. Springer-Verlag, Berlin Heidelberg, New York Paris Tokyo 1992, ISBN 3-540-19709-5.* Clauss, G. F.; Lehmann, E., stergaard, C. : Offshore Structures Vol. 2 - Strength and Safety for Structural Design. Springer-Verlag, Berlin Heidelberg, New York Paris Tokyo 1994, ISBN 3-540-19770-2.* Clauss, G.: The Taming of the Shrew: Tailoring Freak Wave Sequences for Seakeeping Tests. In: Journal of Ship Research.  Vol. 52, No. 3, 2008* Clauss, G.: Tsunamis, Monsterwellen und andere Seeungeheuer. In: Festvortrag zur 100. Hauptversammlung der Schiffbautechnischen Gesellschaft e.V..  November 17, 2005, Berlin, Germany* Bronsart, R., Clauss, G.: mar-ing  The Network of German Universities for a joint NAOE Master Program. In: 25th OMAE - International Conference on Offshore Mechanics and Arctic Engineering June 49, 2006, Hamburg, Germany* Clauss, G.: The Conquest of the Inner Space - Challenges and Innovations in Offshore Technology. In: Marine Systems & Ocean Technology, Journal of SOBENA  Vol. 3, No. 1, June 2007, Rio de Janeiro, Brasil
22564427
Sylvan_Lake,_New_York
Sylvan Lake is an unincorporated hamlet in the Town of Beekman, New York, United States. It is named after the lake it sits on, which was formed during the Age. The early Indians originally named it poughquag which means round body of water. A smaller lake known as Hidden Lake is where Daniel Delany, in the late 19th century, discovered ore and made his fortune. He eventually bought the adjacent property which was the entire shoreline of Sylvan Lake and rebuilt St. Denis church for the town. Some iron ore mining also took place along the shores of Sylvan Lake in the early 1930s and some of these retainer wall pilings are still standing and can be clearly seen from a boat. When the mine was filled with water, construction equipment and mining tools were left on the bottom, and are present today. References * http://www.townofbeekman.com/* 
22578614
Paper_Clip
Paper Clip is a 1995 episode of X-Files television series. It was the second episode broadcast in the shows third season. Paper Clip concludes the story regarding the agents possession of a digital tape containing government secrets on extraterrestrials. Plot Continuing from the previous episode, Scully and Skinner hold each other at gunpoint. Mulder, the person lingering outside of his apartment, bursts in and forces Skinner to put his gun down. He also demands that Skinner surrender the digital tape. Skinner insists on keeping the tape, saying it is their only leverage in exposing the conspiracy.The agents visit Langly and Byers, showing them a photo featuring Bill Mulder, the Smoking Man, Deep Throat, and other members of the Syndicate. The Lone Gunmen also recognize Victor Klemper, a notorious Nazi scientist who was bought to the U.S. under Paperclip. Frohike arrives and informs Scully of Melissas condition. Mulder persuades Scully not to visit Melissa at the hospital, since she could be targeted there. In York City, the Syndicate meets in the wake of Melissas shooting, fearful that the incident will compromise its activities. The Syndicate blames the Smoking Man for the shooting, and demands that he produce the digital tape. The Smoking Man promises to do the following day. Meanwhile, Mulder and Scully visit Klemper, who says that the photo was taken at a mining facility in Virginia. After the agents leave, Klemper calls the Well Manicured Man and informs him that Mulder is alive. The news causes the Syndicate to further mistrust the Smoking Man. At the hospital, Albert Hosteen visits Melissa while a suited man loiters nearby. Mulder and Scully arrive at the mining site and using the code for Napiers constant, told to them by Klemper, are able to unlock the reinforced doors they find inside.Skinner meets with the Cigarette Smoking Man, telling him that he may have found the digital tape. The Cigarette Smoking Man is extremely agitated at this, insisting that he will not make a deal with Skinner, and tacitly threatening his life.Mulder and Scully find a large complex of filing cabinets containing smallpox vaccination records and tissue samples. Mulder finds his sisters file and finds that it was originally meant for him. Hearing noise, Mulder heads outside where he witnesses a U.F.O. flying overhead. Small beings run past Scully. Cars full of armed soldiers arrive, and the agents flee.Mulder and Scully meet with Skinner at a diner in rural Maryland. Skinner wants to turn over the digital tape in exchange for their reinstatement and safety. After initially objecting, Mulder agrees to let Skinner turn the digital tape over. Skinner heads to see Melissa in the hospital and is told by Albert of the mysterious blue-suited man outside. Skinner chases the man to a stairwell where he is attacked by Krycek and Luis Cardinal, who steal the digital tape and flee.Krycek narrowly escapes an attempt on his life when the car he is in explodes after the other two men leave the car. Mulder and Scully return to Klempers greenhouse, finding the Well Manicured Man there. He admits to knowing Mulders father and states that during the War Mulders father helped gather genetic data for post-apocalyptic identification  data which was used by Klemper to work on alien-human hybrids. When Mulders father learned of this, he threatened to expose them, so Samantha was taken to ensure his silence.Krycek phones the Cigarette Smoking Man, telling him that he has the tape. The Cigarette Smoking Man lies to the rest of the Syndicate, telling them that Scullys would-be assassin was killed in a car explosion which destroyed the tape too. Mulder confronts his mother, who tells him that his father chose for Samantha to be taken. At FBI headquarters Skinner once again meets with the Cigarette Smoking Man about the tape. The Smoking Man calls Skinners bluff, knowing he no longer has the tape, but Skinner reveals that Albert and 20 other Navajos have memorized the content of the tape and are ready to reveal it if Mulder or Scully are harmed. Mulder meets with Scully at the hospital, who reveals that her sister died a few hours before. Mulder tells Scully that he believes that the truth is still in the X-Files. Scully tells him that shes heard the truth, and now what she wants are the answers.()() Production The aliens in this episode who run past Scully in the mining facility were portrayed by eight- and nine-year-old children. The U.F.O. spotted by Mulder was achieved by using a crane to lift lights over the building Mulder was at.() The Mining Facility is named for Dr. Strughold, a real-life German scientist who was employed by the U.S. after War II. The fictional Victor Klemper is based on Strughold, who was accused of conducting similar experiments on humans. Interestingly, the name is almost identical to a Klemperer who was a German Jew that escaped persecution during World War II by fleeing to American-controlled territory. The Strughold Mining Facility was filmed at the B.C. Museum of Mining, in Britannia Beach, British Columbia, Canada.() This episode was dedicated in memorium to Mario Mark Kennedy, an internet fan of the show who had died in a car accident in 1995.(Story editor Spotnitz said of the episode I love Paper Clip. I was thrilled with the plot. I know it moved very fast for some people, but I actually think that for some of these shows you dont need to understand everything. I think it is more exciting to go at rocket speed. Everybody was on the mark in that one; David and Gillians performances, Rob Bowmans direction, Chris Carters writing - everything was just terrific in that show. Bowman said When I finished Paper Clip, I thought, I dont know what else I am going to do this year to top this() In 1996 Pileggi called the episode one of the shows finest, particularly enjoying the line where he tells the Smoking Man to pucker up and kiss my ass. Pileggi claims that to be one of his favorite lines. The scene would be used frequently to introduce him at X-Files conventions.()The creators likened themes of the episode to the Star Wars trilogy, referring to the revelations about Mulders father, and Sophies Choice, referring to how the Mulders were forced to choose Fox or Samantha to be taken.( Reception The episode earned a Nielson rating of 11.1, with a 20 share. It was viewed by 17.20 million people.()Footnotes External links *Clip (The X-Files)di X-Files (terza stagione)#Operazione_Paper_Clip
22600006
Neals_Diggins,_California
Neals Diggins (also, Neals Diggings;( later, Adamstown, Adamsville, and Adams Bar) is a former settlement and mining camp in Butte County, California, States.( It was located on the River upstream from Oroville, on the opposite bank from Longs Bar.() It was founded by Sam Neal, a local rancher,() in 1848.(  Later that year, George Adams re-established the place and named it for himself.References
22613699
Hohengeroldseck
The Hohengeroldseck family or House of Geroldseck was a German noble family which arrived in Baden-Baden about 948 AD and ended on the male line in 1636 with the death of Kurfrsten Jacob von und zu Geroldseck. They were heavily involved in mining of ores, especially silver. The Hohengeroldseck family founded many monasteries within the Zhringen order. Their family seat is Hohengeroldseck in Biberach.The last Hohengeroldseck was Kurfrsten Jacob von und zu Hohengeroldseck, who died in 1636AD. With only a daughter, Princess Elizabeth von und zu Hohengeroldseck, the titles and lands of Hohengeroldseck were transfered to her husband, the Count Palatine of the Rhine, and later became part of the Duchy of Bavaria.In 1806 the County of Hohengeroldseck was purchased from the Austrian Empire by the Principality von der Leyen, which became a member of the Confederation as a puppet state of France, and later joined the Confederation in 1815. Its capital was Seelbach. In 1819 Hohengeroldseck und von der Leyen was assorbed into the Duchy of Baden.(http://www.zum.de/Faecher/G/BW/Landeskunde/rhein/territor/geroldseck/museum.htm)(Gabbert, Carsten: Die Geroldsecker und ihre Burgen Geroldseck und Hohengeroldseck : das Verhltnis des Geschlechtes zu den Burgen und deren Bedeutung im 12 (...))(Reinhard, Johann Jacob: Pragmatische Geschichte des Hauses Geroldsek wie auch derer Reichsherschaften Hohengeroldsek, Lahr und Mahlberg in Schwaben.)(Fickler, Carl Borromeo Alois: Brief History of the houses Frstenberg, Geroldseck und von der Leyen / Carl B. Fickler. - Karlsruhe: Macklot, 1844. - 112 S.; (dt.) - 112 S.)Members of the Hohengeroldseck family* Bishop of Strassburg (Bistum) von und zu Geroldseck* Prince Electors (Kurfrsten) von und zu Hohengeroldseck* Counts (Grafen) von und zu Geroldseck.* Barons (Freiherren) von Geroldseck See also * of Leyen* of Veldenz References (von Geroldseck
22636999
Dawlytown,_California
Dawlytown is a former settlement and mining camp in Butte County, California, States, located on the Middle Fork of the River.() It was located adjacent to Bidwells Bar.()  The town was founded in 1849, and named for an early store owner.(References
22646772
Oregon_Iron_Company
 governing_body The Oregon Iron Company was an iron smelting company located in what is now Oswego, Oregon. The company was established in 1865, and in 1867, became the first company in the United States to smelt iron west of the Mountains. The company failed after a few years, but was reorganized as the Oswego Iron Company in  1878, and again as the Oregon Iron and Steel Company in 1883. With the addition of a larger furnace, this last  incarnation of the company prospered, reaching peak production in 1890. By 1894, however, pressure from cheaper imported iron  combined with the effects of the of 1893 forced the company to close its smelter. The company continued to operate a pipe foundry until 1928, and until the early 1960s, existed as a land management company, selling its real estate holdings which expanded the city of Lake Oswego.Early historyThe discovery of iron ore near the settlement of Oswego in the hills south of Portland is credited to M. McCarver (who had served as speaker of the Legislature of Oregon) in 1862.() McCarvers brown hematite ore was tested and found to be of excellent quality (from 5675% metal).(() In addition, the ore lay near the surface and the Oswego bed was estimated to contain  of ore.(( Since the site also featured vast forests that could be turned into charcoal to feed the smelting furnaces, and ready access to water for power, the potential of a successful mining operation was easily  recognized.()In 1865, a group of financiers in Oregon, which included former Portland mayors S. Ladd and Failing, as well as Portland Gas Light Company founders Herman C. Leonard and John Green, incorporated an iron smelting company which they named the Oregon Iron Company.((() Ladd (who served as President) and the others hoped to make Oswego the Pittsburgh of the West,() believing that having a local source of iron would help their other businesses, which  included the Central Railroad and the Steam Navigation Company.(Constructionthumb|upright|left|William S. Ladd led the group of financiers that founded the Oregon Iron Company in 1865To oversee construction of a charcoal-fired furnace, the company recruited George Wilbur. Wilbur modeled his design on the Lime Rock Furnace in Lime Rock, Connecticut. The furnace was designed by British stonemason Richard Martin and was completed in 1867.( Meanwhile, a dam was built on Sucker Creek to harness water for  power, forests were cleared to be turned into charcoal to feed the furnace, and limestone, used during iron smelting to remove impurities, was quarried from the Juan Islands in Territory, and shipped and unloaded at the company docks on the adjacent River.(On August 24, 1867, the Oregon Iron Company became the first company in the United States to smelt iron west of the Rocky Mountains.((() The first pigs were given to J. C. Trullinger, who owned the townsite of Oswego.() From 1867 to 1869, the company smelted nearly  of  iron.(Ladds group soon found their business expertise in other areas did not apply as well to the iron industry. Their lack of experience, coupled with a dispute over water rights, caused the company to close in 1869.((() After a brief respite in which they filled an order for iron wheels for the Pacific Railroad from 1874 to 1876,(( the company closed for good in 1878 and the assets were sold off at a sheriffs auction.(Oswego Iron CompanyWorkers Cottage - Lake Oswego Oregon.jpg|thumb|upright|right|This cottage in Lake Oswegos Old Town was built by the Oswego Iron Company for workers in about 1882. It was added to the National Register of Historic Places in 2009.()The purchasers were led by Ernest Crichton and L. B. Seeley, experienced furnace managers from Ohios Hanging Rock iron region.( Under the new name of the Oswego Iron Company, the company made a number of significant improvements: they purchased the Oswego townsite along with large tracts of forest, settled the water rights issue, remodeled the furnace, opened several new mines, constructed several homes for its workers, and built a gauge railroad for hauling the ore. From 1877 to 1881, the Oswego Iron Company produced  of iron.((((However, to finance these improvements, the company also incurred massive debt, and with the market price for iron remaining low, the company was sold in 1880 to another group of Portland financiers led by Gannett Reed and railroad baron Villard.(Oregon Iron and Steel Companythumb|upright|left|Simeon G. Reed became president of the Oregon Iron & Steel Company in 1882In 1882, the company was reincorporated as the Oregon Iron and Steel Company with Reed as its President and M. Ladd, son of Oregon Iron Company founder William S. Ladd, as its vice president.( Borrowing from Villard, Reed built a new smelter north of the original furnace which had five times its capacity.(() The new iron works opened in 1888, and production boomed. The company employed 300 men and Oswegos population soared, as hotels, churches, saloons, and an opera house were built to support the town. A railroad line to Portland was completed in 1886, making Oswego more accessible.((The company reached its peak production in 1890, smelting  of iron.( However, half the companys resources were dedicated to making charcoal from wood. The availability of cheaper imported coke-fired iron, the overall reduction in demand for iron as railroad expansion slowed, and the economic effects of the of 1893, all combined to hasten the final closure of the furnace in 1894.(( The company continued to operate a pipe foundry on the site of the new furnace until 1928.(Land developmentDespite its lack of industry, the company still found itself with thousands of acres of land that could be developed. William M. Ladd, who had succeeded Reed as President of Oregon Iron and Steel and his father as President of Ladd & Tilton Bank, formed the Ladd Estate Company to manage these real estate assets.(() The newly formed Ladd Estate Company converted the depressed company town into a prestigious suburb complete with country club, golf course, polo field, and even worked to rename the harsh-sounding Sucker Lake to Lake.(The company existed as a shell until 1960, when in its final act, it deeded its powerhouse and dams to lake shareholders.(Remnants of infrastructurethumb|right|Remains of the crucible of the second furnace in Lake Oswegos Roehr Park on the bank of the Willamette RiverThe original blast furnace still stands in Lake Oswegos George Rogers Park along the River. It was placed on the Register of Historic Places in 1974.() In 2010, a seven-year restoration of the furnace was completed.()Of the two first pigs smelted in 1867, one is displayed in the Historical Society and one remains in place as a street marker at the northwest corner of Ladd and Durham streets in Lake Oswego.((The crucible from the second furnace, which was dismantled and sold for scrap in 1926, is still intact in Lake Oswegos Roehr Park.()ReferencesExternal links*National Register of Historic Places listing**Iron Company Furnace
22660352
Fort_Ann,_California
Fort Ann is a former settlement in Amador County, California. It was located on the South Fork of Dry Creek,  north of Volcano.() Although local tradition has it that Fort Ann began as a military outpost, it began as a mining camp.(References
22670305
Kentucky_Ranch,_California
Kentucky Ranch is a former settlement and mining camp in Yuba County, California. It was located  southwest of Dobbins.()References
22694999
Edwin_Carter
File:Carter Museum-02.jpg|thumb|right| Edwin Carter Log Cabin Naturalist Museum (Circa 1875) Edwin Carter in ColoradoEdwin Carter - cabin naturalist, was born in upstate York around 1830. Carter lived in the Breckenridge, Colorado area from 1860 to 1900.  He originally was a placer miner and was fairly successful,  but when he observed the destruction of the environment caused by mining, he decided to collect animal and bird specimens for display before they were all gone.  In 1875 he built a log cabin museum with a unique 12 foot high ceiling to house his enormous collection of over 3,000 specimens.  The Museum of Nature and Science owes its original start to his collection which was purchased after his death in 1900.  The original log cabin is still in excellent shape after 125+ years. As part of Breckenridges 150th celebration It has been recently (2009) renovated and modernized by Exhibit Design Associates for the Breckenridge Heritage Alliance and includes some original examples of his taxidermy work.   In addition it has numerous interactive learning exhibits and a small LCD theater room with a short film on his life history. Click here to view the trailer http://www.youtube.com/watch?vTIwqexrpdfg.  This creative film was an official selection of the 2009  Breckenridge Festival of Film.  Edwin was somewhat of an enigma as he never married or had any descendants and only 5 photos of him were found, one being his closed casket.  Virtually no correspondence, news articles, or dairies exist to give us much insight into what made him decide to be a naturalist instead of a miner.   His Masonic connections were notable as he was honored as a first private citizen of Colorado and first lay in state at the state capitol in Denver and again in Breckenridge, both events orchestrated by his fellow Masons.  Most of our earlier Presidents, scientists and leading citizens were active in the Masonic organization in those days.References* In Memoriam: Edwin Carter, Frederick C. Lincoln, The Condor, Vol. 31, No. 5 (Sep. - Oct., 1929), pp. 196200, Published by: University of California Press on behalf of the Cooper Ornithological Society*http://rmoa.unm.edu/docviewer.php?docIdcodmnhiacar03.xml, Denver Museum of Nature and Science*http://www.preserveamerica.gov/cobreckenridge.html,   Preserve American.gov,  Breckenridge, Colorado and the Carter Log Cabin Museum*http://www.breckfilmfest.com/home/index.php, Breckenridge Festival of Film 2009 official entry*http://www.breckheritage.com/historic-preservation,  Breckenridge Heritage Alliance, Edwin Carter Museum*http://www.5280.com/issues/2009/0904/feature.php?pageID1655, Accidental Activist April 5280 Denvers Magazine*http://www.greeleytribune.com/article/20090324/NEWS/903249953/1068/NONE&parentprofile1001, Greeley Colorado News, Breckenridge 150thExternal links*
22718327
Canton,_California
Canton is a former gold mining town in El Dorado County, California.() It was located near Coloma, but its precise location is unknown.(References
22737488
Ora_Banda,_Western_Australia
Ora Banda is a  townsite, now a virtual town,  located   north east of Kalgoorlie. According to folklore, the town name is Spanish meaning band of gold.( ) History Gold was discovered in the district in 1893 and in 1909 the Ora Banda Progress Committee requested the Government make additional lots available, but it was 1911 before a decision was made to declare a townsite there The survey of lots was made in 1911, and the townsite gazetted in 1912(). By 1910 there were approximately 2,000 miners and their families living in the area. The town had two stores, two butchers, two bakers, a town hall, dining halls, a post office, a police station, churches, boarding houses and billiards saloons.The once famous Huntington Mills Bank was situated there. Which in its time it was the largest bank in the Southern Hemisphere. In 1911 the Ora Banda Hotel was constructed by Alfred E Garnett using stone and brick.On 17 June 1913, Eileen Walls (13yrs old) led a procession of school children up the main street, and had the honour of cutting the ribbon and so officially opened the Ora Banda State Battery. The five head battery ran three shifts and in 1936 another five head had to be added.Water was supplied to the town by dams until the town was connected to the Water Supply Scheme from Kalgoorlie in 1933Image:Ora Banda school.jpg|The Ora Banda school burnt downImage:very old wheelbarrow.jpg|Living conditions were rough.Image:Mining in Ora Banda.jpg|Mine shafts were scattered across the area Current Todays goldmining companies are still working the same sites discovered nearly a century ago, and on the outskirts of town you will find the Ora Banda State Battery which is still used to crush ore.Annually in September the population swells for a day for the Ora Banda Race Day. The race track is opposite the historical Ora Banda Inn.The town hit the headlines in 2000 when Joker, Billy Grierson, was fatally shot while sitting at a camp fire on the old town site. Former Criminal Investigation Bureau chief and Ora Banda hotel owner Don Hancock was suspected of the shooting and his properties were later fire-bombed. Hancock was later killed in a car bombing in 2001 in Western Australia in a revenge attack by other Gypsy Jokers.( )( ) External links *The Ora Banda Historical Inn The inn will be 100 years old in 2011*Tourism site*Ora Banda Historical Inn located in WAs Golden Outback References 
22753892
Adamson,_Oklahoma
Adamson is a ghost town in Pittsburg County, Oklahoma, States.  HistoryThe post office was established on March 1, 1906.()  The town was named for Peter Adamson, a mine owner.()Adamson first developed as a coal mining camp.  The town reached its peak during World War I.  The Rock Island and Katy railroads both built spurs into the town.  One of the worst mining disasters in Oklahoma occurred at Mine No. 1 on September 4, 1914.(GeographyAdamson is located at .Elevation is 620 feet.ReferencesExternal links*Mining Towns - Oklahoma Encyclopedia of History and Culture
22767015
Maritime_hydraulics_in_antiquity
With the issue of supplying water to a very large population, the Romans developed hydraulic systems for multiple applications: public water supply, power using water mills, mining, fish tanks, irrigation, fire fighting, and of course aqueduct (Stein 2004). Scientists such as Ctesibius and Archemedes produced the first inventions involving hydraulic power (Oleson 1984). Specific technologyThe most prevalent hydraulic pump used in maritime situations in Rome was the pump, which functioned to siphon collected water out of a ships hull (Oleson 1984). The bilge pump was an improvement on the first hydraulic pumps used in antiquity: force pumps. Invented around the early 3rd century BCE, the most primitive design of a force pump consisted of a piston pushing water out of a tube, constructed by soldering individual bronze elements (Stein 246). Written accounts from Phil of Byzantium (late 3rd century BCE), Vitruvius (c. 25 BCE), and Hero of Alexandria (c. CE 50) confirm archaeological evidence for the original simple design, and both Hero and Vitruvius specify that the pump was typically made of bronze (Stein 2004). Somewhere along the way a new design arose that involved cutting apertures into an individual wood block and then rendering the block pressure-proof with tightly fitting plugs and plates (Stein 2004). Although cheaper and easier to manufacture, assemble, and repair, the wooden pumps manufactured from then on would most likely not have been durable enough for maritime use, which is why we usually find lead pipes associated with bilge pumps, bilge wells, and hydraulic devices of other function about ships. The amphora shipwreck discovered at Grado in Gorizia, Italy, which dates to around 200 CE, and contained what archaeologists hypothesized to be a hydraulics system to change the water in live fish tanks, since other evidence indicates the ships involvement in the processed fish trade (Beltrame and Gaddi 2005).  This hypothesis has been disputed, since the wooden box protecting a lead pipe along the longitudinal axis of the hull found on the wreck suggest the existence of a bilge well (Oleson and Stein 2007). Previous ships involved in live fish tank transport, entitled navis vivariae, did not employ a hydraulic system, and for this reason the hypothesis proves especially questionable (Boetto 124). For example, one of the wrecks found in Claudiuss harbor at the modern Fiumicino Airport in Italy was a small fish craft dating somewhere around the 2nd century CE. Archaeologists discovered a fish-well in the middle of the ship that used the hole/plump system bored in the bottom of the boat to fill the tank (Boetto 2006). Other than the Grado wreck no other evidence exists of hydraulic systems being used in the fish industry.ReferencesBeltrame, C. and Gaddi, D. 2005. The Rigging and the Hydraulic System of the Roman wreck at Grado, Gorizzia, Italy, The International Journal of Nautical Archaeology 34: 79-87. Beltrame, C. and Gaddi, D. Preliminary Analysis of the Hull of the Roman Ship from Grado, Gorizia, Italy, IJNA36: 138-147. Boetto, G. 2006. Roman techniques for transport and conservation of fish. The case of the Fiumicino 5 	wreck in the light of some ethnographic comparisons, in L. Blue and F. Hocker (eds), Conducted by the Sea, X International Symposium on Boat and Ship Archaeology, Roskilde 2003. Oleson, J. P. 1984. Greek and Roman Mechanical Water lifting Devices: the History of a Technology. Toronto: Toronto University Press. Oleson, J. P. and Stein R. 2007. Comment on a Recent Article Concerning the Hydraulic System of the 	Roman Wreck at Grado, Gorizia, Italy, IJNA 35 (2): 415-417. Stein, R. J. B. 2004. Roman Wooden Force Pumps: A case study in innovation. Journal of Roman 	Archaeology 17 221-50.
22777815
Pinehurst,_California
footnotes               Pinehurst (formerly, Neff Mills) is an unincorporated community in Fresno County, California.( It is located  east-southeast of Dunlap,() at an elevation of 4003 feet (1220 m).(Pinehurst today is a small weekend getaway for residents of Fresno and other central valley cities that want to escape the summer heat and enjoy total peace and quiet with their families. Many families have owned homes and property there for three generations. This cluster of cabins, small farms and a few ranches are in stark contrast to the weekend retreats of Oakhurst, Bass and Shaver Lakes, Three Rivers, and other small mountain communities because there are no motor boating lakes or ski resorts nearby. Pinehurst is nothing more than small streams, Pine, Cedar, and Oak trees, the Pinehurst lodge and a picturesque 20 minute drive to the Giant Redwoods of Sequoia and Kings Canyon National Parks. Just a few miles down highway 245 from Pinehurst are two other small neighboring communities called Miramonte and Badger, where the local school for elementary school aged children is located, as well as the post office that serves all three communities.  The lands around Pinehurst and the other communities were originally established through the Homestead Act of 1862 by the Federal Government which allowed people to settle on land up to  for agricultural purposes only. Title was granted when farming took place. Most settlers around Pinehurst planted apple orchards to justify genuine settlement activity, and some of the original orchards can still be found at the Cedarbrook cabin area, the Pinehurst Ranch and other locations. Logging rights were not granted via the Homestead Act, therefore 16 years later in 1878, the Timber and Stone Act was passed. Land deemed unfit for farming was sold for $2.50 per acre to individuals who were allowed to conduct logging or mining on their property. Residency was not required and most buyers eventually transferred ownership to the large logging companies being established in the 1880s. The remnants of this activity over a hundred years ago can be seen around Hume Lake, Converse Basin and of course in several locations throughout Sequoia Park. Pinehurst, previously known as Neffs Mill, had its first sawmill located near the Cedarbrook picnic area (mill creek) and later was moved near to where the Pinehurst Lodge is located today.Cattle ranching, logging, fruit farming, the National Park and National Forest services were the mainstay of economic activity in and around Pinehurst for nearly 100 years. Today, recently planted apple and other fruit orchards can be found on several small farms around Pinehurst, yet nothing has changed much since the turn of the century except that logging as a business has nearly been banned in the area. Pinehurst and its surrounding communities of Badger and Miramonte may be some of the most untouched mountain communities in the state of California which were not affected by the real estate booms of the past 20 - 30 years -- despite the fact that urban communities of almost one million people live less than 60 - 90 minutes away.References
22785012
Bonanza_Creek
 footnotes Bonanza Creek is a watercourse in Yukon Territory, Canada.() It runs for about  from Solomons Dome to the River. In the last years of the 19th century and the early 20th century, Bonanza Creek was the center of the Gold Rush, which attracted tens of thousands of prospectors to the creek and the area surrounding it. Prior to 1896 the creek was known as Rabbit Creek. Its name was changed by miners in honor of the millions of dollars in gold found in and around the creek.(Tourism Yukon. Skookum Jim Mason, Travelyukon.com. 2008. Accessed May 12, 2009.)During gold-mining operations, the course of the creek changed drastically. It was heavily developed during the early 20th century, but was largely abandoned by the 1950s. A handful of small gold-mining operations continue on the creek, but today it is best known for its historic value. The government of Canada has established a historic site centered on one of the dredges brought in during the mining years.(Parks Canada. Dredge No. 4 National Historic Site of Canada, pc.gc.ca. November 28, 2008. Accessed May 12, 2009.)GalleryFile:Discovery Claim at Bonanza Creek (1).JPG|Discovery Claim at Bonanza CreekFile:Discovery Claim at Bonanza Creek (2).JPG|Discovery Claim at Bonanza CreekFile:Gold panning at Bonanza Creek.JPG|Gold panning at Bonanza CreekSee also*of rivers of YukonReferencesCreekCreekCreekCreek
22799622
Involvement_of_the_Peoples_Republic_of_China_in_Africa
:This article is primarily about economic relations between the PRC and Africa. For a more general overview, see relations.Chinese involvement in Africa, which began centuries ago, continues through the present day through exploration, trade, and the settlement of people in Africa. This includes the ongoing move by the Republic of China to secure highly needed natural resources through Chinese-African trade and diplomatic relations.The quest for key resources in Africa targets areas rich in oil, minerals, timber, and cotton, such as Sudan, Angola, Nigeria, and Africa. Many African countries are viewed as fast-growing markets and profitable outlets for the immediate export of cheap manufactured goods, and the future export of high-end products and services.Large scale structural projects, often accompanied by a loan, are proposed to African countries rich in natural resources. China commonly funds the construction of infrastructure such as roads and railroads, dams, ports, and airports. These amenities aid the movement of natural resources back to China, and provide China with leverage to obtain exploration and drilling rights. While relations are mainly conducted through diplomacy and trade, military support via the provision of arms and other equipment is also a major component.In the diplomatic and economic rush into Africa, Taiwan, the United States, France, and the UK are Chinas main competitors. France and the UK were once the primary commercial partners in Africa, but China recently became the largest trading partner, with trade of US$90 billion in 2009. The United States ranked 2nd, with $86 billion.() Although Africa has seen economic growth through commodity exports to China, critics argue that Chinese exports to Africaas well as Chinese business practiceshave impeded aspects of African development.(http://www.inwent.org/ez/articles/168755/index.en.shtml Problem, what problem?) China continues to expand its influence in the region on diplomatic, cultural, and commercial fronts, while working to secure and stabilize the region for long term gains.(Political and economic backgroundChinaThe Peoples Republic of China began seriously pursuing socialism in the 1970s under the leadership of Xiaoping. This marked the acceleration of a slow acceptance of and change to capitalist practices as the foundation of the PRCs socioeconomic development, a process initiated several decades earlier following the aftermath of the Leap Forward. Beginning in 1980, the PRC initiated a policy of rapid modernization and industrialization, resulting in reduced poverty for hundreds of millions of Chinese peasants, and developing the base of a powerful industrial economy. As of 2011, the PRC had the second largest nominal GDP in the world, at $6.5 trillion, and the second largest GDP by power parity at $11.1 trillion.(Monetary Fund, http://www.imf.org/external/pubs/ft/weo/2011/01/weodata/weorept.aspx?sy2008&ey2011&scsm1&ssd1&sortcountry&ds.&br1&c924&sNGDPD%2CNGDPDPC%2CPPPGDP%2CPPPPC%2CLP&grp0&a&pr.x39&pr.y6) Today, the PRC faces a well-publicized and growing shortage of materials such as oil, wood, copper, and aluminum, all of which are needed to support its economic expansion and the production of manufactured goods.AfricaAfrica has a population of roughly 922 million (World Population Prospects: The 2006 Revision United Nations (Department of Economic and Social Affairs, population division)) and a surface of 30,221,532 km. Industrialization started marginally in the early 20th century in the colonies of the European nations, namely Portugal, Belgium, Spain, the Netherlands, Germany, France, Italy, and the United Kingdom. The continents various wars for independence brought on the violent and disruptive division of Africa. Africa, being a major source of materials, saw the colonial powers vie for influence among the newly independent nations, with former colonial powers establishing special relations with their former colonies, often by offering economic aid and alliances for access to the vast resources of their former territories.Today, the presence of diamonds, gold, silver, uranium, cobalt and large oil reserves have brought Africa to the forefront of industrial development, with many of the worlds economic powers building relations with Africas resource rich nations.As of 2008, the entire GDP of Africa is about $1.2 trillion.(Incentives for cooperationBoth China and Africa proclaim a new, mutually beneficial economic, political, and regional alliance. China sees a source for raw materials and energy, desperately needed to support its feverish industrial and economic growth. Success in this quest means high employment and a higher quality of life for Chinese citizens, as well as increasing social stability and political security for Chinese elites.Through Africa, China has also found a way to isolate Taiwan, its diplomatic arch rival. Chinese oil companies are gaining the invaluable experience of working in African nations which will prepare them for larger projects on the far more competitive world market. The efficiency of Chinese assistance, loans, and proposals generally been praised. Finally, Chinese industry has found in Africa a budding market for its low-cost manufactured goods.Chinese diaspora in Africa have been actively supported by Chinese embassies, continuously building the Blood Brother relation between China and Africa as perceived victims of Western imperialism.(African leaders earn legitimacy through Chinese partnerships. They work together with the Chinese to provide Africa with key structural infrastructureroads, railways, ports, hydroelectric dams, and refineriesfundamentals which will help Africa avoid the curse. Success in this endeavor means avoiding the exploitation of their natural wealth and the beginning of fundamental social and economic transformations on the continent.(African countries partnering with China today are signing with a future world superpower. In Africa, this Chinese alliance provides strong psychological consequences. It provides economic hope and shows African elites an example of success which they may take as exemplars of their own future. Writer Harry Broadman commented that if Chinese investments in key sectors of infrastructure, telecommunication, manufacturing, foods, and textiles radically alter the African continent, the main change will have taken place in African minds.(LCA, p59) With the recent growth and economic improvement, more Africans students are returning to Africa after studies abroad in order to bring their skills and industry home. With key infrastructure in place, Africa has a future.History of Sino-African relationsEarly dynasties (700 a.d. to 1800)There are traces of Chinese activity in Africa dating back as far back as the Dynasty. Chinese porcelain has been found along the coasts of Egypt in Africa. Chinese coins, dated 9th century,(LCA, p105-109) have been discovered in Kenya, Zanzibar, and Somalia. The Dynasty established maritime trade with East Africa (now Tanzania, Zimbabwe) in the mid-12th century. The Dynastys Siben made the first known Chinese voyage to the Atlantic Ocean, while the Dynastys admiral He and his fleet of more than 300 ships made seven separate voyages to areas around the Indian Ocean, and landed on the coast of Eastern Africa.(Ancient Sino-African official contacts were not widespread. Most Chinese emissaries are believed to have stopped before ever reaching Europe or Africa, probably travelling as far as the far eastern provinces of the Roman and later Byzantine empires. However, some did reach Africa. Dynasty ambassadors, which was one of only two times when China was ruled by a foreign dynasty, this one the Mongols, traveled to Madagascar. Zhu Siben traveled along Africas western coasts, drawing a more precise map of Africas triangular shape.Between 1405 and 1433, the Ming government of Yongle sponsored a series of naval expeditions, with He as the leader. He was placed in control of a massive fleet of ships, which numbered as much as 300 ships with at least 28,000 men.(http://www.travel-silkroad.com/english/marine/ZhengHe.htm) Among the many places traveled, which included Arabia, India, Indonesia and Thailand, His fleet traveled to Africa. On their return, the fleet brought back African leaders, as well as lions, rhinoceros, ostriches, giraffes, etc., to the great joy of the court.(Following Emperor Yongles death, and the resurgence of Confucianism, which opposed frivolous external adventures, such expensive foreign policies were abandoned, and the costly fleet was destroyed.( Confucian officials preferred agriculture and authority over innovation, exploration, and trade. Their opinion was that Ming China had nothing to learn from overseas barbarians.(The modern Chinese version is that the European mercantilism in the of Discovery aggressively ended Sino-African relations.(() This point of view enforces the rhetoric of the brother relations of China and Africa.Image:Jean Ping 080202-F-1644L-081 0YWDF.jpg|thumb|right|Ping, 2008, example of Sino-African descendants. His Chinese father came from France in 1930 and became a successful businessman in Gabon, his mother being a local princess.(LCA, p87-88)Industrial era (1800 to 1949)A new era of Chinese trade began in the industrial era. European colonization of Africa and the abolition of slavery in France caused major workforce shortages in European colonies. Europe looked for a way to fill the gap with low-cost workers from abroad, namely India and China. Beginning in the 1880s, tens of thousands of Chinese Coolies were sent overseas to work in the mines, railroads, and plantations of the colonial powers.( The exploitation of inland resources, such as copper mines, also led to the presence of relatively large, isolated Chinese populations in landlocked countries such Zambia. Ping, the minister of Foreign Affairs of Gabon, who presided the UN Assembly, was born from an African mother and a Chinese father in Gabon, a country where almost no Chinese were present.(Diplomatic opening (1949 to 1980)thumb|Dates of independence of African countriesAfter the formation of the Peoples Republic of China following the Communist party victory in 1949, some Chinese fled, eventually landing in Africa.(LCA, p54) By the 1950s, Chinese communities in excess of 100,000 existed in Africa, Madagascar, and Mauritius.(http://www.statssa.gov.za/PublicationsHTML/P03022007/html/P03022007.html) Small Chinese communities in other parts of Africa later became the cornerstone of the post-1980 growth in dealings between China and Africa. However, at the time, many lived lives centered on local agriculture and probably had little or no contact with China. Precise statistics of the Chinese presence in Africa are difficult to obtain, since both Chinese and African offices have remained discreet about this issue.(LCA, p. 67)The newly formed Republic of China actively began supporting the decolonization movements in Africa and the Pacific. This era is especially important in the Sino-African friendship movement, as both the PRC and many of the decolonized African nations shared a victim background, the perception that they were both taken advantage of by imperialistic nations such as Japan and European states.(LCA, 109-110)The growing split of the 1950s and 1960s allowed the PRC to get US support, and to return to the international scene in 1971.( China (Taiwan)s seat on the Council was expelled by General Assembly Resolution 2758, and replaced in all UN organs with the Republic of China. With growing opposition between the USSR and the PRC in the 1960s, China expanded its own program of diplomacy, sometimes supporting capitalist factions against USSR backed ones (e.g. Angola (UNITA) and South Africa (Apartheid).(At the 1955 conference, China showed an interest in becoming the leader of the world. Enlai made an extensive African tour between 1963-1964, to strengthen Sino-African friendship. Hundreds of Chinese medics were sent to Africa and infrastructural projects were planned. The iconic 1860 km Tanzam railroad, built by 50.000 Chinese workers, was completed in 1976.( Ex-diplomat and now professor of Foreign Relations in Beijing, M. Xinghua, referred to this era as the age of Sino-African relations.(LCA, pp. 40-42) Growing numbers of African countries switched their recognition from the ROC (Taiwan) to the PRC. 1976 marked the death of Enlai and Zedong, bringing the era of ideology symbolically to a close and leaving power in the pragmatic hands of Deng Xiaoping.The shift to a less ideological approach was not without difficultly, and it involved considerable political effort to maintain the perception of a coherent national direction. Writer Snow describes it thus: a continual attempt to sustain a rhetorical unity which has sometimes disguised the pursuit of profoundly different goals.(CIA, p135)Economic acceleration (1980 to the present)As China awakened from its decades-old period of semi-isolation, the country was boosted by internal reforms, growing Taiwanese and foreign investments, and the dramatic expansion of its workforce. China once more turned toward Africa, now looking to the continent both a source of key resources and as a market for its low-cost consumer goods.(LCA, pp. 111-112)Writer R. Marchal identifies two key events in Sino-African relations. First, the Tiananmen protests in 1989; the spectacle consolidated opposition to what was perceived as the PRCs the violent oppression of demonstrators. Economically developed nations threatened to enforce economic sanctions, while African countries kept silent, either to conceal their own harsh policies or to further their ties with China. Indeed, that was the results as Chinas strengthened its cooperation with African states.(LCA, p111-112) The growing alliance between China and Africa was more and more needed for both sides. Chinas growing industry resulted in a rapidly expanding and seemingly inexhaustible demand for resources.( Meanwhile, in the relative calm ushered in by the end of the cold war, concerns about rights issues in China, furthered isolated the mix of rogue and states.In 1995, Zemin, pushed the pace of economic growth even faster. Under his leadership, China pursued broad reforms with confidence. Zemin declared to Chinese entrepreneurs, out ( Zu chq), encouraging businessmen to conquer world markets( In the late 1990s, Chinese bids were heavily supported by the government and local embassies, with government-owned Eximbank providing needed finances at low rates. The advantages provided by the PCR allowed Chinese enterprises to win many bids on the world market.(PRC officials described the period as a sane adjustment and the sane development of economic and commercial Sino-African relations.( Still, Chinese and African diplomacy continued to invoke the imagery of the past ideological period: the shared history of victimization at the hands of 19th century westerners and the common fight for autonomy and independence.( To those, China added the fight toward progress in a world unfairly dominated by western powers. It is worth noting that in Africa today, strongly government-backed Chinese companies are equally or more successful than many western companies.relations analyst Khanna states that by making massive trade and investment deals with Latin America and Africa, China established its presence as a superpower along with the Union and the States. Chinas rise is demonstrated by its ballooning share of trade in its domestic product. Khanna believes that Chinas consultative style has allowed it to develop political and economic ties with many countries including those viewed as states by western diplomacies.(Waving Goodbye to Hegemony, Parag Khanna)Chinas rise in the world market led the Chinese diaspora in Africa to make contact with relatives in their homeland. Renewed relations created a portal through which African demand for low-price consumers goods could flow.() Chinese businessmen in Africa, with contacts in China, brought in skilled industrial engineers and technicians such as mechanics, electricians, carpenters, to build African industry from the ground up.(LCA, p100)The 1995 official Global declaration and the 2001 Chinese entry into the WTO paved the way for private citizens in China to increasingly connect with, import from, and export to the budding Sino-African markets.Expansion of military presence (1990 to the present)The Chinese military presence in Africa has also increased, particularly since 1990 when China agreed to join in UN peace-keeping responsibilities.( In January 2005, 598 Chinese peace keepers were sent to Liberia. Others were sent to Sahara as part of Operation MINURSO,(CPA) Leone, the Coast and the DRC.( This was a carefully handled andlargely symbolic move, as China did not want to appear as a new colonialist power overly interfering in internal affairs.China has put its weight behind the conflict in Chad. The FUC rebellion, based in Sudan and aiming to overthrow the pro-Taiwan ruler of Chad, Dby, has received Chinese diplomatic support as well as light weapons and Sudanese oil. With Sudan maintaining a pro-Chinese stance, and Chad being pro-Taiwan (and since 2003, an oil producer), China has pursued their interests in replacing Deby with a more pro-China leader. The Chadian coup dtat attempt failed after French intervention, but Deby then switched his support to Beijing, with the apparent defeat becoming a strategic victory for China.(China currently has military alliances with 6 African states, 4 of which are major oil suppliers: Sudan, Algeria, Nigeria and Egypt.( On the whole, however, Chinas influence remains limited,( especially when compared with Western powers such France, whose military involvement in the Ivory Coast conflict and the Chad conflict was significant. China is particularly unable to compete with the ex-colonial powers in providing military training and educational programs, given the latters continuing ties via military academies like Sandhurst in the UK and Saint Cyr in France.(Effects of the global economic downturn (2007 to the present)Since 2009, a switch has been noticed in Chinas approach to Africa. The new tack has been to underline long term stability in light of the world wide economic crisis.()A $1 billion Guinean dam project has been stalled by Chinese following the Guinean coup of late 2008 and resulting unrest.( Worried about long term economic health, Chinese investors have been looking for less risky places to invest, like Zambia and Liberia, which have a stronger social order.Some major projects get stopped, such as in Angola, where 2/3 of a US$4 billion CIF fund disappeared, it is unclear where this money went.(FTT, p4.2: Pros and Cons.)(LCA, p305-06) Following this, a major Chinese-backed oil refinery project was scrapped by Angolan officials, with unclear reasons, causing problems for Sino-Angolan relations. China may be learning the risks of sending money to Africa.(As raw material prices fall through the global recession, the negotiating position of African countries is sharply weakened, while expected profits intended to repay Chinese loans are collapsing. As a consequence, tensions have increased: China is more worried about the risk of default, while African countries fear servicing their debt over the long term of their loans.Overview of tradeChinese world trade has grown rapidly over the last decades. Total trade was roughly $100 US billion in 1990, 500 billion in 2000, 850 billion in 2004, 1400 billion in 2005, and 2200 billion in 2007. Thats computes to an over 20-fold increase in under 20 years and an annualized growth rate of nearly 18%. More remarkably, the vast majority of Chinas growth has taken place in the past decade; in other words, not only is the size of Chinas trade growing, the rate of the growth is accelerating. Thanks to the decades-old Chinese diaspora, the economic dynamism of PRC embassies, Chinas low-cost manufacturing industry, an efficient export engine, and an exchange rate that until 2010 has been held deliberately low, Chinas global trade has thrived.(CRW)In context of Chinas total trade, Africa actually comprises only a small part. In 2007, Sino-African trade rose $73b, 3.4% of Chinas $2173b total, far lower than the EU ($356b, 16.4%), the USA ($302b, 13.9%), and Japan ($236b, 10.9%).(CEC, p9-14 (+ personal calculs for percentages))Meanwhile, China represents Africas main promise. China was Africas 2nd largest trade partner as of 2008 and is expected to overtake the US, France, and the UK as Africas biggest trading partner by 2010.(Chinese exports to AfricaThe Chinese diaspora first reactivated its familial links in order to import low-priced goods such cups, forks, and umbrellas to Africa( Indeed, African society has a screaming need for cheap goods in large quantities. Chinas manufacturing industry is truly complementary to African markets, often producing more cheaply than most African manufacturerss can, and with better quality.( Cheap Chinese clothes,(FTT, p2) and cheap Chinese cars at half the price of western ones allow African customers to suddenly raise up the purchasing power.(In Africa, China may sell its own low quality or overproduced goods and inventory,( a key outlet which helps maintain Chinas economic and social stability. Chinese shopowners in Africa are able to sell Chinese-built, Chinese-shipped goods for a profit. A negative consequence of Chinas low-cost consumer goods trade is that it only goes one way. China does not purchase manufactured products from Africa,( while cheap Chinese imports flood the local marketplace, making it difficult for local industries to compete.(APG, p9)A noticeable case is the Chinese textile industry, which has hit Africa like a tsunami. In many countries, textiles are one of the first manufacturing industries to develop, but the African textile industry has been crippled by competition( The negative consequences are not easily resolved: African consumers give praise to Chinese textiles, and they are often the first clothes they can afford to buy new; yet local manufactures are badly wounded, raising opposition and concern over the loss of local jobs.Africa is seen by Chinese businessmen as 900 million potential customers in a fast-growing market,.( Perhaps more importantly, African societies are far from saturation, like their Western counterparts. Thus, in Africa, China finds not only an ample supply of potential new customers but far less competition from other nations.African exports to ChinaIn the other direction, Chinas growing thirst for raw materials lead African state-owned enterprises to the country them natural resources, such wood and minerals (like those from the Gabonese forests). By the end of the 90s, China had become interested in African oil, too.Over time, African laws adapted to Chinas demand, laws intended to force the local transformation of raw materials for export. This led to a new kind of manufacturing in Africa, managed by the Chinese, with African workers producing exports for Chinese, as well as European, American and Japanese customers.( African leaders have pursued an increase of the share of raw material transformation both to add value to their exports and to provide manufacturing jobs for local Africans.Chinas oil purchases have raised oil prices, boosting the government revenues of oil exporters like Angola, Gabon and Nigeria, while hurting the other oil-importing African countries. At the same time, Chinas raw materials purchases have increased prices for copper, timber, and nickel, which benefits many African countries as well.(While African growth from 2000 to 2005 averaged 4.7% per year, almost twice the growth has come from petroleum-exporting countries (2005: 7.4%; 2006: 6.7%; 2007: 9.1%) than from petroleum-importing countries (2005: 4.5%; 2006: 4.8%; 2007: 4.5%).(InfrastructureFor years, business in Africa was hampered by poor transportation between countries and regions.(FTT, p3.1) Chinese-African associations have worked towards ending this unproductive situation. China provides infrastructure funding and workforce in exchange for immediate preferential relations including lower resource prices or shares of African resources. As a secondary effect, this infrastructure allows Africa to increase its production and exports, improve the quality of life and increase the condition of millions of Africans, who will one day become as many millions of potential buyers of Chinese goods.The recent Sino-Angolan association is illustrative. When a petroleum-rich area called for investment and rebuilding, China advanced a $5 billion loan to be repaid in oil. They sent Chinese technicians, fixing a large part of the electrical system, and leading a part of the reconstruction. In the short term Angola benefits from Chinese-built roads, hospitals, schools, hotels, football stadiums, shopping centers and telecommunications projects.((APG, p10) In turn, Angola mortgaged future oil production of a valuable, non-renewable resource. It may turn out to be a costly trade for Angola, but their needs for infrastructure is immediate and that is precisely what China provideds when no one else is willing to do so. And thusly, Angola has become Chinas leading energy supplier.(China also plan to establish five economic zones in Africa, zones where the Chinese government will create the enabling environment into which Chinese companies can follow.(Chinese banksThe Export-Import Bank of China (Eximbank) is a government bank under direct leadership of the State Council, acting both in China and overseas. For its oversea actions, EximBank has hundreds of offices across the world, with three key representatives in Paris, Petersburg, and Johannesburg.(China EximBank (introduction)) The bank is a major force in Chinese foreign trade, aiming to catalyze import-export initiatives.Eximbank offers enterprises and allies a complete set of financial products. Low-rate loans and associations with skilled Chinese building companies are guided towards building or rebuilding local infrastructure, equipment, and offshore stations which meet a dual Chinese and African interest.( EximBank can provide loans for roads, railroads, electric and systems, pipelines, hospitals and various other needed facilities. It is the sole lending bank for Chinese Government Concessional Loans entrusted by the Chinese Government.The bank officially aims to promote the development of Chinese export-oriented economy, to help provide China with raw materials, and facilitate the selling of Chinese goods abroad .( EximBank helps to invest in underdeveloped African countries, allowing them to both produce and export more raw materials to Chinese industries, and to allowing African societies to expand their own markets.( In 2006, EximBank alone pledged $20 billion in development funds for 2007 through 2010, more than all western funding. Several other Chinese bank also provide African governments and enterprises with similar agreements. China has shown itself to be more competitive, less bureaucratic, and better adapted to doing business in Africa.(  Between 2009 and 2010 China Development Bank (CDB) and Eximbank publicly offered around US$110 bn worth of loans to emerging markets.  Beating the World Banks record of offering just over US$100 bn between 2008 to 2010.()Chinese embassiesThe Chinese government helps, by all possible means, providing information, legal counsel, low-rate loans, and upon return to China, cheaper land in return for all the services provided to the Chinese nation in Africa.(LCA, p64-66) PRC embassies are full-time supporters of Chinese economic progress in Africa, widely using the numerous and well-organized pioneer Chinese businessmen of the diaspora. The Chinese government, well informed by these local businessmen about regional conditions, is equipped with thousands of skilled engineers and workers ready to leave China, as well as by experienced banks (i.e. EximBank) and large reserves of US dollars (as of 2008: approximately 1.4 trillion).(LCA, p316) The Chinese government is thus ready for taking on large scale investments and projects, and if approved, to lead them to completion.In pursuing economic progress in Africa, the Chinese diaspora and Chinese producers have been actively assisted by PRC embassies. Michel and Beuret note that PRC embassies and local Chinese businessmen have frequent meetings and actively provide mutual assistances and information. For Africans requesting PRC Visas for China, the embassy may request further information about the local businessmen often about his wealth. When confirmed, the African businessmen or consumer quickly gets a Visa agreement.Large infrastructure projects* Nigeria: railway Lagos-Kano, US$ 8.3b, 11,000 Chinese workers; Mambilla plateau, 2.600 MW hydro-electric central ;(* Angola and Zambia: the vital railway line built with the British and linking Zambia and RDCs copper mines to Angolas Atlantic port of Lobito, was to be rebuilt by the Chinese company CIF (the project was canceled after US$3b disappeared). China is the world largest consumer of copper;((APG, p4)* Guinea: 2006, a free of charge industrial packtage including: one mine, one dam, one hydroelectric central, one railway, and one refinery was proposed to the Guinea bauxite/aluminum industry by China, funded by the EximBank, which will get repaid by purchasing alumina at apreferential price.(LCA, 23-24)* Algeria: a 1,000 km freeway built by Chinese workers.(LCA, p32)* Tanzania and Zambia: decades ago, the 1860 km Tanzam railway is completed in 1976, with 47 bridges and 18 tunnel made by 50,000 Chinese workers.(LCA, p110)* Sudan: pipeline and oilfields; Port Sudan completed within 2 years.(* Congo: barrage dImboulou.(LCA, p325)ArmsChinese arms show up across the African continent from Liberia to Somalia. The Peoples Liberation Army (PLA) was allowed to sell weapons in the 80s and created several export enterprises, most notably, Norinco, Xingxing, and Group, which have sold weapons to rogue states such as Sudan and Zimbabwe, while Chinese weapons were used in Congo, Tanzania, Rwanda, Chad, and Liberia.(These trades appear to be mostly small arms sales to middlemen arms dealers who in turn sell to both governments and rebels in Africa. The available evidence suggests these amounts are not major, especially compared to the U.S. supply of nearly 50% of the worlds weapons, and that the direct leverage of the Peoples Liberation Army or the civilian ministries is modest in most African conflicts. The International Peace Research Institute estimates Chinas 2000-2004 unpublished arms exports at about $ 1.4b, and US exports at about $25.9b. A 2005 UN arms destruction operation in Congo reported that 17% of them were Chinese made, while the remaining 83% came from other manufacturers.( China also disagrees to sell weapons to unrecognized countries. According to Dr. Wilson, on the whole, arms sales have been the least significant factor relative to other instruments of Chinas statecraft.(CRW)On the other hand, Chinese arms supplies may be underestimated, both because part of these weapons come to Africa via indirect ways, or through uncounted exchanges of arms for raw materials, or because Chinese sales numbers are biased downwards. In Liberia, from 2001 to 2003, against a UN weapon embargo, Chinese weapons were purchased by Van Kouwenhoven, from the Netherlands, to supply Charles Taylors army in exchange for lumber.() In Zimbabwe, Mugabe bought $240m of weapons, while Sudan received civil helicopters and planes which were later militarized on site.(Further, Chinese arms are basically low cost items, sold in large quantities for relatively low costs: machetes, low-priced assault rifles like the 56, or the QLZ87 launcher.(LCA, pp221-235 - arms) These items have a far lower value than a single jetfighter or attack helicopter sold by the US but can kill far more people. That is what happened during the 1994 genocide, with large quantities of Made in China machetes. Those light weapons, when supplied in large quantities, become a tool of mass destruction.(Natural resourcesChinas energy policyAs a result of Soviet technology-sharing through the mid 1960s and internal reserves such the oil field, the PRC became oil sufficient in 1963.(CES, p39-40) Chinese ideology and the US-led embargo, however, isolated the Chinese oil industry from 1950 to 1970 preventing their evolution into powerful multinational companies.( Chinese oil exports peaked in 1985, but rapid post-Communist economic reforms and an internal increase in oil demand brought China into an oil deficit, becoming a net oil importer in 1993, and a net crude importer in 1996,( a trend which is accelerating.(CES, p41) Indeed, Chinese reserves, such as the Tarim basin, have proven both difficult to extract and difficult to transport toward Chinese coastal provinces where energy demand is centered. Pipeline construction, as well as processing facilities, lag behind demand.(IEA, p71-73)Through the end of the 20th century, China has been working to establish long-term security. Achieving this goal has required investment in oil and gas fields abroad, diversifying energy resource providers, and incorporating non-traditional energy sources like nuclear, solar and other renewables.(CQE, p12-15)The rapid expansion of overseas activities by Chinas energy companies has been driven by the needs of both government and the PRCs National Oil Companies (NOC), which have worked in an uncommonly close partnership to increase overseas production of oil and gas.() Together, they gained access to projects of strategic importance in African nations like Sudan and Nigeria in the 90s, while leaving smaller opportunities to the companies alone.(Chinese actions in these areas have not always been successful: The 2006 agreement in Rwanda proved unproductive, while Guinean oil technologies were not familiar to Chinese companies.( The expansion has also been limited: all together, Chinese oil companies produced 257,000 bd in Africa in 2005just one third of the leader ExxonMobil aloneand just 2% of Africas total oil reserves.(Moreover, Chinas arrival on the world oil scene has been perturbing for established players. China has been attacked for its increasingly close relationship with rogue states, such as Sudan and Angola, countries known for their human rights abuses, political censorship, and widespread corruption.(CES, p47-49) Chinas world image has suffered from the critiques, leading the nation to move to a more diplomatic approach, avoiding crisis areas, such the Delta.( Nevertheless, as a consumer country and budding powerhouse,(CES, p48) China has little choice in choosing its source of supply.(CES, p53)Chinese access to international oil markets has satisfied the countrys immediate thirst. But despite its large coal-based energy system, China is a key part of the vicious cycle which had led to increasing oil prices worldwideto the disadvantage of all industrialized and oil importing countries, including China itself.(CES, p44-45 - China making 40% of the 2004 oil consummation increase) In 2006, China imported 47% of its total oil consumption (145 Mt of crude oil).(Chinas oil imports set new record)(Chinas 2006 crude oil imports 145 mln tons, up 14.5% - customs) With such high demand, Chinese companies such as Sinopec, CNPC, and CNOOC, have looked to Africa for oil.African natural resource exportsAfrica is the 2nd largest continent in the world, with 30 million square kilometers of land, and contains a vast quantity of natural resources. This trait, together with the continents relatively low population density and small manufacturing sector has made Africa a key target for Chinese imports.Africa ranks first or second in abundance globally for the following minerals: bauxite, cobalt, diamonds, phosphate rocks, group metals, vermiculite, and zirconium.(MIA, p1.1) Many other minerals are also present in high quantities.Many African countries are highly dependent on such exports. Mineral fuels (coal, petroleum) account for more than 90% of the export earnings for: Algeria, Equatorial Guinea, Libya, and Nigeria.( Various Minerals account for 80% for Botswana (led by, in order of value, diamond, copper, nickel, soda ash, and gold), Congo (petroleum), Congo (diamond, petroleum, cobalt, and copper), Gabon (petroleum and manganese), Guinea (bauxite, alumina, gold, and diamond), Sierra Leone (diamond), and Sudan (petroleum and gold). Minerals and mineral fuels accounted for more than 50% of the export earnings of Mali (gold), Mauritania (iron ore), Mozambique (aluminum), Namibia (diamond, uranium, gold, and zinc), and Zambia (copper and cobalt).(Ongoing mining projects of more than $1 billion are taking place in South Africa (platinum, gold), Guinea (bauxite, aluminum), Madagascar (nickel), Mozambique (coal), Congo and Zambia (cobalt, copper), Nigeria and Sudan (crude petroleum), and Senegal (iron).OilAfrica produced about 10.7 Mbpd of oil in 2005, 12% of the 84 Mbpd produced worldwide.(CIA.gov, World Facts Book > Oil exporters.) Around one half of that is produced in north Africa, which has preferential trade agreements with Europe.(MIA p1.7) The sub-Saharan oil producers include by global rank and Mbpd: Nigeria (13th; 2.35Mbpd), Angola (16th; 1.91Mbpd), Sudan (31st; .47Mbpd). Guinea (33rd), Congo (38th), and Chad (45th) also have notable oil output.(In 2005, 35% of exported African oil went to the EU, 32% to the USA, 10% to China, while 1% of African gas goes to other parts of Asia.( North African preferentially exporting its oil to western countries : EU 64%; US 18%; all others 18%.( 60% of African wood goes to China, where it is manufactured, and then sell across the world.(As of 2007, thanks to good diplomatic relations and recent growth, Africa provides 30% of Chinas oil needs,(LCA, p36) with Sudaneses oil account for 10 of these 30 points.(LCA, p11-12)Major projectsChinese companies have recently increased their activity worldwide. Specifically in Africa, notable cases are:* Sudan. In 1997 CNPCs Great Wall Drilling Company agreed to buy a 40% stake in the $1.7 Greater Nile Petroleom Operating Company, contract renewed and expanded in 2000 ;((CIR, p81-83) CNPC owns most of a field in south Darfour and 41% of a field in Basin, expected to produce 300,000 bpd in 2006; Sinopec is erecting a pipeline, building a tanker terminal in Port-Sudan.( 60% of Sudans oil output goes to China;(FTT, p6.1: Beijing learns to tread warily.) since the 90s, China has invested $15b, mainly in oil infrastructure.(* Nigeria. In 1998 CNPC bought two oil blocks in the Niger delta;( in 2005, four blocks, together with other companies, in exchange for a hydropower plant in Mambila with 1,000 MW capacity and a taking controlling stake in 1,100,000 bpd from the Kaduna refinery;( CNOOC has paid $2.7b for a rich oil block.(* Angola. Proposal for a $5 billion loan for oil-related and structural infrastructcure for post-war rebuilding, to be repaid in oil;(APG, p1)( Sinopec owns 50% of Angola BP-operated plutonio project.(* Gabon. In 2004 Feb, China signed a technical evaluation agreement with the Gabonese oil ministry for 3 onshore fields.(Similar or greater projects are taking place in Middle East and Latin America, one Sino-Iranian deal having an estimate value of US$ 70 billions.Macroeconomic and political strategyChina, once in need of international recognition and now in need of raw materials, has walked carefully and humbly towards Africa. The dynamic evolved into what is now called the Beijing Consensus, Chinas soft diplomatic policy, entailing a strict respect for African sovereignty and a hands-off approach to internal issues. In short: loans and infrastructure without any political strings about democracy, transparency, or human rights attached.(Chinas non-interference model gives African leaders more freedom and the opportunity to work for immediate economic development. With China, controversial African leaders face a second or third chance to join in international partnerships this time with a successful third world nation; many of the excuses about Western domination which had previously been used to justify Africas lack of growth can no longer be made.To the West, Chinas approach threatens the promotion of democracy, transparency, liberalism and free trade, engaging instead with authoritarianism, economic development at the expense of civil progress, and strengthened ties between political and economic elites over of broad social change.The arrival of a new actor in Africa has lead Westerners to review their own strategies as they analyze Chinese actions in Africa. The Western respones may ultimately aid Africa, as think tanks provide strategic analysis on how African elites can get squeeze more out of Chinese investments.(Leveraging the Dragon: Towards An Africa That Can Say No, 2005, Mar. 1st.)Indeed, its clearly in the interest of Africa to play one side against the other, and to avoid alliances between China and the West, which might work to decrease raw material prices.(COR, pp.17-18) Legal power remains in the hands of local African elites, who may or may not decide to enforce laws which would tighten control of resources, or further exploit them. Pursuing democracy and transparency is no longer the sole model;( development is, for sure, and as long as African leaders can provide it, their power will be that much assured.Competition with TaiwanThe Republic of China (ROC), commonly known as Taiwan, is a fierce diplomatic rival of the Republic of China. Following the Civil War, both claimed to be the legitimate representative of China on the world scene. At that time, the USSR supported the PRC, while the United States backed ROC, which thus held the Chinese security councils seat along with its high visibility and veto power. In 1971, after a complex struggle, the split of the 1960s led the United States to offer the UN security council seat to the PRC, thus excluding ROC-Taiwan from the diplomatic scene.Many countries followed the US move. Yet Taiwans strengthening economy in the 1970s and 1980s allowed the country to keep some strongholds across the world, which supported ROCs diplomatic claim to the UN. As the PRC grew in power, Taiwan was only able to keep smaller supporters, mainly in the Pacific islands, Latin America, and Africa.In the 1990s, the political power-play between Taiwan and China often spurred investment in Africa, with a number of large-scale projects seeking to garner influence and recognition.(FTT, p6, Senegals president Wades article.)Nowadays, the balance of power in terms of African friendship seems to be in favour of the PRC. Taiwanese investments in Africa are about $500 million a year, while Chinese Eximbank alone is approaching $20 billion over 3 years.(LCA, p315-)Several Senegalese projects were funded by Taiwan in May 2005, as part of a 5-year plan including $120 million. But soon after the bank transfer was completed, Senegal moved to support the PRC, and a development based on free market and fair bids.( Wade, the president of Senegal also wrote to the ROCs president, saying, Between countries, there is not friendship, just interests.(LCA, p313)The last oil producer allied to Taiwan was Chad. But in April 2006, a PRC-Sudan backed coup dtat attempt came close to overthrowing the pro-Taiwanese leader, Deby. The effort was eventually stopped by French military intervention. Deby first looked for Taiwanese loans to enhance its military strength. Taiwan was unable to provide the $2 billion which had been requested, and Deby switched to recognising the PRC, thus weakening the coup and strengthening himself.(LCA, p221-224) Today, four countries in Africa recognize ROC-Taiwan.Beijing ConsensusWesterners and Chinese have different approaches to the African resource market and how to develop it. The Western approach is summarized under the Consensus in which human rights have been an important factor. The Chinese approach is summarized under the Consensus. In order of importance, Beijings approach can be summarized as follows:Non-interference. The PRC offers trade with no strings attached. The Beijing consensus says: If you are an African country and you have a raw material that China wants, then China will do business with you, no matter what the West thinks of your government or your human rights record.( Two countries that stand out as examples of places where Beijing has intimate dealings but where governance does not exist are Angola and Sudan.(COD, p946)Structural development. Chinas involvement focuses on developing important infrastructure.(CHD) Throughout Africa, Chinese companies are busy building hospitals, dams, government offices, and stadiums and refurbishing facilities abandoned by western companies,(COD, p651) with the stated objective to improve African productivity. Chinas newly developed work force can provide large numbers of engineers, technicians, and specialized workers at low cost, something that Western countries cannot or are reluctant to do. This provides China with a competitive advantage over Western competitors. Most importantly, these infrastructure projects are often paid for with African oil.Friendship and Respect. China has cultivated a dynamic of mutual respect in its foreign relations, respecting the domestic choices which its African partners make. This approach explains their non-interference policy. Primarily, Chinas presence in Africa focuses on its own needs. Second, Chinese culture strongly encourages respect for both ones leaders and ones followers, emphasizing that respect improves relationships and leads to success. Lastly, Chinese culture sees each individual as responsible for its own fate. Thus, African quality of life is not Chinas responsibility.Chinese model of development. China also operates under the influence of its own development history, which first focused on economic development, planning civic development only after. In Chinas approach, the Democracy first model touted by the West is not a universal model, and African countries may follow another path: the Chinese one. Infrastructures first, then economic reform; after which, civic reforms may come.African integrationEfforts have been made toward stronger economic integration in Africa. In 2002, the Union was formally launched to accelerate socio-economic integration and promote peace, security, and stability on the continent.(MIA, introduction) The Partnership for Africas Development (NEPAD) was also created by pro-democracy African states, headed by South Africa. Ian Taylor, an expert of Sino-African relations, wrote, NEPAD has succeeded in placing the question of Africas development on the international table and claims to be a political and economic program aimed at promoting democracy, stability, good governance, human rights and economic development on the continent. Despite its faults, NEPAD is at least Africa-owned and has a certain degree of buy-in.Taylor concludes: Chinas oil diplomacy threatens to reintroduce practices as corruption, human rights abuses that NEPAD (and the African Union for that matter) are ostensibly seeking to move away fromeven though China protests that it fully supports NEPAD(COD) A Chinese-lead on China-Africa Cooperation has been created, where Chinese and African partners meet every 3 years, both to strengthen alliances, sign contracts, and to make important announcements. The forum also helps African leaders to gain legitimacy in their own countries.China and the resource shortage hypothesisKey reasons of Chinas interest on Africa are to be found in China itself. Chinese economy, industry, energy and society have a special shape. Chinese economy and industry turn toward export markets.(COD, p 937) These industries and associated works and investment provide the Chinese society the recent two-digit yearly economic growth, job chances, and life standard improvement, but dramatically rely on coal (70%) and oil (25%) sources (for 2003),(CEN, p 4) as well as raw materials. Notable are the frequent electric shortages. A US Congress hearing noticed that energy shortages have already led to rationing of the electric supply, slowing down manufacturing sector and consequently overall economic growth.(CEN, p 1) On other raw materials side, China simply does not have enough natural resources of its own to meet its growing industrial need.(CAM)Within the China economic success story, western scholars noticed that Chinas quest of wealth has once more led coastal provinces to quickly enrich, while inland provinces or rural areas stay relatively poor, an inequality which thus leads to internal social tensions and instability.(Friedman, G (2009)The Next 100 Years: A Forecast for the 21st Century, Doubleday ISBN 9780385517058) Recent economic growth helped to stabilize the Chinese society: in times of economic growth, individuals look simply for personal life improvement. Millions of poor farmers and workers work hard and silently in hope of a better lives tomorrow; they want to buy TVs, computers, cellphones, cars, fridges. To keep them happy and stable, China have to stay largely supplied in raw materials - oil, copper, zinc, cobalt - from abroad.( Also, driven by this politico-economic desire to obtain sources of raw materials and energy for Chinas continuing economic growth and open up new export markets,China is actively looking for African resources of every kind: oil, cobalt, copper, bauxite, uranium, aluminium, manganese, iron ore etc.((COD, p937-938) African resources feed Chinese industries hunger for minerals and electricity, fuel its economic boom, and thus keep the countrys consumers happy and quiet.(For the Communist Party, enough supply of minerals means social stability. Like other power, China needs to supply its industry with raw materials, and its citizen in goods to keep them happy.( Out of energy and raw materials shortage, analysts also notice that long-term factors threatening Chinas growth questions over its innovation capability, corruption and inefficiency, and environmental risks.CriticismFears of colonialismAfter enduring several centuries of European colonization, fears that African means of production and resources are now being taken over by the Chinese government and its industrial companies are often raised by critics of Chinas economic policy. Acute concerns have been raised about Chinas involvement in Darfur. And some have argued that Chinas overtures in Africa have been inspired by an impulse to settle parts of the country;() the Chinese government has already sent nearly a million people (POV) to Africa.As with previous Western involvement in Africa, forging close ties with local elites has been a key strategy for Chinese diplomats and businessmen.( It has been noted that when new leaders come to power in Africa, they will quickly launch a maximum of new projects states money to get personal commissions immediately, all this is decided in a short time, and we are ready.(LCA, p72)In Angola, a country weakened by years of conflict, and now notable for its institutional corruption,() China has proposed low-cost loans (1.5%), to be paid back in oil.(COD, p946-951) For the elite of Angola, unlike other investors, China does not insist on transparent accounting or the assurance good governance.(APG, p5) The long-term consequences for African democracy may be serious. As noted in a South African newspaper, Chinas no-strings-attached buy-in to major oil producers, such as Angola, will undermine efforts by Western governments to pressure them to open their oil books to public scrutiny.(China also sells arms in order to cement relationships with some African leaders. Sudan, Equatorial Guinea, Ethiopia, Eritrea, Burundi, Tanzania, and Zimbabwe are examples of countries which receive arms in shipments sometimes labeled as agricultural equipment. Because China doesnt advocate against human rights concerns when dealing with Africa, it will sell military hardware and weapons with little discretion. Meanwhile, Chinese advisors assist their African military counterparts.Human rightsCases of human rights abuses have arisen from Chinese-African co-operation. African workers have protested against ill-treatment and poor pay by Chinese companies, as well as the influx of Chinese workers who take away local jobs. In July 2010, hundreds of African workers at a Chinese-owned Zambian mine rioted over low wages.(LCA, p. 37)In the Republic of Congo, Chinese contracts are said to be 30% cheaper than Western ones. African workers, however complain of worsening conditions: Chinese firms hire them on a day-to-day basis, with lower wages than they received from Westerner firms, are insulting or even racist, and enforce strict working conditions.(LCAtv) African businessmen have long complained of an increase in Chinese businesses, especially in Senegal. Some Angolans had complained that along with the shipment of machinery and cement, China also imports many of its own nationals to work on these reconstruction projects, leaving little employment for locals, and not allowing for cooperative working relations or the transfer of knowledge and skills.(APG, p 3)In the factories of Congo, the Chinese work 12 hours a day, six days a week, maintaining machinery on Sundays.( Such high activity is also expected from African workers, sometimes creating tensions between groups.There are typically two kinds of Chinese organizations operating in Africa: firms transforming African resources in which the bosses, managers, and technicians are Chinese, the workers are African, and the customers are Europeans, Americans, and Japanese; and firms selling to African markets in which the bosses and managers are Chinese, the sellers are Chinese, and the customers are African.Both types create social tensions, economic conflict with local enterprises, lower short-term employment prospects for Africans, and an apparent ethnic hierarchy within the firms .In Angola, like elsewhere in Africa, Chinese workers live separately from native Africans, especially in large-scale work led by Chinese enterprises, where Chinese camps are specially built, exaggerating linguistic and cultural difficulties between workers.(APG, p 6)Disruption of African manufacturingOne contentious issue is the effect which large amounts of Chinese goods are having on local light manufacturing. While the dominant resource extraction industries are largely benefiting from Chinese capital investment, growing imports from China to many African nations underprice and crowd out local suppliers.(CB5, Thompson, p1-4) Though Chinese imports allow poorer consumers to buy their first refrigerator, T-shirt, suitcases, or microwave ovens, they also hurt nascent local industries in countries trying to end reliance on resource commodities. By one interpretation, Chinese textile imports have caused 80% of Nigerian factories to shut down, resulting in 250,000 workers losing their jobs.(In Zambia, trade minister M. Patel complains: we industries are simply not competitive in the way we produce goods. In a post War, WTO-oriented Africa, consumer goods manufacturers never recovered from the first wave of Chinese products.( Basic African factories cannot compete with the Chinese in terms of productivity or quality.(Resource curse hypothesisIn recent decades researchers have considered a link between the natural resource abundance of a country and adverse consequences for economic growth and government functioning. This trend seems especially common for countries with point source minerals such as mines and oil fields, which create large profits for few people. Compared to agricultural resources, which offer diffuse development requiring large quantities of workers and distributing the benefits more widely, point source minerals have the potential to stifle the socioeconomic development of a nation.(MRE, p0-3)Evidence has been provided by Sachs & Warner, 2001 that establishes:Taylor notes that Chinas blind support of the African elite in a resource-abundant country may worsen the resource curses, by encouraging elites to tighten their control resources and damage other economic sectors. Such arrangements may be in the short term interest of Beijing, who often want to keep importing low cost raw materials from abroad, and manufacture them in China.(COD, p951-952)The notion of a curse may be misleading, as countries do have choice, and the development of natural resources sector is shaped by a host of government policies. Wright & Czelusta note 6 relevant policy issues:# infrastructure of public knowledge (e.g., geological surveys);# engineering education;# systems of exploration concessions and property rights for mineral resources;# export and import controls;# supporting infrastructure (such as transportation);# targeted taxes or royalties.(MRE, p3)Chinese investments focus on infrastructure, the 5th point. The remaining five, however, are largely in the hands of African elites.African fishermen complain of Chinese industrialised fishing, coming as close as one miles off the coast, depleting fish stocks, and interfering with villagers fishing nets for whom fishing is the main income source.( Western pro-Forest NGO complains of Chinese specific disdain for environment.(Regulatory responseGiven current global growth, African leaders are looking to first build up infrastructure, but are also increasingly aware of the need to strengthen native industries and economies. Following their experience with western involvement and the current world dynamic of growing demand for raw materials, African states are attempting to mitigate a possible repeat of exploitation under the Chinese with efforts to encourage local, long term development.Examples are:See also* relations* on China-Africa Cooperation* Foreign relations of PRC* Foreign relations of ROC* of the Peoples Republic of China* of Africa* industry of AfricaReferencesNot used but may be interesting to check :  ; Transarms.org ; Further readingChina in Africa (multi-issues papers)* LCA : :(English version: ):>LCAtv : , 52min. ; LCApdf : quotes* CIA : * CB5 : , which include::> CHD : :> :> * CIR : , see table p81 & 83.* CPA : Chinas presence in Africa, China perspective, 2005.Chinese trade in Africa* ABD : * CRW : * FTT : African oil and Chinas needs* COD : * CRD : * CGA : * COR : * ICE : * CQC : * MIA : * CAM: Economy and trade* CEC : * MRE: * EXIM : China EximBank (introduction) (Export-Import Bank of China) - the major Chinese government owned bank acting in Africa, for loans-for-raw materials and other financial agreements.* APG : BBC news, In pictures: China in Angola (Picture Gallery), pages: 1; 2; 3; 4; 5; 6; 7; 8; 9; 10.World oil and Chinese energy needs* CED : * USC: * IEA : * CQE : * CGQ : * CES : Miscellanea* WEO : * BLA : External links* China Safari: On The Trail of Beijings Expansion in Africa - video by Democracy Now!* Interactive Map: China in Africa PBS WIDE ANGLE* Chinas Emerging Role in Africa: A Strategic Overview, by Jerker Hellstrm, Swedish Defence Research Agency (FOI), 2009Herri Errepublikaren eragina Afrikan
22808640
Stag_Flat,_California
Stag Flat is a former settlement and mining camp in El Dorado County, California.() It was located  south of Spanish Flat.(References
22825630
Blue_Water_Council
See also: in Michigan#Blue Water CouncilBlue Water Council #277 http://www.bwcbsa.org is a Scouts of America Council based out of Huron, Michigan. The Council was Established in 1919 to serve scouts in the Port Huron Area, and was officially granted permission in 1928 to serve scouts in the St. Clair and Sanilac County area.Blue Water Council is the smallest council in the State of Michigan, and is one of, if not the smallest in the nation. Yet, the small council is considered the most stable in Michigan, both membership and fiscally.(http://www.thetimesherald.com/article/20110814/OPINION02/108140319&themeCONNELL/Mike-Connell-Scouting-wrapping-up-first-century) The original council camp was located along North River Road in Township, Michigan. The Council also operated Camp Loyalty for a short time in the 1930s, which was located south of Michigan. In 1942, the family of Crowswell Businessman Philip Graham donated property along the Black River in Sanilac County to Blue Water Council. The property was known Camp Chickagami, named after the the Councils of the Arrow lodge that was established just one year earlier. Camp Chickagami was located 2 miles north of Michigan, and is now a county park by the name of P.L. Graham Memorial Park. In 1948, the councils camp moved downriver to the current Silver Trails Scout Reservation in Michigan.Silver TrailsSilver Trails Scout Reservation http://www.bwcbsa.org/silvertrails.php is located near Michigan, south of Croswell, and about  northwest of Port Huron. The Boy Scout Camp is settled along the banks of the Black River and the Silver Creek. Silver Trails has  that can be explored and hiked. There are five all year cabins and three Adirondacks (3 sided structures). Silver Trails has a total of 14 campsites; some are not open all year long, and some are more remote than others, there are also 3 adirondacks(three sided-lean toos). Most of the councils money comes from renting land on the camp property to a gravel mining company. This quarry is running out of stone, and an artificial lake is proposed to be built out of the empty pit. The lake is planned to be built by 2012.Annual events at Silver Trails include a spring and fall camporee for Scouts; mom and me, and dad and lad for Scouts, and a spring and fall conclave for the of the Arrow. Silver Trails has been host to both the 2005 and 2011 Section C-2A Conclaves of the Order of the Arrow. Districts*Three Rivers (St. Clair County South of Port Huron) Troops in the 200s*Black River Basin (Northern St. Clair & Sanilac County Area) Troops in the 100s and 300sChickagami Lodge 180Chickagami Lodge #180 of the of the Arrow has faithfully served the Blue Water Council since 1941.  The Lodge has no chapters and hosts bi-annual conclaves at Silver Trails Scout Reservation. The lodge is a member of Section C-2A and meets annually for the Section Conclave.During the 1960s and 1970s, Chickagami Lodge was home to one of the nations best ceremonial dance teams. The Chickagami team competed across the nation for Order of the Arrow competitions. (http://pqasb.pqarchiver.com/thetimesherald/access/2088329081.html?FMTABS&dateJul+22%2C+2010) The lodges totem is the Standing Brave, and a Chicken is the unofficial mascot of Chickagami Lodge. Total membership is 168 members. Chickagami Lodge is the second smallest lodge in the nation, and has the lowest dues in the Central Region due to its trading post located at Silver Trails Scout Reservation. It is the only lodge in the nation that operates its own store. Chickagami Lodge has earned Quality Lodge in 2007, 2008, and 2010. (www.chickagami.org)Notes
22845799
Coylton
Coylton is a village in Ayrshire, Scotland.  It is located  east of Ayr, and  west of Drongan, on the A70. Sundrum Castle Holiday Park is located to the west of the village, in the grounds of Sundrum Castle, which partly dates to the 13th century. A secret passage from the Castle was discovered during renovations and lead through its grounds to the waterfall, however it was sealed as considered too dangerous. A stone stands on top of the Craigs of Kyle near Coylton. It weighs around 30 tons and rest upon two stones. A large standing stone known as Wallaces Stone stands nearby.(Paterson, James (1863). History of the Counties of Ayr and Wigton. Vol. I. - Kyle. James Stillie, Edinburgh. pp.217218.) Professional footballers Getgood (18921970) and Affleck (19121984) were born in Coylton. Coylton was also home to one of Ayrshires celebrated artists. Robert Bryden (18651939) was born in the village. After a period working in Ayr, he became a modeller of bronze busts which are highly regarded. Among his works are bronze portraits of William Wallace and Robert the Bruce in Ayr Town Hall. he also specialised in carved wooded figures, a collection of which are to be found at Rozelle. Bryden is also responsible for the Coylton War Memorial.  In its current form the village has various facilities, including a primary school, activity center, tennis courts, a local shop and a petrol station. Recently there has been the construction of further shops that includes a convenince store, butchers (having moved from George Campbells original store) and a bookmakers. These shops are located on the previous site of Murrays Garage, and the area is aptly named Murray Park. The Coylton Arms, which was recently voted the West FM Pub/Club of the year 2009. History of the Village Coylton is one of the smallest parishes in Ayrshire in geographical sense, but it boasted a sizeable population during the peak of the late 19th and early 20th century mining industry. The parish includes the original settlement or Low Coylton, Upper Coylton or Hillhead, Craighall, Woodside, Rankinston and Joppa. The village is said to take its name from Auld King Coil of Coilsfield but old records have it spelt Quiltoun or Cuilton.The village at the heart of the parish is almost linear, being spread along the length of the Ayr to Cumnock A70 road - which is used by the heavy trucks sustaining the modern open-cast coal mining industry. Low Coylton is the old village with the Coylton Arms and the few remains of an older life, such as the old kirk of possibly medieval origins and last repaired in 1776, plus the former manse dating from 1839 and itself built on the site of the earlier manse. Hillhead has the current parish church, built in 1836, and some houses that were once late 19th century miners row houses. Joppa too has some of the older stone housing. But the entire village has suffered from a number of housing developments seeking to provide homes for people working in Ayr and district.Coylton was once a rural village that was transformed by the development of mining in the area and has changed again with the cessation of all coal mining. The farms, such as that at Duchray, have sustained Ayrs agricultural heritage.The village of Joppa which was reputedly named for an ale-house kept by a man named Hendry. Local lore has it that he fed his customers with salt herrings which became known as Joppa hams. Coylton and Burns An offshoot of the original trysting thorn, immortalised by Robert Burns in  The  Soldiers Return, has been moved from its original site to a spot farther from the road, by  Coylton Burns Club. The thorn which is situated on the   land of   Millmannoch, near  Coylton has. romantic memories for many, couples in the   village of   Coylton and even now the old meeting place of lovers is still popular. The original thorn, which, is known to have been in existence.  Long before Robert Burns time, died in 1916. The tree was left for two years in the hope that it would recover, but  finally it was removed and Mr, J. P. Wilson.  Mr. Wilson who is himself an enthusiastic Burns lover, along with a few helpers, decided to nurture the shoots which began to grow up on the spot where, the old thorn had grown. The shoots sprouted from haws, which had fallen from the parent tree, and the strongest of these was chosen. This shoot flourished but because it was so near the roadway many people, instead, of cutting sprigs from it, broke pieces off. This was gradually killing the  tree and Coylton Burns Club finally decided the if the thorn was to be preserved it would require to be moved farther from the roadway and railed in.This work was carried out by members of the Club and the operation been completed and a verse from The Soldiers Return inscribed inside the railing. The ballad itself was written by Burns long after he left Ayrshire. His reference to the trysting thorn which occurs in the third verse is as follows: -At length I reachd the bonnie glenWhere early life I sported;I passd the mill, an trysting thorn.Where Nancy aft I courted. Coylton Tennis Club A tennis club at Coylton was started in 1927/1928 by the young people of Coylton. Information around this time is rather sketchy. However, during the war years tennis was suspended.In 1946/47 the club appears to have started up once more and seems to have been in quite a healthy state with play one blaes court with the later addition of a club house. Alex Murray (one of the four brothers who owned the local garage), an existing tennis club member, remembers playing tennis in the 50s on this surface. At this time there was a fairly strong membership with about equal numbers of male and female members. National Service, however, meant that many young men were called up and limited information exists about the fate of tennis in Coylton which appears to have been suspended once more.The present club was started by the local postmistress, Mrs. Traynor in 1979 after a lapse of many years. We had one all weather court and a few dedicated adults who negotiated with the local council to arrange playing times on the village court. Junior membership was built up by having weekly coaching from Frank Paul and tournaments every Sunday, open to all the juniors in the village run by Mrs E Ross. Gradually membership and enthusiasm increased and several members became coaches, enabling the club to offer their own junior and senior coaching sessions.In 1982 two new courts were produced by Kyle and Carrick District Council. The club flourished with increased membership and coaches. Despite only having two courts, we entered gents and ladies teams in the Ayrshire league and had to obtain the use of a third court from a local caravan park.(a present annually of a bottle of Scotch sealed the deal!). The introduction of teams at junior level quickly followed with continued success.In the early 90s, the small stone pavilion which we shared with the local football club was extended by means of a donation from the Opencast Mining Company to incorporate a small room enabling us to entertain visiting teams. The main drawback was that this facility could not remain open for the use of members or the dissemination of information.In 1995 a new sports centre was built in Coylton on the site of our existing courts. The club benefited by having three brand new tenni top surface courts with floodlighting which we now lease from South Ayrshire Council and finally the club purchased a portacabin as a club house. In the last couple of years we have built a more permanent structure for our club house and hope to complete this in the near future with all the required facilities.The club continues to flourish with five adult teams and a very strong junior section also participating locally with noted success. We have managed to produce players at district, County, South of Scotland level and also one at national level, who has gone on to become a Scottish coach with Tennis Scotland.See also*Fergus*Loch*Lochend LochReferencesExternal links*Coylton, Gazetteer for Scotland*Coylton, Ayrshire Roots*Sundrum Castle web site*http://www.coyltontennis.org.uk/, Coylton Tennis Club*http://www.genuki.org.uk/big/sct/AYR/Coylton/index.html, History of coyltongd:Coylton
22857637
Dudley_Dean
Dudley S. Dean (ca. 1872 &ndash; September 25, 1950) was an All-American football quarterback for University.  He played quarterback for Harvard from 1888-1890 and was selected as an All-American in 1890.  Dean also fought with the Riders at the of San Juan Hill during the War.College athlete at HarvardA native of Lake Village, New Hampshire, Dean enrolled at University.  While at Harvard, Dean was the quarterback for Harvards varsity football team.  He became famous for his role in Harvards November 1890 football victory over Yalethe first since the schools first met in 1875.  A newspaper account of the game described a touchdown run from midfield by Dean.  Yale had the ball at midfield when Dean broke through past Hall of Famer Heffelfinger and batted the ball out of the hands of the Yale quarterback.  The report noted: The ball bounded beautifully for the now famous Dud.  He caught it as it came up saying, Now Duds your chance.  On the run he was past the Yale backs ... and had a clear field to Yales unprotected goal.()  The report called Dean the hero of the day and concluded as follows:After all has been said, however, about individual players, and a vast deal might be said, the last word should be devoted to Dudley Dean.  If the Harvard victory can be ascribed to one man more than any other, that man is Dean.  His tackling and breaking through were unsurpassed.(At the end of the 1890 season, Dean was selected as the quarterback on the All-American football team.( Consensus All-American designations based on the NCAA guide to football award winners)  Dean also played shortstop and second base for the Harvard baseball team and was captain of that team in 1891.()  His skills as a baseball player were such that he traveled with Spaldings professional baseball tour of England and was paid 4 a week plus expenses.()Military serviceDuring the American War, Dudley enlisted and served with the Riders. In July 1898, after the of San Juan Hill, Dean was one of five members of the regiment mentioned by Roosevelt for bravery on the battlefield.()  In his book, The Rough riders, a history of the First United States volunteer cavalry, Roosevelt named Dean as one of the men whom I noticed as leading in the charges and always being nearest the enemy.()  Upon his return, Dudley told how the Rough Riders had been literally riddled by the murderous fire from ambush.()  He called Gen. Wood and Col. Roosevelt dandies and noted: It is due to them largely that the rough riders came home in better physical condition than most of the volunteers.  Teddy hustled about and saw that food reached us.(  In October 1898, the York World published article titled, Dudley S. Dean, Twice a Hero, which told of his exploits on the gridiron and at the Battle of San Juan Hill:Dudley S. Dean ... is, as his friends express it, twice a hero.  When Col. Roosevelt organized his regiment of Rough Riders, Mr. Dean was one of the first to enlist.  He served throughout the campaign with distinction, and was in the thin brown line that charged up San Juan Hill.  But his run at Springfield Nov. 22, 1890, when Harvard defeated Yale, is what endears him particularly to Harvard football men and the football world in general.  On that occasion Dean ran through the entire Yale team for ninety yards and scored a goal.()During War II, Dean was a lieutenant colonel in the Army Air Forces and was the executive producer of the play Winged Victory, which ran from November 1943 to May 1944.  The play was intended as a morale booster and fundraiser for the Emergency Relief Fund.  The play depicted both the training and work of airmen.Business careerAfter graduating from Harvard, Dudley worked for the El Paso and Western Railroad. He was also a reporter and columnist for the New York World and Globe for a time.  Dean was involved for most of his professional career in the mining business, and the companies with which he was associated had extensive land, lumber and mineral holdings in the Range of northern Michigan.  He was affiliated with the Keweenaw Land Association, Ltd. for more than 50 years.  In 1920, Dean was the treasurer of the Keweenaw Land Association, at which time the company owned  of timber and mineral lands in the copper belt of Michigans Peninsula.()  Dean eventually became the companys president.  He was also the treasurer of the Newport Land Company.  Family and friendsDudleys son, John H. Dean, also played football for Harvard and was captain of the 1933 team.()Dudley became friends with P. Kennedy as the two men spent summers together in Massachusetts.  In 1922, Dudley led an unsuccessful campaign to have Kennedy admitted to the Cohasset Golf Club, and several of his letters lobbying for Kennedys admission were published in the book, The Fitzgeralds and the Kennedys, by Kearns Goodwin.()Dean died at his home in Cohasset at age 79.()()()See also*College Football All-America TeamReferences
22865334
Chrysopolis,_California
footnotes               Chrysopolis (Greek for city of gold) is a former settlement in Inyo County, California.( It was located on the east bank of the River south of Aberdeen,() at an elevation of 3819 feet (1164 m).(Chrysopolis was founded in the 1860s.( As the name suggests, Chrysopolis was originally a mining camp.( A post office operated at Chrysopolis from 1866 to 1867.(Referencesit:Chrysopolis
22877910
Economic_history_of_modern_China
File:Shanghai Pudong Skyline.jpg|thumb|300px|The Lujiazui financial district of Pudong, Shanghai, the financial and commercial hub of modern ChinaThe economic history of modern China began with the fall of the Dynasty in 1911. Following the Qing, China underwent a period of instability and disrupted economic activity. Under the decade (19271937), China advanced several industries, in particular those related to the military, in an effort to catch up with the west and prepare for war with Japan. The Sino-Japanese War (19371945) and the following civil war caused the collapse of the of China and formation of the Republic of China.(Sun Jian, page 616-618)The new ruler of China, Zedong, initially promised to develop a socialist alliance with petit-bourgeois, workers, and nationalist bourgeois, but enacted collectivization upon consolidation of this regime. Collectivization resulted in the success of the first five-year plan, but Maos second five-year plan, which included the Leap forward, did not meet with the same success. A new party faction who supported private plots eventually challenged Maos economic policy. Unwilling to give up power, Mao launched the Revolution, which led to the collapse of the Chinese economy.Following Maos death, one of the most senior officials who had advocated private plots in the early 1960s, Xiaoping, initiated gradual market reforms that abolished the communes and collectivized industries of Mao, replacing them with the free-market system. Dengs reforms vastly improved the of living of the Chinese people, the competitiveness of the Chinese economy, and caused China to become one of the fastest growing and most important economies in the world. It also led to one of the most rapid industrializations in world history. For this achievement he is sometimes known as The Venerated Deng (Chinese:). As a result of Dengs reforms, China is widely regarded as a returning superpower.By mid-2000s China had become the second largest economy in the world by GDP (PPP), while in the early 2011 it was confirmed that China surpassed Japan by nominal GDP.( At the end of 2010, Japan had GDP worth $5.474 trillion (3.414 trillion). At the same time, Chinas GDP was around $5.8 trillion.( According to one source, if the current relative growth rates persist, in about 10 years China will be at rough parity with the USA by any type of GDP measure.(Republic of China (1911-1949)The Republic of China was a period of turmoil for China after the collapse of the Qing dynasty. From 1911 to 1927, China virtually disintegrated into regional warlords, fighting for authority and causing economic misery and contraction. After 1927, Kai-shek managed to reunify China and bring in the decade, a period of relative prosperity despite civil war and Japanese aggression. In 1937, the Japanese invaded and literally laid China to waste in eight years of war. The era also saw the first boycott of Japanese products. Afterwards, the Chinese civil war further devastated China and led to the fall of the Republic in 1949.Civil war, famine and turmoil in the early republicThe early republic was marked by frequent wars and factional struggles. From 1911 to 1927, famine, war and change of government was the norm in Chinese politics, with provinces periodically declaring independence. The collapse of central authority caused the economic contraction that was in place since Qing to speed up, and was only reversed when Chiang reunified China in 1927 and proclaimed himself its leader(Sun Jian, page 613-614).Development of domestic industriesFile:SuzhouCreekOld2.jpg|thumb|right|Boat traffic and development along Creek, Shanghai, around 1920Chinese domestic industries developed rapidly after the downfall of the Manchu Qing dynasty, despite turmoil in Chinese politics. Development of these industries peaked during War I, which saw a great increase in demand for Chinese goods, which benefitted Chinas industries. In addition, imports to China fell drastically after total war broke out in Europe. For example, Chinas textile industry had 482,192 needle machines in 1913, while by 1918 (the end of the war) that number had gone up to 647,570. The number increased even faster to 1,248,282 by 1921. In addition, bread factories went up from 57 to 131(Sun Jian, page 894-895).The May 4th movement, in which Chinese students called Chinas population to boycott foreign goods, also helped spur development. Foreign imports fell drastically from 19191921 and from 1925 to 1927.(Sun Jian, page 897)Chinese industries continue to develop in the 1930s with the advent of the Nanking decade in the 1930s, when Chiang Kai-shek unified most of the country and brought political stability. Chinas industries developed and grew from 1927 to 1931. Though badly hit by the Great Depression from 1931 to 1935 and Japans occupation of Manchuria in 1931, industrial output recovered by 1936. By 1936, industrial output had recovered and surpassed its previous peak in 1931 prior to the Great Depressions effects on China. This is best shown by the trends in Chinese GDP. In 1932, Chinas GDP peaked at 28.8 billion, before falling to 21.3 billion by 1934 and recovering to 23.7 billion by 1935.(Sun Jian, pg 1059-1071)The rural economy of the Republic of ChinaThe rural economy retained much of the characteristics of the Late Qing. While markets had been forming since the Song and Ming dynasties, Chinese agriculture by the Republic of China was almost completely geared towards producing cash crops for foreign consumption, and was thus subject to the say of the international markets. Key exports included glue, tea, silk, sugar cane, tobacco, cotton, corn and peanuts.(Sun Jian, page 934-935)The rural economy was hit hard by the Great Depression of the 1930s, in which an overproduction of agricultural goods lead to massive falling prices for China as well as an increase in foreign imports (as agricultural goods produced in western countries were dumped in China). In 1931, imports of rice in China amounted to 21 million bushels compared with 12 million in 1928. Other goods saw even more staggering increases. In 1932, 15 million bushels of grain were imported compared with 900,000 in 1928.  This increased competition lead to a massive decline in Chinese agricultural prices (which were cheaper) and thus the income of rural farmers. In 1932, agricultural prices were 41 percent of 1921 levels.(Sun Jian, page 1089). Rural incomes had fallen to 57 percent of 1931 levels by 1934 in some areas(.Foreign direct investment in the Republic of ChinaForeign direct investment in China soared during the Republic of China. Some 1.5 billion of investment was present in China by the beginning of the 20th century, with Russia, The United Kingdom and Germany being the largest investors. However, with the outbreak of WWI, investment from Germany and Russia stopped while England and Japan took a leading role. By 1930, foreign investment in China totalled 3.5 billion, with Japan leading (1.4 billion) and England at 1 billion. By 1948, however, the capital stock had halted with investment dropping to only 3 billion, with the US and Britain leading(Sun Jian, pg 1353).Currency of the Republic of ChinaThe currency of China was initially silver-backed, but the nationalist government seized control of private banks in the notorious coup of 1935 and replaced the currency with the Fabi, a fiat currency issued by the ROC. Particular effort was made by the ROC government to instill this currency as the monopoly currency of China, stamping out earlier Silver and gold-backed notes that had made up Chinas currency. Unfortunately, the ROC government used this privilege to issue currency en masse; a total of 1.4 billion yuan was issued in 1936, but by the end of the second Sino-Japanese war some 1.031 trillion in notes was issued(Sun Jian, pg 1234-1236). This trend worsened with the outbreak of the Chinese Civil war in 1946. By 1947, some 33.2 trillion of currency was issued as a result of massive budget deficits resulting from war (taxation revenue was just 0.25 billion, compared with 2500 billion in war expenses). By 1949, the total currency in circulation was 120 billion times more than in 1936.(Sun Jian, page 1317).The Chinese war economy (1937-1945)File:Fushun Coal Mine.jpg|thumb|mining at Fushun, Liaoning, c. 1940, operating under the control of the JapaneseIn 1937, Japan invaded China and the resulting warfare literally laid waste to China. Most of the prosperous east China coast was occupied by the Japanese, who carried out various atrocities such as the Rape of Nanjing in 1937 and random massacres of whole villages. In one anti-guerilla sweep in 1942, the Japanese killed up to 200,000 civilians in a month. The war was estimated to have killed between 20 and 25 million Chinese, and destroyed literally all that Chiang had built up in the preceding decade(Sun Jian, page 615-616). Development of industries was severely hampered after the war by devastating conflict as well as the inflow of cheap American goods. By 1946, Chinese industries operated at 20% capacity and had 25% of the output of pre-war China(Sun Jian, page 1319).One effect of the war was a massive increase in government control of industries. In 1936, government-owned industries were only 15% of GDP. However, the ROC government took control of many industries in order to fight the war. In 1938, the ROC established a commission for industries and mines to control and supervise firms, as well as instilling price controls.  By 1942, 70% of the capital of Chinese industry were owned by the government(Sun Jian, pg 1237-1240).Hyperinflation, civil war and the relocation of the republic to TaiwanFollowing the war with Japan, Chiang acquired Taiwan from Japan and renewed his struggle with the communists. However, the corruption of the KMT, as well as hyperinflation as a result of trying to fight the civil war, resulted in mass unrest throughout the Republic(Sun Jian, page 617-618) and sympathy for the communists. In addition, the communists promise to redistribute land gained them support among the massive rural population. In 1949, the communists captured Beijing and later Nanjing as well. The Peoples Republic of China was proclaimed on 1 October 1949. The Republic of China relocated to Taiwan where Japan had laid an educational groundwork.()  Taiwan continued to prosper under the Republic of China government and came to be known as one of the Asian Tigers due to its miracle, and later became one of the largest sources of investment in mainland China after the PRC economy began its rapid growth following Dengs reforms.(Top 10 Origins of FDI US-China Business Council, February 2007)Peoples Republic of China (1949 onwards)File:Chinese stamp in 1950.jpg|thumb|A 1950 postage stamp of Zedong, of the Communist Party of China, shaking hands with Stalin, Secretary of the Communist Party of the Soviet UnionThe Peoples Republic of China is marked by two distinctly different periods: the Mao Era, characterized by a soviet-style planned economy that extinguished the market and eventually became unresponsive, and the post-Mao Era, more properly called the Deng Era (after the reformer who started it) characterized by a transition to a relatively free market economy which was one of the most prosperous periods in Chinas history. Many Chinese are hopeful that this newfound prosperity will last and China will reclaim her place at the top of nations.The Mao Era (1949-1976)The Mao Era was marked by a soviet-style planned economy which was instituted, despite his promises, in 1949-52. A decade of relatively peaceful development and collectivization followed, but in 1959 Mao launched the disastrous Leap forward, an attempt to collectivize all aspects of life (even the peasants cooking pots), a disaster that was exacerbated by famine. Following this, a reformist faction led by Deng Xiaoping and Liu Shaoqi forced Mao out of office and experimented with market reforms such as giving peasants private plots. However, these reform efforts were disrupted by Maos Revolution, a period of virtually total anarchy and street fighting() that resulted in the collapse of the Chinese economy and ended with the arrest of the of Four.Early policies of toleranceMao initially promised to work with patriotic capitalists, the petit-bourgeois and other classes in a period of New Democracy in which some capitalism would be allowed. However, in 1952 he broke his promise and accused capitalists of sabotaging Chinas war effort in Korea. Following this, businesses were collectivized()(Zhou Enlai: Twenty years since the building of the nation, Ch.1.).Collectivization of industry and agricultureCollectivization of industry took place from 1951 to 1954, by which time industry was entirely in state hands. Despite the communist partys original plans not to finish collectivization of agriculture until 1971, Mao pushed ahead with mutual aid teams by 1953, and commune () by 1955, forcing the collectivization of agriculture.Economic development in the 1950sWith Soviet aid, Mao set up a basic industrial base that included a small set of industries, mostly related to military matters, that was to become the basis of the later modernization by Xiaoping. New buildings, roads, railroads, and a basic infrastructure was put in place to sustain Chinese development. Illiteracy and a whole host of parasites were eradicated. For these reasons, the 1950s is usually regarded as the high point of the Mao Era.Great Leap ForwardIn 1959, Mao launched a crash industrialization program under the official title the Leap forward. This involved making many peasants urban workers, collectivizing virtually everything (including cooking tools) and setting up backyard furnaces to improve steel production. However, the program was a disastrous failure(Chan, Alfred (2001), Maos Crusade: Politics and Policy Implementation in Chinas Great Leap Forward, Oxford University Press, ISBN 0199244065). The new collectivization destroyed the incentive of the peasants, and distorted priorities. Most of the new steel produced from backyard furnaces was useless.  The food system collapsed and millionsestimated to have been as high as 45 millionpeople died, usually from starvation or vulnerability to disease caused by severe malnutrition.(Frank Diktter, Maos Great Famine: The History of Chinas Most Devastating Catastrophe (2010) pp. 91, 146-64, 209, 292)Attempts at reformReformists, such as Shaoqi and Xiaoping, began to push for reform, after the disastrous Great Leap Forward. They undid some of Maos priorities, such as disbanding the Peoples communes and giving peasants private plots. Mao was infuriated and, in 1966, struck against the reformers, calling them roaders and launching the Cultural Revolution.(William A. Joseph (Editor), Christine P.W. Wong (Editor), David Zweig (Editor) (1991). New Perspectives on the Cultural Revolution. Harvard University Press. ISBN 0674617584)Cultural Revolution and collapse of the economyThe Revolution party program is almost universally assessed to bring about one of the most catastrophic periods ever in China. Youth groups aligned with Mao, known as Red Guards, deposed, brutalised and frequently executed city and provincial government officials, and then took control themselves. This began in Shanghai and quickly spread across the country. By 1966, most of the country was in the hands of revolutionary committees which battled each other for power.(This disruption, as well as the purge of millions of intellectuals, workers, and officials as counter-revolutionaries, had a severe impact on the economy.( Economic output fell some 30% over three years, and stagnated for the rest of the period. In addition, an entire generation was deprived of education while Chinas development was hampered for years to come. Referring to this period, Deng Xiaoping said it had created an entire generation of mental cripples.Deng Xiaopings riseAn old party stalwart, Deng had been of the reformist faction in the early 1960s and purged in the Revolution. After Maos death, however, a coup overthrew the of Four and instilled old party officials such as Deng back in power. However, it was not until 1978 that Guofeng, Maos appointed successor, resigned and Deng took power, though he was never officially the leader, instead holding the position of chairman of the Central military commission.From planned economy to free market powerhouse: The post-Mao Era (1976 onwards)While, in 1976, at the end of the Revolution, Chinas planned economy was in ruins and its people barely surviving, the country was to witness, in the next two years, one of the most rapid periods of change in her 5,000-year history. Deng Xiaoping initiated free-market reforms that transformed Chinas economy.( Only 30 years later, China moved from being an economically desolate country into an industrial powerhouse, rapidly overtaking developed western nations in recession.(Donald and Benewick (2005), pg 13.) The agent of this dramatic change, Deng Xiaoping, is sometimes known as Deng Gong (The Venerated Deng) for his achievements.De-collectivization of agricultureOne of Dengs first actions was to break up the Peoples communes that Mao instated and grant a system of Bao Chang Dao Hu (), in which each plot of land was given to each household to farm. This system was successful enough to allow Deng in 1983 to lift limits on consumption of many agricultural goods that were instated during the Mao Era due to scarcity. However, these limits were not completely lifted until 1994(Chinas Great Transformation).Liberalization and privatization of businessImage:INDUSTRIAL AND COMMERCIAL BANK OF CHINA.jpg|thumb|right|200px|A Shanghai branch of and Commercial Bank of China, largest in the world.Private businesses, which were banned in the Mao Era for being Capitalist exploiters, were reinstated in the Deng Era. Early on, a citizen could opt to become Ge Ti Hu() or self-employed household, and to set up a business instead of taking on state jobs. These Ge Ti Hu quickly became extremely wealthy. In the 1990s, many state enterprises were privatized and private individuals were allowed to create companies. In 1990, the Stock Exchange was reopened after Mao first closed it 41 years earlier.Another innovation instated during this period was the system(www.chinca.org) or contracting system, in which state assets were given to private operators, who gave the state the money needed for expenses as well as a share of the profits. This system was also rapidly adopted; in the 1980s and 1990s, many schools, hospitals and even bus lines passed from the state to private operators. However, this system was also criticized as many felt that the change in operation for these schools and hospitals, now for-profit, was detrimental to the poor. In addition, some private contractors were accused of gaining their positions solely because of nepotism.Although privatizations had occurred in the 1980s, it was sped up in the 1990s by Premier Zhu Rongji, who started a policy of privatizing all state enterprises which were losing money. In 1997, the CPC issued a verdict declaring that state-owned companies were now people-owned companies who would be subject to mergers and bankruptcy. Thousands of state companies were privatized or partly floated on the stock exchange. In 1978, more than 90% of GDP was produced in state enterprises, which, up to 1992, dominated Chinas economy. That figure, not accounting for state assets that were contracted, had fallen to 30% by 2009.Foreign investment and industrializationIn addition to internal liberalization, Deng also established a series of special economic zones in which foreigners could invest in China taking advantage of lower labor costs. This investment helped the Chinese economy boom. In addition, the Chinese government established a series of joint ventures with foreign capital to establish companies in industries hitherto unknown in China. By 2001, China became a member of the Trade Organization, which has boosted its overall trade in exports/importsestimated at $851 billion in 2003by an additional $170 billion a year.(Donald and Benewick (2005), pg 14, 33.)Despite a brief period in 1989 in which foreign capital withdrew from China, China continued to be one of the biggest recipients of foreign investment(Foreign investment in China rebounds - International Herald Tribune). In 2006, an estimated $699.5 billion of foreign investment was present in China. A great deal of this investment came from Chinese-speaking regions such as Kong and Taiwan, who were the first to invest in China. Japanese and Western investment followed.Dengs liberalization of the Chinese economy, along with foreign investment, helped to power Chinas industrialization. From virtually an industrial backwater in 1978, China is now the worlds biggest producer of concrete, steel, ships, textiles as well as the worlds biggest auto market. For example, from 2000 to 2006, Chinas steel production rose from 140 million tons to 416 million tons(Output of Major Industrial Products AllCountries.org). From 1975 to 1992, Chinas auto production rose from 139,800 to 1.1 million automobiles before jumping to 9.35 million in 2008(8:47 p.m. ET (2009-02-04). China poised to be worlds largest auto market - Autos- msnbc.com. MSNBC. http://www.msnbc.msn.com/id/29022484/. Retrieved on 2009-04-28.).Developments post-Dengthumb|Foreign currency reserves and gold minus external debt based on 2010 data from CIA FactbookIn 1997, Deng Xiaoping died. However, his reformist policies were continued by his successor, Zemin. The result was a vibrant, growing economy.Under Hu and Wen, who became leaders of China in 2003, the Chinese government continued to give up grounds to private enterprise, yet increased its control in other areas. The new premier, Wen Jiabao, reinstated some Mao-Era social systems, such as social security, as well as sponsoring a new initiative in care in which the state retook control of hospitals from many contractors who had run them for two decades. However, this was reversed in 2009. Nevertheless, Chinas economy continued to grow. In 2008, however, it was affected by the global financial meltdown and the growth rate fell to 9.0%. As of 2008, Chinas GDP (PPP) was between 50 and 60 percent of the GDP (PPP) of the US, while over 10 percent of world GDP (PPP).To offset the effects of the global economic crisis, the government announced a financial stimulus of around 4 trillion yuan spread over two years. However, new spending by the government was actually only about 1 trillion yuan; the rest was already part of the governments budget.()In mid-2005, China began to experience an enormous property bubble, largely caused by loose monetary policy under premier Jiabao. Property prices tripled from 2005 to 2009, and are continuing to rise().Some analysts also discovered a new management style in China. The Chinese managers refrain from the American management model, where short-dated success are more important than long-dated strategies, and take more care of the environment, the people and the culture of an area, where they do business.(Boue: Chinas Management Revolution - Spirit, Land, Energy, Macmillan, New York 2010, ISBN 978-0-230-28545-3.)Worlds second largest economyIn July 2010, Gang, Deputy Governor of the Bank of China, claimed Chinas economy had overtaken Japan as the worlds second biggest economy by GDP.(China Overtakes Japan As No. 2 Business World, 7 August 2010) This fact was confirmed in February 2011, when the official economic statistics was issued by Japan (Chinese statistics for 2010 was published earlier), which showed that Japans 2010 GDP was worth $5.474 trillion, when Chinas 2010 GDP was around $5.8 trillion.(BBC: China overtakes Japan as worlds second-biggest economy)See also*of the Han Dynasty*of Hong Kong*of the Song Dynasty*history of China (Pre-1911)*of Macau*of the Ming Dynasty*history of the Peoples Republic of China*of the Peoples Republic of China*of TaiwanFurther reading* Zhang : of Chinese Macroeconomy .* Chow, Gregory C. Chinas Economic Transformation (2nd ed. 2007) excerpt and text search* Duara, Prasenjit, State Involution: A Study of Local Finances in North China, 1911-1935, in Comparative Studies in Society and History, Vol. 29, No. 1 (Jan., 1987), pp. 132161, Cambridge University Press* Eastman Lloyd et al. The Nationalist Era in China, 1927-1949 (1991) excerpt and text search* Fairbank, John K., ed.  The Cambridge History of China, Vol. 12, Republican China 1912-1949. Part 1. (1983). 1001 pp., the standard history, by numerous scholars* Fairbank, John K. and Feuerwerker, Albert, eds.  The Cambridge History of China. Vol. 13: Republican China, 19121949, Part 2. (1986). 1092 pp., the standard history, by numerous scholars* Ji, Zhaojin.  A History of Modern Shanghai Banking: The Rise and Decline of Chinas Finance Capitalism. (2003. 325) pp.*  MacFarquhar, Roderick and Fairbank, John K., eds.  The Cambridge History of China. Vol. 15: The Peoples Republic, Part 2: Revolutions within the Chinese Revolution, 1966-1982. Cambridge U. Press, 1992. 1108 pp.*  Naughton, Barry. The Chinese Economy: Transitions and Growth (2007)* Rawski, Thomas G.  and Lillian M. Li, eds. Chinese History in Economic Perspective, University of California Press,  1992 complete text online free* Rubinstein, Murray A., ed. Taiwan: A New History (2006), 560pp* Sheehan, Jackie.  Chinese Workers: A New History. Routledge, 1998. 269 pp.* Shiroyama, Tomoko. China during the Great Depression: Market, State, and the World Economy, 1929-1937 (2008)* Young, Arthur Nichols. Chinas nation-building effort, 1927-1937: the financial and economic record (1971) 553 pages full text onlineReferencesSources*Brandt, Loren et al., Chinas Great Transformation, ISBN 978-0-511-39680-9 (ebook), April 2008*Sun, Jian, (Chinese) Economic history of China, Vol 2 (18401949), China Peoples University Press, ISBN 7300029531, 2000.*Zhou, Enlai: Twenty years since the building of the nation, Ch.1.*Spence, Jonathan D. (1999). The Search For Modern China. Second Edition. New York: W. W. Norton & Company. ISBN 0-393-97351-4 (Paperback).*Donald, Stephanie Hemelryk and Robert Benewick. (2005). The State of China Atlas: Mapping the Worlds Fastest Growing Economy. Berkeley, Los Angeles, London: University of California Press. ISBN 0520246276.* Chan, Alfred (2001). Maos Crusade: Politics and Policy Implementation in Chinas Great Leap Forward. Oxford University Press. ISBN 0199244065.External links*THE ECONOMIC HISTORY AND THE ECONOMY OF CHINAdella Cina
22891658
Osceola_Ditch
 refnum96000584The Osceola Ditch, also known as the East Ditch, was built in 1889-1890 to convey water from Lehman Creek, Nevada to a hydraulic mine operation at Osceola. Extending for , the ditch includes a  tunnel as well as wooden flumes. The project also includes a rock dam and headgate on Stella Lake. The ditchs terminus at Nevada became disused during the early 1900s and was destroyed entirely by a fire in the 1940s. Much of the East Ditch is included within Basin National Park.Osceola MineGold was first discovered by James Matteson and Frank Heck in 1872 in what would become the Osceola mining district,  to the west of what would become Great Basin National Park. gold was discovered by John Versan in 1877. The town of Osceola grew to 1500 residents, extracting almost $2 million in gold, including a  nugget. Gold was found in nearby Dry Gulch, but its extraction would require large scale engineering. The Osceola Gravel Mining Company formed to exploit the deposit using mining techniques, constructing the West Ditch in 1884-1885. The water proved to be inadequate for the purpose, so the East Ditch was surveyed in 1885. Water rights were purchased from Lehman, discoverer of Caves.()The ditchesThe project was built to serve the Osceola Gravel Mining Companys placer gold mine, which required enormous quantities of water to blast apart gold-bearing gravel and rubble deposits, and was capable of delivering 2500 miners inches of water.  A companion project, the West Ditch could provide 1100 miners inches. The East ditch was built at a cost of $108,222.65, with a width of  at the bottom,  in width with a uniform grade of  per mile (1.6km). The ditch could carry  per day. The East Ditch included 14 sections of wood flume, including  in Lehman Canyon. Flumes were  wide and  deep, with a uniform grade of  per mile (1.6 km).()Accessory structures included four ditch keepers houses. Extensive improvements were made to the mining area, including expansion of the receiving reservoir, new sluices, and two  hydraulic monitors. Despite all of these measures, there was never enough water available for the mining operation to reach its full potential. Operations had to be curtailed in 1894 and again in 1896. After eleven years, the Osceola Mine shut down for good. An abortive 1906 plan to organize a new company, the Nevada Amalgamated Mines and Power Company, with plans for reduction works, a power plant, three towns and a railroad spur, never reached fruition.(The West Ditch predated the East Ditch, extending  to the west side of the Range. It is not included in the historic district designation. Little remains of the West Ditch. The East Ditch was listed on the Register of Historic Places in 1996.( The East Ditch no longer carries water and is overgrown, but sections of flume remain. The tunnel at Strawberry Creek has partially collapsed. Little remains of Osceola itself.(ReferencesExternal links* Osceola Ditch at Great Basin National Park* Oseola, Nevada at Great Basin National Heritage Route
22906451
Castle_View_Enterprise_Academy
Castle View Enterprise Academy (Formerly Castle View School) is an academy in Sunderland, England.Castle View School was officially opened in 1960 and extended in 1972. The extensive site is situated to the north west of Sunderland and is bounded by the Hylton Dene and within sight of the historic Hylton Castle. The urban catchment area incorporates the former mining village of Castletown and the post war housing estates of Hylton Castle and Town End Farm. It is an area with significant social and economic deprivation school meals eligibility stands presently at around 48%. It now has a new building because of this is now called Castle View Enterprise Academy. The school is run by principal Janet Bridges.Referenceshttp://news.bbc.co.uk/1/shared/bsp/hi/education/07/school_tables/secondary_schools/html/394_4036.stmExternal links*Castle View Enterprise Academy homepage
22932137
Annaguly_Deryayev
Annaguly Deryayev (born 1973) is a Turkmen politician and the head of the state oil company Trkmennebit. He is a former minister of oil and gas industry and mineral resources of Turkmenistan. Annaguly Deryayev was born in the village of Ekerem of District of Province in 1973.  He graduated from the Polytechnic Institute in 1994 as mining engineer.(After graduation, he worked as drill operator in test wells in Goturdep and also served in the army from 1997 to 1998.(In 1998-2002, he worked as a senior engineer for drilling technologies at the Burnebitgas trust of Trkmennebit and from 2002 head of the Trkmennebits department. After that, he served as the first deputy chairman of the company.(From October 2008 until October 2009 he served as minister of oil and gas industry and mineral resources of Turkmenistan.()  On 13 October 2009, he was demoted from the ministerial position and was appointed the head of Trkmennebit.()References
22963487
Wil_van_der_Aalst
Wil M.P. van der Aalst (born 29 January 1966 in Eersel, Brabant) is a Dutch scientist, and professor at the Department of Mathematics & Computer Science of the Universiteit Eindhoven, where he chairs the Architecture of Information Systems group, His research and teaching interests include systems, management, nets, mining, languages, and simulation.( He is also known for his work on patterns.BiographyVan der Aalst was born on 29 January 1966, in Eersel in Netherlands. He has received a MSc in science in 1988 at the Universiteit Eindhoven (TU/e), and a PhD in mathematics in 1992 with the thesis Timed colored Petri nets and their application to logistics under supervision of prof.dr. J. Wessels and prof.dr. K.M. van Hee.(Curriculum vitae Wil van der Aalst. Accessed May 26, 2009.) In 1992 he started working at the Universiteit Eindhoven as an assistant professor for the department of Mathematics and Computing Science, where he headed the Specification and Modeling of Information systems (SMIS) research group. 2000 to 2003 he became a part-time full professor at the Computing Science department. And from 2000 to 2006 he was head of the Information Systems department at the Technology Management department of TU/e. Since 2006 he is full professor at the Department of Mathematics & Computer Science of the Universiteit Eindhoven, where he chairs the Architecture of Information Systems (AIS) group. He also has a part-time appointment in the BPM group of University of Technology (QUT).(About Wil van der Aalst at tue.nl. Accessed May 26, 2009.)He has been a visiting professor on at University (AIFB), the of Georgia (LSDIS), Wolfgang Goethe University Frankfurt am Main (WI-II), the University of Colorado (CTRG),  University of Technology (CITI), and the University (DAIMI).(He is associate editor for several journals, including IEEE Transactions on Services Computing, IEEE Transactions on Industrial Informatics, International Journal of Business Process Integration and Management, International Journal on Enterprise Modelling and Information Systems Architectures, Computers in Industry, and Transactions on Petri Nets and Other Models of Concurrency.(He is series Editor of Lecture Notes in Business Information Processing (LNBIP) by Springer, member of the editorial board of Distributed and Parallel Databases and Business and Information Systems Engineering, and member of several steering committees, including International Conference Series on Business Process Management (chair), International Conference Series on Application and Theory of Petri nets and International Workshop Series on Web Services and Formal Methods.  He is also a member of the Royal Holland Society of Sciences and Humanities (Koninklijke Hollandsche Maatschappij der Wetenschappen).(WorkVan der Aalsts research interest is in the fields of systems, process management, simulation, nets, models, management systems, verification techniques, mining, resource planning systems, computer supported cooperative work, webservices, process redesign, resource allocation and interorganizational processes.(He is a strong supporter of software. He initiated and led the development of:*the framework, a mining tool*YAWL, a workflow management system*and several other software tools such as Declare, Woflan, XRL, etc.He also initiated the Workflow Patterns initiative. The Workflow Patterns website is visited by hundreds of researchers and practitioners each day and this work influenced industry standards such as the Process Execution Language (BPEL), the Process Modeling Notation (BPMN), etc. Van der Aalsts ideas have also influenced various widely used commercial software tools such as Flower, Protos, Futura Reflect, Staffware, WebSphere, and ARIS.Other scientific contributions of Van der Alst are in the field of Process Discovery, process chain, Management Coalition and XPDL.PublicationsVan der Aalst has published in total more than 400 books, journal papers, book chapters, conference papers, and reports on these topics.((Wil M. P. van der Aalst List of publications from the DBLP Bibliography Server. Accessed May 26, 2009.) Books, a selection:*2000. Business Process Management: Models, Techniques, and Empirical Studies. With J. Desel, and A. Oberweis ed. Vol 1806 of Lecture Notes in Computer Science.  Springer-Verlag, Berlin, 2000.*2002. Workflow Management: Models, Methods, and Systems. With K.M. van HeeM. IT press, Cambridge, MA, 2002.*2003. Petri Net Approaches for Modelling and Validation. With J-M. Colom, F. Kordon, G. Kotsis, and D. Moldt. Volume 1 of LINCOM Studies in Computer Science. Lincom, Mnchen, Germany, 2003.*2005. Process-Aware Information Systems: Bridging People and Software through Process Technology. With M. Dumas, and A.H.M. ter Hofstede. Wiley & Sons.*2009. Handbook of Research on Business Process Modeling.  With J. Cardoso. Information Science Publishing, Hershey, PA, USA, 2009.*2010. Modern Business Process Automation: YAWL and its Support Environment. With A.H.M. ter Hofstede, M. Adams, and N. Russell. Springer-Verlag, Berlin, 2010.*2011.  Modeling Business Processes: A Petri Net Oriented Approach. With C. Stahl. MIT press, Cambridge, MA, 2011. *2011. Process Mining: Discovery, Conformance and Enhancement of Business Processes. Springer-Verlag, Berlin, 2011. Articles, a selection:*2003. Wil van Der Aalst, Arthur H.M. Hofstede, Bartek Kiepuszewski, and Alistair P. Barros (2003). Workflow Patterns. In: Distributed and Parallel Databases 14 (1): pp. 551. doi:10.1023/A:1022883727209.ReferencesExternal links*Homepage Wil van der Aalst at Eindhoven University of Technology.van der Aalst
22974849
Bend_City,_California
Bend City is a former settlement in Inyo County, California.( It was located on the River near the modern-day town of Kearsarge.() Founded in the 1863, Bend City was originally a mining camp.( Bend City was the site of the first county bridge spanning the Owens River.( The Lone Pine earthquake changed the course of the river away from the townsite, which had already declined.(ReferencesExternal Links* Bend City from www.ghosttowns.com Photos from the site.City
22991382
Srmag_Coal_Mine
Srmag Coal Mine is an mining exploitation, one of the largest in Romania located in Srmag, County with estimated coal reserves of 10.6 million tonnes.() The legal entity managing the Srmag mine is the National Coal Company which was set up in 1957.(References
22999896
Exponential_mechanism_(differential_privacy)
The exponential mechanism is a technique for designing differentially private algorithms developed by Frank McSherry and Kunal Talwar. privacy is a technique for releasing statistical information about a database without revealing information about its individual entries. Most of the initial research in the field of privacy revolved around real valued functions which have relatively low sensitivity to change in the data of a single individual and whose usefulness is not hampered by small additive perturbations. A natural question is what happens in the situation when one wants to preserve more general sets of properties. The Exponential Mechanism helps to extend the notion of differential privacy to address these issues. Moreover, it describes a class of mechanisms that includes all possible differentially private mechanisms. The exponential mechanism (F.McSherry and K.Talwar. Mechasim Design via Differential Privacy. Proceedings of the 48th Annual Symposium of Foundations of Computer Science, 2007.)  Algorithm In very generic terms a privacy mechanism maps a set of n\,\! inputs from domain \mathcal{D}\,\!, to a range \mathcal{R}\,\!. The map may be randomized, in which case each element of the domain D\,\! corresponds to the probability distribution over the range R\,\!. The privacy mechanism we are going to design makes no assumption about the nature of \mathcal{D}\,\! and \mathcal{R}\,\! apart from a base measure \mu\,\! on \mathcal{R}\,\!. Let us define a function q:\mathcal{D}^n\times\mathcal{R}\rightarrow\mathbb{R}\,\!. Intuitively this function assigns	 score to the pair (d,r)\,\!, where d\in\mathcal{D}^n\,\! and r\in\mathcal{R}\,\!. The score reflects how appealing is the pair (d,r)\,\!, i.e. the higher the score, the more appealing the pair is.  Once we are given the input d\in\mathcal{D}^n\,\!, the mechanisms objective is to return an r\in\mathcal{R}\,\! such that the function q(d,r)\,\! is approximately maximized. To achieve this, we set up the mechanism \mathcal{E}_{q}^{\epsilon}(d)\,\! as follows: Definition: For any function q:(\mathcal{D}^{n}\times\mathcal{R})\rightarrow\mathbb{R}\,\!, and a base measure \mu\,\! over \mathcal{R}\,\!, we define::\mathcal{E}_{q}^{\epsilon}(d):\,\! Choose r\,\! with probability proportional to e^{\epsilon q(d,r)}\times\mu(r)\,\!, where d\in\mathcal{D}^n,r\in R\,\!.This definition implies the fact that the probability of returning an r\,\! increases exponentially with the increase in the value of q(d,r)\,\!. For now if we ignore the base measure \mu\,\! then the value r\,\! which maximizes q(d,r)\,\! has the highest probability. Moreover we claim that this mechanism is differentially private. We will prove this claim shortly. One technicality that should be kept in mind is that in order to properly define \mathcal{E}_{q}^{\epsilon}(d)\,\! the \int_{r}e^{\epsilon q(d,r)}\times\mu(r)\,\! should be finite. Theorem (Differential Privacy): \mathcal{E}_{q}^{\epsilon}(d)\,\! gives (2\epsilon\Delta q)\,\!-differential privacy. Proof: The probability density of \mathcal{E}_{q}^{\epsilon}(d)\,\! at r\,\! equals :\frac{e^{\epsilon q(d,r)}\mu(r)}{\int e^{\epsilon q(d,r)}\mu(r)dr}\,\!.Now, if a single change in d\,\! changes q\,\! by at most \Delta q\,\! then the numerator can change at most by a factor of e^{\epsilon\Delta q}\,\! and the denominator minimum by a factor of e^{-\epsilon\Delta q}\,\!. Thus, the ratio of the new probability density (i.e. with new d\,\!) and the earlier one is at most \exp(2\epsilon\Delta q)\,\!. Accuracy We would ideally want the random draws of r\,\! from the mechanism \mathcal{E}_{q}^{\epsilon}(d)\,\! to nearly maximize q(d,r)\,\!. If we consider \max_rq(d,r)\,\! to be OPT\,\! then we can show that the probability of the mechanism deviating from OPT\,\!is low, as long as there is a sufficient mass (in terms of \mu) of values r\,\! with value q\,\! close to the optimum.Lemma: Let S_{t}{r:q(d,r)>OPT-t}\,\! and \bar{S}_{2t}{r:q(d,r)\leq OPT-2t}\,\!, we have p(\bar{S}_{2t})\,\! is at most \exp(-\epsilon t)/\mu(S_{t})\,\!. The probability is taken over R\,\!. Proof: The probability p(\bar{S}_{2t})\,\! is at most p(\bar{S}_{2t})/p(S_t)\,\!, as the denominator can be at most one. Since both the probabilities have the same normalizing term so,:\frac{p(\bar{S}_{2t})}{p(S_{t})}  \frac{\int_{\bar{S}_{2t}}\exp(\epsilon q(d,r))\mu(r) \, dr}{\int_{S_{t}} \exp(\epsilon q(d,r))\mu(r) \, dr} \leq \exp(-\epsilon t) \frac{\mu(\bar{S}_{2t})}{\mu(S_t)}. The value of \mu(\bar{S}_{2t})\,\! is at most one, and so this bound implies the lemma statement.Theorem (Accuracy): For those values of t\geq \ln(\frac{OPT}{t\mu(S_{t})})/\epsilon\,\!, we have  Eq(d,\mathcal{E}_{q}^{\epsilon}(d))\geq OPT-3t\,\!.Proof: It follows from the previous lemma that the probability of the score being at least OPT-2t\,\! is 1-\exp(-\epsilon t)/\mu(S_{t})\,\!. By Hypothesis, t\geq \ln(\frac{OPT}{t\mu(S_{t})})/\epsilon\,\!. Substituting the value of t\,\! we get this probability to be at least 1-t/OPT\,\!. Multiplying with OPT-2t\,\! yields the desired bound. We can assume \mu(A)\,\! for A\subseteq \mathcal{R}\,\! to be less than or equal to one in all the computations, because we can always normalize with \mu(\mathcal{R})\,\! . Example application of the exponential mechanism (Avrim Blum,Katrina Ligett,Aaron Roth. A Learning Theory Approach to Non-Iteractive Database Privacy.In Proceedings of the 40th annual ACM symposium on Theory of computing, 2008)Before we get into the details of the example let us define some terms which we will be using extensively throughout our discussion. Definition (global sensitivity): The global sensitivity of a query Q\,\! is its maximum difference when evaluated on two neighbouring datasets D_1,D_2\in\mathcal{D}^n\,\!::GS_{Q}\max_{D_1,D_2:d(D_1,D_2)1}|(Q(D_1)-Q(D_2))|\,\!.Definition: A predicate query Q_{\varphi}\,\! for any predicate \varphi\,\! is defined to be:Q_{\varphi}\frac{|\{x\in D:\varphi(x)\}|}\,\!.Note that GS_{Q_{\varphi}}\leq 1/n\,\! for any predicate \varphi\,\!. Release mechanism The following is due to Avrim Blum, Katrina Ligett and Aaron Roth.Definition (Usefulness): A mechanism \mathcal{A}\,\! is (\alpha,\delta)\,\!-useful for queries in class H\,\! with probability 1-\delta\,\!, if \forall h\in H\,\! and every dataset D\,\!, for \widehat{D}\mathcal{A}(D)\,\!, |Q_h(\widehat{D})-Q_h(D)|\leq \alpha\,\!.  Informally, it means that with high probability the query Q_{h}\,\! will behave in a similar way on the original dataset D\,\! and on the synthetic dataset \widehat{D}\,\!. Let us consider a common problem in Data Mining. Assume there is a database D\,\! with n\,\! entries. Each entry consist of k\,\!-tuples of the form (x_1,x_2,\dots,x_k)\,\! where x_{i}\in\{0,1\}\,\!. Now, a user wants to learn a linear halfspace of the form \pi_1 x_1 + \pi_2 x_2+\cdots+\pi_{k-1}x_{k-1}\geq x_{k}\,\!. In essence the user wants to figure out the values of \pi_1,\pi_2,\dots,\pi_{k-1}\,\! such that maximum number of tuples in the database satisfy the inequality. The algorithm we describe below can generate a synthetic database \widehat{D}\,\! which will allow the user to learn (approximately) the same linear half-space while querying on this synthetic database. The motivation for such an algorithm being that the new database will be generated in a differentially private manner and thus asssure privacy to the individual records in the database D\,\!. In this section we show that it is possible to release a dataset which is useful for concepts from a polynomial VC-Dimension class and at the same time adhere to \epsilon\,\!-differential privacy as long as the size of the original dataset is at least polynomial on the VC-Dimension of the concept class. To state formally: Theorem: For any class of functions H\,\! and any dataset D\subset \{0,1\}^{k}\,\! such that:|D|\geq O\left(\frac{k\cdot VCDIM(H)\log(1/\alpha)}{\alpha^{3}\epsilon}+\frac{\log(1/\delta)}{\alpha\epsilon}\right)\,\!we can output an (\alpha,\delta)\,\!-useful dataset \widehat{D}\,\! that preserves \epsilon\,\!-differential privacy. As we had mentioned earlier the algorithm need not be efficient.One interesting fact is that the algorithm which we are going to develop generates a synthetic dataset whose size is independent of the original dataset; in fact, it only depends on the VC-dimension of the concept class and the parameter \alpha\,\!. The algorithm outputs a dataset of size \tilde{O}(VCDIM(H)/\alpha^{2})\,\!We borrow the Uniform Convergence Theorem from combinatorics and state a corollary of it which aligns to our need. Lemma: Given any dataset D\,\! there exists a dataset \widehat{D}\,\! of size O(VCDIM(H)\log(1/\alpha))/\alpha^{2}\,\! such that \max_{h\in H}|Q_{h}(D)-Q_{h}(\widehat{D})|\leq \alpha/2\,\!.Proof: We know from the uniform convergence theorem that,:\Pr\alpha/2\,\! for some h\in H\leq 2(\frac{em}{VCDIM(H)})^{VCDIM(H)}\cdot e^{-\frac{\alpha^{2}m}{8}}\,\!,where probability is over the distribution of the dataset. Thus, if the RHS is less than one then we know for sure that the data set \widehat{D}\,\! exists. To bound the RHS to less than one we need m\geq\lambda(VCDIM(H)\log(m/VCDIM(H))/\alpha^{2})\,\!, where \lambda\,\! is some positive constant. Since we stated earlier that we will output a dataset of size \tilde{O}(VCDIM(H)/\alpha^{2})\,\!, so using this bound on m\,\! we get m\geq\lambda(VCDIM(H)\log(1/\alpha)/\alpha^{2})\,\!. Hence the lemma. Now we invoke the Exponential Mechanism. Definition: For any function q:((\{0,1\}^k)^n \times(\{0,1\}^k)^m)\rightarrow\mathbb{R}\,\! and input dataset D\,\!, the Exponential mechanism outputs each dataset \widehat{D}\,\! with probability proportional to e^{q(D,\widehat{D})\epsilon n/2}\,\!.From the Exponential Mechanism we know this preserves (\epsilon nGS_{q})\,\!-differential privacy. Lets get back to the proof of the Theorem. We define (q(D),q(\widehat{D}))-\max_{h\in H}|Q_{h}(D)-Q_{h}(\widehat{D})|\,\!. To show that the mechanism satisfies the (\alpha,\delta)\,\!-usefulness, we should show that it outputs some dataset \widehat{D}\,\! with q(D,\widehat{D})\geq -\alpha\,\! with probability 1-\delta\,\!. There are at most 2^{km}\,\! output datasets and the probability that q(D,\widehat{D})\leq -\alpha\,\! is at most proportional to e^{-\epsilon\alpha n/2}\,\!. Thus by union bound, the probability of outputting any such dataset \widehat{D}\,\! is at most proportional to 2^{km}e^{-\epsilon\alpha n/2}\,\!.  Again, we know that there exists some dataset \widehat{D}\in(\{0,1\}^{k})^{m}\,\! for which q(D,\widehat{D})\geq -\alpha/2\,\!. Therefore, such a dataset is output with probability at least proportional to e^{-\alpha\epsilon n/4}\,\!.  Let, A:\,\! the event that the Exponential mechanism outputs some dataset \widehat{D}\,\! such that q(D,\widehat{D})\geq-\alpha/2\,\!.  B:\,\! the event that the Exponential mechanism outputs some dataset \widehat{D}\,\! such that q(D,\widehat{D})\leq-\alpha\,\!.:\therefore \frac{\PrA}{\PrB}\geq \frac{e^{-\alpha\epsilon n/4}}{2^{km}e^{-\alpha\epsilon n/2}}\frac{e^{\alpha\epsilon n/4}}{2^{km}}.\,\!Now setting this quantity to be at least 1/\delta\geq(1-\delta)/\delta\,\!, we find that it suffices to have :n\geq\frac{4}{\epsilon\alpha}\left(km+ln\frac{1}{\delta}\right)\geq O\left(\frac{d\cdot VCDIM(H)\log(1/\alpha)}{\alpha^{3}\epsilon}+\frac{\log(1/\delta)}{\alpha\epsilon}\right)\,\!.And hence we prove the theorem. The Exponential Mechanism in other domains We just showed an example of the usage of Exponential Mechanism where one can output a synthetic dataset in a differentially private manner and can use the dataset to answer queries with good accuracy. Apart from these kinds of setting, the Exponential Mechanism has also been studied in the context of theory and classification algorithms.(Shiva Prasad Kasiviswanathan, Homin K. Lee, Kobbi Nissim,Sofya Raskhodnikova, Adam Smith. What Can We Learn Privately? Proceedings of the 2008 49th Annual IEEE Symposium on Foundations of Computer Science.) In the case of auctions the Exponential Mechanism helps to achieve a truthful auction setting.References
23009871
Burkeville,_California
Burkeville (also, Milltown and Millville) is a former settlement in Kern County, California.( It was located  north of Quartzburg.() Burkeville began as a mining camp and was named for Edwin Burke, co-owner of the Blue Mine.(References
23035567
Joshua_Tauberer
Joshua Tauberer is an government activist. He is the creator and maintainer of GovTrack(About GovTrack.us) and a primary contributor to the The Open Senate project.Joshua is currently employed at LARSA, Inc where he works on structural engineering software.  His government and civic hacking(Hacking is used here in its original sense of enthusiast computer programming (to improve life in some way); see also http://razor.occams.info/civictech.xpd .) are performed through his company Civic Impulse.(http://www.civicimpulse.com/, accessed 2010-01-03.)GovTrackTauberer created GovTrack to make legislative information more easily accessible to everyone,(Think Your Lawmakers Dont Read Bills? Do It Yourself, The Washington Post, 2006-03-01, accessed 2010-01-03.) providing research and tracking tools but also raw data feeds that third-parties use to create other services. He conceived the idea for GovTrack during his freshman year at Princeton.(How Did They Vote? Updates by E-Mail of Congressional Ayes and Nays, The New York Times, 2005-01-27, accessed 2010-01-03.) The utility of the data that Tauberer made available on his site (and later became available on other sites) was part of the  inspiration for Congressman Hondas legislation to provide new sources of legislative data for public repurposing.(An API for Federal Legislation? Congress Wants Your Opinion, Wired.com, 2009-03-05, accessed  2010-01-03.)(Congressional Data Mining: Coming Soon?, Mother Jones, 2009-03-05, accessed  2010-01-03.)EducationTauberer holds a Doctorate in Linguistics from the of Pennsylvania.He graduated from University in 2004,(Data crusader, Princeton Alumni Weekly, 2008-07-16, accessed 2010-01-03.) and previously attended Bethpage John F. Kennedy High School in New York.ReferencesExternal links*Joshua Tauberers Homepage**Joshua Tauberers track record in Civic Technology*GovTrack.us*Civic Impulse, LLC*A conversation with Joshua Tauberer about GovTrackInterviews*Tracking the US Congress on Jon Udells Interviews with Innovators*GovTrack opens up information on US legislature by Linux.com*Data crusader by Princeton Alumni Weekly
23048770
Nordic_Mine
The Nordic Mine, is an abandoned uranium mine in the Lake area of Ontario, owned by Rio Algom Ltd. The site has been rehabilitated and its tailings facility is currently undergoing environmental monitoring by Denison Environmental Services.The site was in operation from 1957 to 1968,() during which time it produced 13 million tonnes of ore. The mill continued to process ore from the Quirke and Panel mines until 1990.(HistoryGeologyOther mines in the area* Mine* American Mine* Mine* Mine* Mine* Mine* Mine* Mine(s)* Mine* Mine* MineSee also*Quartz-pebble conglomerate deposits*mining*of uranium mines*of mines in OntarioReferencesExternal links* * 
23082889
Lemuel_Carpenter
Lemuel Carpenter, (ca. 1808 Kentucky - 5 November 1859 California) was one of the first Anglo-American settlers of what is now the Angeles, California metropolitan area.Early lifeLemuel Carpenter was born ca. 1808 in Kentucky.  He migrated to Missouri about 1828, where he served in Searcys Company of Missouri Militia in 1829(Virgil D. White: Index to Volunteer Soldiers in Indian Wars and Disturbances, 1815-1858, Volume I, A-K, National Historical Publishing Co., Waynesboro, Tenn., 1994, p. 217.).Image:LosAngeles-Plaza-1869.jpg|thumb|right|400px|Dating from the era of the de Los Angeles, The Plaza and Old Plaza Church (Nuestra Seora Reina de los Angeles) in 1869.Southern California PioneerCarpenter was in southern California by January 1833.(Iris Higbie Wilson: Lemuel Carpenter in The Mountain Men and the Fur Trade of the Far West, LeRoy R. Hafen, ed., The Arthur H. Clark Co., Glendale, Calif., 1972, pp. 33-40.)(Hubert Howe Bancroft: California Pioneer Register and Index 1542-1848, Regional Publishing Co., Baltimore, Md., 1964, p. 82.)(Charles Russell Quinn: History of Downey, The Life Story of a Pioneer Community, and of the Man who Founded it  California Governor John Gately Downey  From Covered Wagon to the Space Shuttle, Elena Quinn, Downey, Calif., 1973, pp. 12, 20-22, 32, 104-105, et al.)  Early California settler Bidwell includes him in this recollection of people he knew in early Angeles: Los Angeles I first saw in March, 1845. It then had probably two hundred and fifty people, of whom I recall Don Stearns, John Temple (Temple), Captain Alexander Bell, Wolfskill, Lemuel Carpenter, W. Alexander; also of Mexicans, Pico (governor), Don Bandini, and others.(John Bidwell: First-Person Narratives of Californias Early Years, 1849-1900, Library of Congress Historical Collections, American Memory: John Bidwell (Pioneer of 41): Life in California Before the Gold Discovery, from the collection California As I Saw It.)Carpenter started a soap manufacturing business on the San Gabriel River in Monte that profited sufficiently for him to purchase Santa Gertrudes, on the site of Tongva Nacaugna and present-day California, southeast of what is now downtown Los Angeles.(Mildred Brooke Hoover, Hero Eugene Rensch, and Ethel Grace Rensch, revised by William N. Abeloe: Historic Spots in California, Third Edition, Stanford University Press, Stanford, Calif., 1966, p. 153.)He was among the first of the Californios to plant a vineyard for the making of wine.(Thomas Pinney: A History of Wine in America, From the Beginnings to Prohibition, University of California Press, Berkeley, Cal., 1989, p. 245.)His original settlement was known as Carpenters Farm from 1837 until it was destroyed by a flood in 1867.(Susanna Bryant Dakin: A Scotch Paisano in Old Los Angeles, University of California Press, Berkeley, Calif., 1939, p. 220.)  He was active in revolutionary activities, sided with the Americans in the Mexican War(Hubert Howe Bancroft: California Pioneer Register and Index 1542-1848, Regional Publishing Co., Baltimore, Md., 1964, p. 82.), tried mining, and in general prospered in his new home. A popular travel guide notes: Santa Gertrudeswas sold to Lemuel Carpenter, a Kentuckian, who married the beautiful Mara de los Angeles Domnguez. ... The Carpenters were happy and prosperous under Mexican rule.(Mildred Brooke Hoover, Hero Eugene Rensch, and Ethel Grace Rensch; revised by William N. Abeloe: Historic Spots in California, Third Edition, Stanford University Press, Stanford, Calif., 1966, pp. 153, 163; 20, 56, 401.)(Terry Carpenter: Lemuel CARPENTER, Anglo L.A. Pioneer, http://archiver.rootsweb.ancestry.com/th/read/CALOSANG/2001-04/0986744501, 8 Apr 2001.)Santa Gertrudes was owned by Lemuel Carpenter until 1859.(Lemuel Carpenter)  In 1859 the rancho was sold at a sheriffs auction to G. Downey and James P. McFarland. Samuel, actually Lemuel but misspelled by the recorder, Carpenter was recorded as the legal possessor in 1862.(Plat of the Rancho Santa Gertrudes, showing Samuel Carpenter as the confirmee; Samuel was Lemuel mistranscribed by the recorder.).FamilyLemuels father is believed to be Jonathan Carpenter (ca. 1785 Virginia - ca. 1853 Missouri) and grandson of Matthew Carpenter (ca. 1761 Virginia - ca. 1798 Virginia).(http://www.familytreedna.com/public/carpenter%20cousins%20%20dna/default.aspx, Carpenter Cousins Y-DNA Project  see lineage page.)In the 1850 census(1850 US Census of Los Angeles county, California. Reel No: M432-35 Sheet No: 27B - reference February 8th, 1851 by J. R. Evertsen, Asst. Marshal. Page 53. Cited from http://www.rootsweb.com/~cenfiles/ca/losangeles/1850/pg0023a.txt), Lemuel Carpenter is listed as age 42, had a real estate value of $8,000 dollars, and was a farmer.  His wife, Maria, is listed as age 22she was his second wife.  Their children, all born in California, are listed as:* Susana Carpenter, age 11.* Jos Antonio Carpenter, age 9. (born c1839 CA & his descendants are still living in Los Angeles(http://www.familytreedna.com/public/carpenter%20cousins%20%20dna/default.aspx  Carpenter Cousins Y-DNA Project.))* Refugio Carpenter, age 6.* Francisco Carpenter, age 3.Misfortune and DeathCarpenters prosperity took a precipitous downturn when a $5,000 loan from G. Downey taken out in 1852 ballooned into a $104,000 debt by 1859.(Iris Higbie Wilson: Lemuel Carpenter in The Mountain Men and the Fur Trade of the Far West, LeRoy R. Hafen, ed., The Arthur H. Clark Co., Glendale, Calif., 1972, pp. 33-40.)(Dan L. Thrapp: Encyclopedia of Frontier Biography, The Arthur H. Clarke Co., Spokane Wash., 1990, p. 228.)  Early settler Major Horace Bell gives this narrative of the series of events involved(Lanier Bartlett, ed.: On The Old West Coast; Being Further Reminiscences of A Ranger, Major Horace Bell, William Morrow & Co., New York, printed in the USA by Quinn & Boden Co., Inc., Rahway, N.J., 1930; from the collection California as I Saw It: First-Person Narratives of Californias Early Years, 1849-1900, Library of Congress Historical Collections (American Memory).): The first notable land owner to pay tribute to El Boticario G. Downey was El Carpintero.  Lemuel Carpenter, to be explicit.  A thoroughly Anglo-Saxon name, surely, but Lemuel was one of those Americans that had settled in the Land of Maana in early days, when it was still Mexico, and his business sense had become numbed by that easy faith in his fellow man which characterized the Californians when they negotiated one with another over financial matters.  Lemuel Carpenter had become El Carpintero and almost as native as his Spanish nickname implied.  He owned forty thousand acres of the richest land in California, thousands of head of horned cattle and a corresponding number of horses.  He had a good ranch house, a vineyard, corn fields, barley fields, springs, streams and lakes; also a family.  He was of the most honorable standing, respected by all who knew him.  His age was about fifty.  Authorities differ as to the date of Carpenters arrival in Los Angeles.  C. D. Willard in his History of Los Angeles, says he came with a party of trappers in 1832 or 33.  Harris Newmark in his Sixty Years in Southern California, says he came with the Wilson-Workman-Rowland party from New Mexico in 1841.  His first property was a little rancho called La Jabonera (The Soap Factory) on the west bank of the Rio San Gabriel near El Monte.  The locality is still known by this name.  Here Carpenter manufactured soap and made enough money from it to acquire a large part of the great Nietos family grant known as Rancho Santa Gertrudis, which stretched away on the opposite bank of the river across the region where are now the towns of Downey, Rivera and Los Nietos.  One unlucky day El Carpintero borrowed fifty dollars from El Boticario; this was about Christmas time, 1852, when he was having a good time among his friends in town and needed a little spending money instanter.  For this sum he gave his note and forgot all about it for a year, when payment was demanded with interest.  Lo, El Carpintero discovered he had signed a note bearing interest at the rate of 12 & 1/2 per cent. a day, compounded daily!  The note had grown from fifty dollars to five thousand dollars or thereabouts.  Then a new note was given Dec. 9, 1853, for five thousand dollars bearing interest at 5 per cent. a month, compounded monthly and payable in three months.  This note was secured by the forty thousand acre ranch.  Oh, he was a broth of a boy, this sprig of Irish royalty, commonly known as El Boticario!  Did El Carpintero pay this five thousand dollars when due, with interest piled up?  No, it ran on for a year and ten days.  Then the interest was computed and another note given, this time for $9,154 at 5 percent a month, compounded monthly, secured by a second mortgage on the forty thousand acre ranch.  This was in 1854.  In 1856 the interest was again computed and another note was given for $4,000 with a reduced interest of 4 percent per month, compounded monthly.  This note was given to secure an installment of interest due and unpaid, on the original note of fifty dollars with its accumulations.  El Carpintero having finally exhausted his mortgage security the $4,000 note was secured by the signature of good old Don Po Pico, last governor of California under Mexico, who was a neighbor and compadre of El Carpintero.  And let it here be explained in passing that one compadre never goes back on another.  It is an endearing relationship between men that does not exist in gringo society.  It was in 1859 that El Boticario applied the thumbscrews of the law to El Carpintero and demanded his pound of flesh.  He brought suit for the foreclosure of mortgage, and also sued on the Pico note.  El Carpintero squared up; he paid it all, principal, interest, compound interest and costs, except the $4,000 note with its four years compound interest and its costs.  That was paid by poor old Don Po.  It was the first step of this Californian grandee on the downward grade to poverty.  Of course El Carpintero paid the other notes not with cash but with his forty thousand acres, his cattle, horses, vineyards, cultivated fields; his springs, streams and lakes.  More, he added his lifes blood as further interest.  He drove a bullet through his brain, and so passed the first of the great California private domains, and one of the richest, of that long list that was to go as tribute to the new business methods.The diary of Lemuel Carpenters daughter Mary Refugio Carpenter includes this entry written on January 2, 1861: I have been thinking so much of my father tonight.  It made me weep.(John Adams: Loss of father cast shadow over her diary in The Downey Calif. Eagle issue of December 5, 1997, on file with the Downey Historical Society, Downey, Calif.).References and notesde Los ngelesde Los Angelesurbana dos nxeles
23087991
Helen_Bullock
Helen Hong Hui Bullock (born 16 May 1965) is a Chinese-born Australian politician.Born in China, Bullock arrived in Australia on 28 January 1991. She was an accountant before entering politics, holding a of Commerce and a Postgraduate Diploma in Business. In 2008, she was elected to the Australian Legislative Council as a Labor Party member, representing Mining and Pastoral Region. Her term commenced on 22 May 2009. ()References
23106689
Herbert_Smith_(trade_unionist)
Herbert Smith (17 July 1862&ndash;16 June 1938) was a British unionist and miner.Born in Kippax, Smith was orphaned at a young age and spent time in a workhouse before being adopted by a local couple, one of whom was a miner.  Smith then studied in Glasshoughton and Pontefract, and began working as a miner at the age of ten.  Smith became active in his union, being elected to the branch committee at the age of seventeen, then in 1894 becoming a checkweighman.  In 1896 he became Chairman of Castleford Council, and in 1906 he became President of the Miners Association.  He joined the Labour Party, and was elected to the Riding County Council in 1903, and stood unsuccessfully for the Labour Party in Morley at the 1910 UK general election.  He was later elected as a councillor in Barnsley.(Smith, Herbert, Dictionary of National Biography)Smith was also involved in the Miners Federation, serving a President from 1921 until 1929, and in Federation of Great Britain (MFGB), becoming its President in 1922.  He was active in support of the general strike of 1926, but resigned as MFGB President in 1929, objecting to the organisations agreement to lengthen miners hours.  Despite standing for re-election to the post in 1930 and 1931, he was unsuccessful, but he did serve as Mayor of Barnsley in 1932.(Smith became nationally known for leading rescue efforts following mining disasters, starting with the Pit Disaster in Whitehaven in 1910, and including the Pit Disaster of 1931 and the  Woodmoor Colliery Disaster of 1936.(References(
23124411
Designated_landmark
 A designated landmark is an officially recognized historic building or structure.  For historic landmarks or places in the United States, the terms designated and designation have official meanings,(( as determined by U.S. government agencies or a local Preservation Commission or similar agency. The procedures for approving a designated landmark involve specific activities in each case.Within the U.S., Historic Landmarks are officially designated((( by the Secretary of the Interior after a lengthy nomination and selection process to determine eligibility.The properties are chosen due to their broad historic value from a nationwide perspective across the entire United States.(National Historic Landmarks, Questions & Answers, U.S. Park Service, June 2009, webpage:  NPS-gov-NHL-QA: the text on that page is public domain to allow verbatim copying (of whole sentences, word for word).)(  Introduction to Michigans National Historic Landmark  Program, Michigan Historical Center, Department of  History, Arts and Libraries, October 2002, webpage:   Mich-gov-HAL-124.)(By 1999, almost 2,300 properties had been designated as U.S. National Historic Landmarks.(  SHPO - National Historic Landmarks in Minnesota,  Historical Society, Paul, MN, 2009, web:   MNHS-SHPO-NHL.)Local properties, with only limited historic impact, can be listed instead on the Register of Historic Places.((  Owners of a property can refuse a nomination and prevent that property from being designated.( Once designated, a property retains its original ownership, and the owner can make any changes without restriction. However, if a property is heavily modified, to lose its historic value, then the designation can be removed.( There are U.S. federal funds available to help maintain designated properties, or help to guide privately funded changes, so as to not ruin the historic value of a designated landmark.((Types of National Historic LandmarksU.S. Historic Landmarks are buildings, sites, districts, structures, and objects that have been determined by the Secretary of the Interior to be nationally significant in American history and culture.((( Many of the most renowned historic properties in the U.S. are Landmarks. Examples: Vernon, Harbor, the Mission Control Center, Alcatraz, the Luther King Birthplace in Georgia, Lane,( and Island (the site of Mackinac and the northern headquarters of Astors Fur Company until 1840)( are U.S. landmarks that illustrate important contributions to U.S. historical development.NHL selection process for designationPotential Landmarks are identified primarily through theme studies(( undertaken by the Park Service; these studies provide a comparative analysis of properties associated with a specific area of American history, such as Labor or Womens History. The historic importance of these potential Landmarks is evaluated by the National Park Service and the Park System Advisory Board,(( twice yearly at meetings that are open to the public. The Advisory Board includes citizens who are national and community leaders in the conservation of natural, historic, and cultural areas. Recommendations by the Advisory Board are made to the U.S. Secretary of the Interior on potential National Historic Landmarks. Final decisions regarding National Historic Landmark designation are made by the Secretary of the Interior.(( In most cases, designation by the Secretary occurs six to eight weeks following the Advisory Boards recommendation. Designation may be delayed if questions regarding the significance, physical condition, or boundaries of a potential Landmark are raised by the Advisory Board or the Secretary of the Interior. Nominations prepared by other Federal agencies, State Historic Preservation Officers, and individuals are accepted for review and represent an increasing number of nominations reviewed each year.(NHL criteria in designationThe quality of national significance is ascribed to districts, sites, buildings, structures, and objects(( that possess exceptional value or quality in illustrating or interpreting the heritage of the United States in history, architecture, archeology, technology, and culture;(( and that possess a high degree of integrity of location, design, setting, materials, workmanship, feeling, and association, and meet any of the following criteria:# Are associated with events that made a significant contribution to, and are identified with, or that outstandingly represents, the broad national patterns of United States history, and from which an understanding and appreciation of those patterns may be gained# Are associated importantly with the lives of persons nationally significant in the history of the United States# Represent some great idea or ideal of the American people# Embody the distinguishing characteristics of an architectural type specimen exceptionally valuable for the study of a period, style or method of construction, or that represent a significant, distinctive and exceptional entity whose components may lack individual distinction# Are composed of integral parts of the environment not sufficiently significant by reason of historical association or artistic merit to warrant individual recognition but collectively compose an entity of exceptional historical or artistic significance, or outstandingly commemorate or illustrate a way of life or culture# Have yielded or may be likely to yield information of major scientific importance by revealing new cultures, or by shedding light upon periods of occupation over large areas of the United States. Such sites are those that have yielded, or which may reasonably be expected to yield, data affecting theories, concepts and ideas to a major degree.(Ordinarily, properties not eligible for designation include: ( cemeteries, birthplaces, graves of historical figures, properties owned by religious institutions or used for religious purposes, structures that have been moved from their original locations (see exceptions below), reconstructed historic buildings and properties that have achieved significance within the past 50 years. Such properties, however, qualify if they fall within the any of the following eight categories.# Religious property that derives its primary national significance from architectural or artistic distinction, or historical importance# Buildings or structures moved from its original location but that is nationally significant primarily for its architectural merit, or for association with persons or events of transcendent importance in the Nations history and the consequential association# Sites of buildings or structures that no longer stand, but the person or event associated with it is of transcendent importance in U.S. history and the consequential association# Birthplaces, graves, or burials, if of a historical figure of transcendent national significance and no other appropriate site, building, or structure directly associated with the productive life of that person exists# Cemeteries that derive primary national significance from graves of persons of transcendent importance, or from an exceptionally distinctive design, or from an exceptionally significant event# Reconstructed buildings or ensembles of buildings of extraordinary national significance, when accurately executed in a suitable environment and presented in a dignified manner as part of a restoration master plan, and when no other buildings or structures with the same association have survived# Property primarily commemorative in intent, if design, age, tradition, or symbolic value has invested it with its own national historical significance# Properties that have achieving national significance within the past 50 years if of extraordinary national importance(National Landmarks versus other Historic PlacesLandmarks have been recognized by the Secretary of the Interior as possessing national significance.(( Nationally significant properties help citizens understand the history of the U.S. and illustrate the nationwide impact of events or persons associated with the property, its architectural type or style, or information potential. A nationally significant property is of exceptional value in representing or illustrating an important theme in the history of the U.S. properties listed on the National Register are primarily of State and local significance.(( With a State or locally significant property, its impact is restricted to a smaller geographic area. For example, many historic schools are listed on the National Register because of the historically important role they played in educating individuals in the community or State where they are located. Central High School, in Rock, Arkansas, is nationally significant because it was the site of the first major confrontation over implementation of the Supreme Courts 1954 decision outlawing racial segregation in public schools. The citys resistance led to President D. Eisenhowers decision to send Federal troops to enforce desegregation at this school in 1957.(All National Historic Landmarks are included in the U.S. National Register,(( which is the official list of historic properties worthy of preservation. Landmarks constitute more than 2300(( of almost 76,000 entries in the National Register; the others are of State and local significance. The process for listing a property in the National Register is different from that for Landmark designation, with different criteria and procedures used. Some properties are recommended as nationally significant when they are nominated to the National Register, but before they can be designated as National Historic Landmarks, they must be evaluated by the National Park Services Historic Landmark Survey, reviewed by the National Park System Advisory Board,(( and recommended to the Secretary of the Interior. Some properties listed in the National Register are subsequently identified by the Survey as nationally significant; others are identified for the first time during Landmark theme studies or other special studies. Both the National Historic Landmarks and the National Register programs are administered by the National Park Service under the Secretary of the Interior.NHL review period for designationThe owners, highest local elected officials, State Historic Preservation Officers, and members of Congress representing the area where the potential Landmark is located are notified by the National Park Service of the opportunity to comment in writing to the National Park Service on the potential designation. These parties are provided 60 days to comment before the meeting of the Advisory Boards National Landmarks Committee. This Committee meets prior to the Advisory Board meeting to review the nominations in detail and provide a report to the Advisory Board on those properties that meet the criteria. Written comments are included in the documentation available to the Committee and the Advisory Board. Interested parties may also attend the National Landmarks Committee and Advisory Board meetings, and upon request may be given an opportunity to address the Committee and Board concerning a propertys significance, integrity, and proposed boundaries. The regulations outline this aspect of the procedure in more detail; for more information refer to 36 CFR 65.5 Designation of National Historic Landmarks(c)(1)(h)(6).Making changes to designated propertiesListing of private property as a National Historic Landmark or on the National Register does not prohibit, under U.S. Federal law or regulations, any actions that may otherwise be taken by the property owner with respect to the property. The National Park Service may recommend to owners various preservation actions, but owners are not obligated to carry out these recommendations. They are free to make whatever changes they wish if Federal funding, licensing or permits are not involved. (Questions regarding Federal involvement are answered in the next section.) Federal laws that involve National Historic Landmarks are listed in the Federal regulations governing this program, specifically in 36 CFR 65.2 Effects of Designation (c)(1-7).Owners should keep in mind that State laws or local ordinances may affect National Historic Landmarks if these legal mechanisms recognize and protect Landmarks, independent of Federal law.Refusing to allow designationIf a private owner, or the majority of private owners of a potential Landmark with multiple owners, object to Landmark designation, then the Secretary of the Interior cannot designate the property.Retaining private access to designated propertiesThere is no requirement to grant public access, as a result of National Historic Landmark designation. The overwhelming majority of Landmarks are privately-owned properties. Some grant sources, however, may require that recipients of funding make their property available to the public under very restricted circumstances.Maintaining properties for historic valueThe National Park Service monitors the status of Landmarks, and often contacts owners to discuss preservation needs. But while the NPS encourages owners to use the Secretary of the Interiors for Historic Preservation Projects, owners are under no requirement to follow that guidance.Federal, State, and local government-owned properties as well as private schools, institutions, and non-profit organizations are often recipients of Federal funding, and, therefore, would be affected by Federal laws. Surface mining, especially surface coal mining, is subject to Federal laws. There is also Federal legislation that affords some degree of protection to archeological sites and the artifacts contained in them. Private property owners of commercial or residential buildings are less likely to be directly affected. However, federally funded construction of highways, utility lines, or buildings may affect adjacent, privately-owned historic properties.Federal funding for designated propertiesFederal funding or licensing of activities that affect historic properties are regulated principally by Sections 106 and 110(f) of the U.S. Historic Preservation Act. Other Federal effects are listed in 36 CFR 65.2. Under Sections 106 and 110(f) of the Act, Federal agencies must take into account the effects of their undertakings on historic properties, and afford the Advisory Council on Historic Preservation an opportunity to comment on the undertaking and its effects. Implementing regulations of the Council may be found in 36 CFR Part 800, Protection of Historic Properties, which establish a process of consultation with the State Historic Preservation Officer and the Council leading, in most instances, to agreement on how the undertaking proceeds. Steps in the process include identification and evaluation of historic properties that may be affected, assessment of the effects of the Federal action, and resolution of any adverse effects that would occur. If a Federal activity directly and adversely affects a Landmark, Section 110(f) of the Act also calls for Federal agencies to undertake such planning and actions as may be necessary to minimize harm to such Landmark. As with Section 106, the agency must provide the Council with a reasonable opportunity to comment in accordance with 36 CFR Part 800. These regulations are available at no cost from the Council; see the reading list at the end of this leaflet for ordering information.Section 106 Process for designated propertiesMany property owners of Landmarks and National Register properties have found the Section 106 process useful in ensuring that incompatible development projects or other actions funded, licensed, or initiated by Federal agencies are reviewed and modifications made when possible to avoid, minimize, or mitigate possible harm to historic properties. Examples of undertakings that would receive Section 106 review might include levee construction and other flood control measures that could destroy archeological sites; construction of a new four-lane, limited-access road through a rural historic district; and demolition, alteration, repair and rehabilitation of deteriorated homes in a historic neighborhood funded by Community Development Block Grant monies to local governments.The Advisory Council has no veto authority over Federal agencies. It is important to keep in mind that the law does not forbid specific actions, even those damaging to historic properties. The purpose of the law is to require Federal agencies to consider the effects of their undertakings on the nations historic properties. Once this has been accomplished, Federal agencies may choose to proceed with the undertaken as originally planned, modify it to mitigate damage to the property, or not undertake the project.Section 106 durationThe time varies depending on the historic property, the anticipated effect, the proposed undertaking, the complexity of consultation and negotiation, and the extent of public interest or controversy. The regulations do, however, provide specific time limits for both State Historic Preservation Officer and Council action in response to agency requests for comment.Section 106 use without designationsThe law was specifically designed to extend Section 106 protection to historic properties not designated as National Historic Landmarks or listed on the National Register. Section 106 requires the implementation of Advisory Council review for properties listed on or determined eligible for listing in the National Register. Evaluations of historic significance are made for all properties potentially affected by Federal undertakings in the Section 106 process. If the property meets National Register criteria for listing, a determination of eligibility is made and the property becomes subject to the Section 106 process.A determination of eligibility for National Historic Landmark status may also be made by the Secretary of the Interior when an owner objects to Landmark designation. This action is equivalent to a determination of eligibility for listing in the National Register. In other words, Federal undertakings are still reviewed.Some potential Landmarks are already listed on the National Register, and thus an owners objection to Landmark status does not halt implementation of Section 106. Section 110(f) of the law requires a higher level of attention for Landmarks adversely affected by Federal undertakings; this Section, however, does not apply unless the property is designated a National Historic Landmark.Federal funds for preserving designated propertiesLimited U.S. Federal grants through the Preservation Fund are available;(( Landmark owners should check with their State Historic Preservation Officer to find out about the availability of Federal and State funds. Often State and local governments have grant and loan programs available for historic preservation; these funds tend to be for small amounts. National Register listing is a condition for receiving grants and loans from many State and local governments, as well as private sources. Some funding sources give National Historic Landmarks higher priority for funding than other National Register properties. There are also Federal income tax incentives available(( for donating easements and for rehabilitating income-generating historic buildings.Other benefits for designated propertiesIf they wish, Landmark owners are provided with a plaque(( to display at the Landmark. Plaques identify the name and Landmark status of the property and the date of designation. These are available at no cost to the owner.((The National Park Service provides technical preservation advice to owners of National Historic Landmarks. Questions regarding preservation issues are routinely answered by phone or letters, or during on-site visits by NPS staff. The following are other forms of assistance the NPS provides to owners:* The National Park Service publishes and distributes information available to Landmark owners and administrators on a variety of preservation subjects.(( The NPS publications catalog is listed in the reading list and is available online at www.cr.nps.gov.* From time to time, the National Park Service contacts Landmark owners about the condition of their properties and may ask for permission to visit. The NPs is responsible by law for monitoring the condition of National Historic Landmarks. Information on the condition of landmarks and potential threats to them is aggregated in an update published online at www.cr.nps.gov/nhl. This update and individual downloadable information sheets on each NHL are valuable tools for stewards to use in fundraising and influencing policy affecting their landmarks. The information is also used by the National Park Service to plan its assistance programs, and helps in grant-making decisions. * Each year, as funding permits, a limited number of Landmark buildings may be selected to receive in-depth site inspections funded and coordinated by the National Park Service regional offices. The purpose of these inspections is to analyze the specific condition of the Landmark, identify and prioritize recommended work treatments, and estimate the costs for carrying out this work. If funding permits, information derived from the in-depth inspection may be compiled in a building condition assessment report available to owners, preservation organizations, and interested public and private groups.See also* Historic Landmarks Program* of United States submarines designated as memorials* designation, the brightest star in many constellations is designated as Alpha ().* States Department of Defense aerospace vehicle designation* of Historic Civil Engineering Landmarks* of Historic Mechanical Engineering LandmarksNotesReferences* National Historic Landmarks, Questions & Answers, U.S. Park Service, June 2009, webpage:  NPS-gov-NHL-QA:* Introduction to Michigans National Historic Landmark Program, Michigan Historical Center, Department of History, Arts and Libraries, October 2002, webpage:  Mich-gov-HAL-124.
23140546
National_Law_University,_Orissa
National Law University, Orissa (NLUO) is the newest addition to the list of the National Law Universities in India. It is located at Cuttack, Orissa. The university offers courses for undergraduate and graduate legal education. NLUO has been established to be a national level institute of excellence in higher learning of law in the state of Orissa by the of Orissa by virtue of the Act 4 of 2008. The university is offering integrated B.A. LL.B. and B.B.A. LL.B. courses. Its first session began in 2009; classes started from 20 July 2009. The first batch is 120 students, 60 each in BBA LLB and BA LLB. The university offers to have streams of BSc LLB and BCA LLB in the following years. The present temporary buildings of the university consist of a six-storey hostel and a three-floor academic building. The university plans to shift to its new campus the next session. The new campus has an area of  already sanctioned and  more to be given soon by the Orissa government. The formal inaugural function of the university was on 31 October 2009. It was inaugurated by the Chief Justice of India, Justice K.G. Balakrishnan in the presence of the Chief Minister of Orissa, Shri Naveen Pattnaik. The Orissa governments law minister and the higher education minister were also present along with the Chief Justice of Orissa High Court Mr. Quddusi and the former vice chancellor of National Law Schools of Bangalore and Jodhpur Mr. N.L. Mitra. The first vice chancellor of the NLUO is Prof. Dr. Faizan Mustafa.OverviewThe National Law University, Orissa  promises to be an exciting new development in the field of legal education. A very new institution, its establishing Act of legislature was notified as recently as April 2009, entrance examinations were conducted in May, and classes began in July. Already it has made its presence felt both in terms of education quality as well as in co-curricular activities such as moot courts. NLUO is located in Cuttack. Not only is the Orissa High Court situated here but also some of the finest lawyers and judges of the country trace their roots back to this city. The university is presently situated in temporary premises along the Mahanadi river, towards the north-west of the citys present limits. It is scheduled to move to a new purpose-built campus at Naraj, a location being developed as an institutional area. It is heartening to know that despite the very brief time in which the university was set up, it has received positive responses from across the country. In its very first year, it has admitted students from 25 states, representing a diverse range of socio-economic, ethnic, religious and cultural backgrounds. NLUO hopes that, in the years to come, students from even more diverse backgrounds will join NLUO, thereby underscoring its truly national characterBackgroundTo appreciate the significance of NLUO and what it aspires to, it is necessary to understand the background in which it was set up. There was a time when integrated five-year law courses were looked upon as a novelty. This is no longer true. More than 20 years have passed since the first such course was established, and now the concept is regarded as commonplace. Indeed, no less than 19 dedicated public and private law colleges, not to mention the law departments of numerous larger universities, have come to offer integrated five-year courses. This serves to throw a singular challenge to new law schools. Previously, the very fact that a university offered a five-year integrated course would have automatically established it as a centre of excellence. Now, in this crowded and even competitive scenario, an institution must earn this recognition. And the only way it can do so is by achieving genuinely high standards of legal pedagogy and research.ObjectsNLUO has positioned itself to meet this challenge squarely. Being what is termed a third generation law university, it is ideally placed to learn from other law schools, from their strength and their drawbacks, their success and lapses equally. Drawing from these experiences, it has embarked upon a well-defined course of action to achieve the levels of excellence it aspires to. This comprises three aspects.TeachingThe first concern is its teaching curricula. NLUO has designed its undergraduate programme keeping certain specific objectives in mind. It recognises that classroom study must be integrated much more closely with the profession and practice of law. It acknowledges equally the need for instilling in students a sense of social and ethical responsibility. This would include not only exposing them to the right values but also imparting the appropriate skillsets to uphold them, for example those of advocacy, analysis, legislative drafting and judicial reasoning. As an extension of the above, NLUO also strives to ensure that students education is well-rounded. To this end, it has right from its inception adhered to an integrated, multi-disciplinary approach. At present it offers BA, LLB (Hons) and BBA, LLB (Hons) courses. Moreover, it has made several optional courses freely available to all students, which means that a student from the social-sciences stream is free to opt for a few management-related courses and vice versa. The University is also concerned that most graduates of other national law universities tend to avoid a career in litigation (as either practising advocates or judges), and instead seek employment in law firms and corporate houses. It seeks to reverse this trend towards soft lawyering, and encourage students towards hard law career options. NLUO also regards continuing education as an essential part of its pedagogical programme. In this regard, it intends to regularly organize orientation and training programmes for legal academics, judicial officers, practising advocates, social activists and so on.ResearchThe second aspect relates to research. NLUO recognises the dearth of quality theoretical and applied research in law. In this regard, it also notes that legal research is perceptibly distancing itself from socially relevant issues. To address this, the University proposes to establish a number of specialised centres, such as the Centre for Mining Law, the Centre for Food Law, the Centre for Water Law, the Centre for Agriculture Law, and the Centre for Energy Law. At a more general level, it proposes to nurture quality legal research by establishing conditions most appropriate for incubating scholarly activity. Foremost among them is a library comparable to the highest international standards. This can be achieved only over a reasonable span of time, but already the library can be considered adequate to meet the basic needs of students, despite the acute shortage of space in the present location. Once we move to the new campus at Naraj, this will no longer remain a constraint. In addition, NLUO has already begun the process of acquiring access to the best online repositories and databases, relating to not only law but also other areas such as management and the social sciences. Any significant research initiative can be sustained only through the involvement of the best brains. Accordingly, assembling world-class good faculty members remains one of NLUOs topmost priorities. Even at this early stage, its staff includes products of the best national and international universities. In the days to come, this is sure to improve even further.DisseminationResearch can be a worthwhile endeavour only if it is made relevant to the needs of individuals and the society at large. To achieve this, it is necessary to unshackle scholarly output from ivory towers, and disseminate it amongs those who may derive practical benefit from it. NLUO has adopted a multi-pronged strategy for this purpose.This includes first of all organising lectures, seminars and conferences to promote legal scholarship, propagate legal knowledge, bridge the distance between law and society, and also channelise the legal process as an effective means of social reform and evolution. And the second aspect is to generate publications, intended for scholars, non-legal specialists as well as the general public.CampusAt present, the university is housed in temporary premises originally intended for other purposes. Despite this constraint, the school has made considerable efforts to ensure this does not handicap them in academic standards or in the quality of life provided to the students. National Law University, Orissa is fully Wi-Fi enabled, with routers installed outside almost every room in in academic block and some seven or eight to a floor in the hostels. Other areas of infrastructural development are  being addressed as expeditiously as possibleAcademic block The academic block is in a rented building on the outskirts of the city, along the banks of the Mahanadi river. A few months of after they obtained possession, the school can claim infrastructural resources that are at least adequate to sustain education and research in reasonable comfort. This includes classrooms, a moot court hall, a well-appointed conference hall, faculty and administrative offices, and a snack bar. Classrooms are spacious, comfortable, and air-conditioned. They are equipped with the latest in audio-visual equipment, such as LCD projectors and wired sound. Use of these facilities have been consciously integrated into the teaching curriculum. In most courses, viva voce examinations have been eschewed in favour of presentations. This acclimatises students with public speaking and makes them familiar with PowerPoint and other presentation software, a valuable skillset in todays professional environment. This emphasis on infrastructure also permits recourse to classroom strategies not seen in many law schools in India. Film screenings are frequently organised in class, which are followed by discussions and brainstorming sessions. The Moot Court Hall is more than twice as large as a classroom. It is air-conditioned and equipped with all the necessary audio-visual equipment. It has been designed to serve several roles. Apart from hosting moot-court competitions, it doubles up as a practice area where students hone their moot court skills; as a hall where subject-presentations are organised; and as a venue for guest lectures by eminent personalities. Within the short existence of National Law University, Orissa, they have hosted talks by several distinguished speakers, such as the political scientists Prof. S. K. Das and Prof. Ashwini Ray, and the social activist Medha Patkar. Hostel Temporary hostel premises are at Cantonment Road, about five kilometres east of the Academic Block along the banks of the Mahanadi. It was originally built as a set of apartments for senior IAS officers. Right now this building accommodates 120 students across six floors. The ground floor contains dining halls and recreation areas equipped with television, table-tennis tables, carrom boards and so on. The space outside the building is given over to games like football and badminton. Discipline is given considerable priority. Though the present arrangements entail housing boys and girls in one building, great care is taken to ensure that interaction across the genders remains within the bounds of propriety. Security arrangements are stringent to ensure the safety and security of residents and their property. Other welfare measures include round-the-clock housekeeping services, broadband wi-fi access, extensive first-aid facilities, and an ambulance on duty 24 hours. Work is in full swing on a permanent hostel complex at the Naraj site. It was expected to be operational by June 2010, in time for the arrival of the next batch of students. This complex boasts certain singular features, such as single-seater rooms for all students, including those in the first year.Faculty* Prof. (Dr.) Faizan Mustafa,  is the vice-chancellor of NLUO. Before joining NLUO, he was the founder director of KIIT Law School. He has served as dean of Faculty of Law, AMU and registrar of AMU for two years. He is honorable director, RLEK, Human Rights Centre, Dehradun and visiting faculty to several reputed institutes in India and abroad. Mustafa is a gold medalist in LL.M. from Aligarh Muslim University. He completed his Ph.D. in intellectual property law. He has a diploma in International and Comparative Human Rights from the Institute of Human Rights, Strasbourg, France. He has been decorated with several accolades which include Ren Cassin Gold Medal (1999) of International Institute of Human Rights, Strasbourg, France and International Educator of the Year Award (2004) by International Biographical Centre, Cambridge, England. As a keen researcher and avid academician, Dr. Mustafa has authored eight books and about hundred national and International papers to his credit.* B.K. Sahoo is the ex-registrar.* Prof. N.L. Mitra received his M.Com, LL.M. and Ph.D. from Calcutta University. He holds a certificate in Human Rights from International Institute of Human Rights, Strasbourg, France. Mitra has been the vice-chancellor of National Law School of India University (NLSIU), Bangalore and National Law University (NLU), Jodhpur. He has been the chairman of several important government of India committees and has advised Reserve Bank of India and other important bodies.* Yogesh Pratap Singh earned his LL.M. (with specialization in Human Rights Laws) from National Law School of India University (NLSIU), Bangalore and M.A. in History from the University of Allahabad. He has worked as a law trainee in the Supreme Court of India under the guidance of Honble Justice S. B. Sinha, Senior Judge, Supreme Court of India. He has also worked as a Legal Researcher in the Rural Litigation and Entitlement Kendra (RLEK), Dehra Dun. He participated in the 39th Annual Session on International Human Rights Law organized by International Institute of Human Rights, Strasbourg, France.  Yogesh has also been a part of Ciedhu programme in France conducted for university teachers.* Abhik Majumdar did his LL.M from National University of Singapore and B.A.LL.B from National Law School of India University (NLSIU), Bangalore.* M. L. Shankar Kaarmukilan earned his B.A. B.L. from Government Law College (GLC), Coimbatore, Tamil Nadu. He pursued his Master of Law (LL.M.) in the National University of Juridical Sciences (NUJS), Kolkata. He worked as an intern in the Securities and Exchange Board of India, Mumbai and in the Planning Commission, Government of India, New Delhi. He did his dissertation titled Compensation, Securities and Stakeholding  The Way Forward under the supervision and guidance of Prof. (Dr.) Mahendra P. Singh, vice-chancellor, NUJS, Kolkata. He taught at NUJS as Junior Lecturer and Lecturer in Law at KIIT Law School before joining NLUO.* Tapan R. Mohanty completed his M.A. in Sociology and M.Phil. from Jawaharlal Nehru University, New Delhi. He has worked as Research Officer in Centre for Rural Studies, Lal Bahadur Shastri National Academy of Administration, Mussoorie. He was awarded Junior Research Fellowship from the Wildlife Institute of India, Ministry of Environment and Doctoral Fellowship from Indian Council of Social Science Research, New Delhi. He has published widely in many journals on topics including primary education, social dynamics of economic principles, reproductive rights, caste and economic reforms, environment, Indian politics, etc., and is a regular contributor in national and regional dailies. At present he is the Global Adviser, Poverty Advisory Group, Institute of Development Studies, Sussex, U.K.* Pinaki Nandan Pattnaik earned two MBA degrees, one in International Business from University of Saskatchewan, Canada and the other in Marketing and Communication from Maastricht School of Management, Netherlands with five years of teaching experience. He has been associated with Northern College of Applied Arts and Technology, Canada as a professor. As a part of the business department, he has advised and participated in several pre-business initiatives. As an assistant professor of marketing at KIIT Law School, KIIT University, he has taught courses in Economics in addition to the different papers in Marketing. Here at National Law University, Orissa, he is working as an Assistant Professor of Management since 15th July, 2009 involved in courses like Principles of Marketing Management and Practices and Principles of Management. Pinaki has a multicultural knowledge of business ethics, operations and strategies spanning to three continents. During the last seven years, he traveled, learnt and spent quality time researching and assimilating the intricacies of doing business in Europe, North America and Japan. He has had the opportunity to visit Sendai, Japan in June/July, 2005 to develop a regional economic development project that would involve exploring linkages among various stakeholders in Canada and Japan. * A.B. Debasis Rout graduated in chemistry, switched streams and qualified as a chartered accountant, worked for three years in the rural- and micro-banking sectors with ICICI Bank, and has now abandoned the corporate sector in favour of an academic career. He brings to NLUO a rare combination of theoretical acumen and practical experience. He is in charge of the principles of financial accounting, a course that makes the basic principles accounting accessible to first-year BBA, LLB (Hons.) students. In future, as the university grows, he plans to introduce courses that range from the purely theoretical to specialist modules that make finance and accounting relevant to different branches of law.* Manisha Mishra earned a Masters degree in English from the University of Hyderabad in 2008, opting for three papers of English language and 14 papers of English literature. Before that, she completed a post graduate diploma in print journalism from Manorama School of Communication, Kerala.  She earned her undergraduate degree in English literature from Utkal University, Orissa. * Byasa Moharana completed his Masters degrees in anthropology (University of Pune, 2000) and in sociology (Jawaharlal Nehru University, 2003). He received the first Prof. T.K. Oommen Award as the Best Student of Sociology (2003). Issues related to social stratification, gender and religion have been his areas of research interest with a special emphasis on the regional character of Orissa as a cultural landscape. He is about to finish his Ph.D. from the Indian Institute of Technology Bombay. In the first semester, he taught basic concepts and themes of sociology that lay the foundation to proceed to the second semester. Here, the attempt would be to explore and engage with the specific issues and debates that bear relevance to study contemporary India. 
23157654
Bear_Valley,_Mariposa_County,_California
footnotes                 ; Bear Valley (formerly, Haydenville, Biddles Camp, Biddleville, Simpsonville, and Johnsonville)( is a place() in Mariposa County, California.( It is located  south-southeast of Coulterville,() at an elevation of 2054 feet (626 m).( Bear Valley was designated Historical Landmark #331.(California State Historical Landmarks in Mariposa County, California Natural Resources Agency, Accessed August 2, 2009.) The population was 125 at the 2010 census.The place was originally called Haydenville in honor of David, Charles, and William Hayden, gold miners.( The place later bore the names Biddles Camp and Biddleville in honor of William C. Biddle.( It later was named Simpsonville in honor of Robert Simpson, local merchant.( The name Johnsonville honored John F. Johnson.( The name became Bear Valley in 1858.(The Haydenville post office opened before January 21, 1851 and closed in 1852.( The Bear Valley post office opereated from 1858 to 1912, from 1914 to 1919, and from 1933 to 1955.(In 1847, C. Frmont, a veteran of the Flag Revolt, decided to settle down in the Francisco Bay Area.  Desiring a ranch near Jos, California, he sent $3,000 to the American consul O. Larkin.  Instead of his intended purchase, he was sold Las Mariposas, consisting of  in the southern Sierra Nevada foothills around Bear Valley.(John C. Frmont, sierrafoothillmagazine.com, Accessed August 2, 2009.)  The original Mexican grant was a floating grant, a grant of land for which the area was precisely given but the actual boundaries were left unspecified (usually due to inadequate surveys of the areas involved).  After the beginning of the Gold Rush in 1848, Fremont moved his grants borders into the hills.  Those hills proved to be lucrative and his mining operations centered in Bear Valley.()At its peak, Bear Valley had a population of 3,000.  During 1850-60 when Frmonts Pine Tree and Josephine Mines were producing, Frmont built an elegant hotel, Oso House; the structure, like many in the area, burned in the late 19th century.(  Frmont lived and worked in the city, and his large home was nicknamed the Little White House, coincidentally built two years after he was the first Republican Party candidate for President; the home burned in 1866.(GeographyAccording to the States Census Bureau, the CDP covers , virtually all of it land.DemographicsThe United States Census() reported that Bear Valley had a population of 125. The density was 17.3 people per square mile (6.7/km). The racial makeup of Bear Valley was 117 (93.6%) White, 0 (0.0%) African American, 1 (0.8%) Native American, 2 (1.6%) Asian, 0 (0.0%) Pacific Islander, 1 (0.8%) from other races, and 4 (3.2%) from two or more races.  Hispanic or Latino of any race were 8 persons (6.4%). The Census reported that 125 people (100% of the population) lived in households, 0 (0%) lived in non-institutionalized group quarters, and 0 (0%) were institutionalized.  There were 58 households, out of which 15 (25.9%) had children under the age of 18 living in them, 29 (50.0%) were opposite-sex married couples living together, 3 (5.2%) had a female householder with no husband present, 1 (1.7%) had a male householder with no wife present.  There were 4 (6.9%) unmarried opposite-sex partnerships, and 0 (0%) same-sex married couples or partnerships. 20 households (34.5%) were made up of individuals and 9 (15.5%) had someone living alone who was 65 years of age or older. The average household size was 2.16.  There were 33 families (56.9% of all households); the average family size was 2.85.The population was spread out with 25 people (20.0%) under the age of 18, 1 people (0.8%) aged 18 to 24, 30 people (24.0%) aged 25 to 44, 38 people (30.4%) aged 45 to 64, and 31 people (24.8%) who were 65 years of age or older.  The median age was 47.6 years. For every 100 females there were 92.3 males.  For every 100 females age 18 and over, there were 96.1 males.There were 68 housing units at an average density of 9.4 per square mile (3.6/km), of which 44 (75.9%) were owner-occupied, and 14 (24.1%) were occupied by renters. The homeowner vacancy rate was 0%; the rental vacancy rate was 6.7%.  91 people (72.8% of the population) lived in owner-occupied housing units and 34 people (27.2%) lived in rental housing units.ReferencesValley (condado de Mariposa, California)
23178127
Room_39
Room 39 (also referred to as Bureau 39,  Division 39, or Office 39()) is a secretive Peoples Republic of Korea government organization that seeks ways to maintain the foreign currency fund of North Koreas leader Jong-il.()The organization holds as much as $5 billion in funds, and may be involved in illegal activities, such as counterfeiting $100 bills (see Superdollar), manufacturing illegal drugs and international insurance fraud.(()Although the seclusion of the North Korean state makes it difficult to evaluate this kind of information, many claim that Room 39 is critical to Jong-ils continued power, enabling him to buy political support and to help fund North Koreas nuclear weapons program.(Room 39 is believed to be located inside a ruling Workers Party building in Pyongyang,() not far from Mr. Kims villa.(HistoryRoom 39 was established in the late 1970s. It has been described as the lynchpin of the Norths so-called court economy centered on the dynastic Kim family.() It is unknown how the name originated.In early 2010, Koreas Yonhap news agency reported that Dong Un, head of the department, was replaced by his deputy, Il Chun.()The Ilbo reported that Room 38, led by Tong-il was merged into Room 39 in late 2009, but then the two were split again in 2010 due to difficulties in obtaining foreign currency.()Purpose and activitiesVery little is known about Room 39 due to the secretive nature surrounding the organization, but it is widely speculated that the organization uses 10 to 20 bank accounts in China and Switzerland for the purposes of counterfeiting, laundering and other illicit transactions. It is also alleged that Room 39 is involved in smuggling and illicit weapon sales. It is known, however, that the organization has 120 foreign trade companies under its jurisdiction and is under the direct control of Jong-il. North Korea has denied taking part in any illegal activities. Room 39 is also involved in the management of foreign currency earnings from foreigners hotels in Pyongyang, gold and zinc mining, and agricultural and fisheries exports. Companies believed to be controlled by Room 39 include Trading and Bank.(A 2007 report published by the Millennium Project of the World Federation of United Nations Associations said North Korea makes an estimated $500 million to $1 billion annually from criminal enterprises.()In 2009, a Post report outlined a global insurance fraud scheme by the North Korean government. The state-owned National Insurance Corp sought reinsurance contracts with international reinsurers and then submitted fraudulent claims; the contracts were governed by North Korean law and legal challenges were fruitless.(Room 39 is also believed to be operating an overseas North Korean restaurant chain, Pyongyang.()Room 39 in fictionRoom 39 is featured :* as a low level enemy faction in the video game Playground of Destruction, where they are referred to as Division 39. They are involved in similar illegal activities to their real world counterparts* in de Villierss novel Le Dfecteur de Pyongyang (SAS series, two volumes)See also* of North Korea* of Korea-related topicsReferencesFurther reading* * Michael Breen, Kim Jong-il: North Koreas Dear Leader, John Wiley and Sons (January, 2004), hardcover, 228 pages, ISBN 0-470-82131-0393939ja:3939
23192159
Kawasaki_type_oiler
{|Ship notes|}The  was a type of oiler of Japan, serving during 1930s and War II. They do not have official class name.(Iino Lines called Ta Maru class, Kawasaki Line called Tatekawa Maru class, Nitt Mining called Nichiei Maru class, and more..) Therefore, this article used common class names. And, this type has some variants. This article handles them collectively.Backgroundthumb|left|200px|Iino Lines Fujisan Maru* The Naval Treaty forced shrinkage of a budget to the Imperial Japanese Navy (IJN). And it meant cooling of the Japanese shipbuilding industry worlds. The Depression more accelerated it. The IJN wanted to update their Notoro-class oilers and Ondo-class oilers, because these oilers were not able to chase the aircraft carrier.* In 1929, the IJN decided their combat ship (battleship, aircraft carrier, cruiser, destroyer, submarine and torpedo boat) fuel only to heavy crude oil. And, the IJN was paid a grant to newly build large/high-speed tankers.* In 1931, two marine transportation companies built the tankers which the IJN wanted. One was the 9,900 tons/17.5 knot Teiy Maru, the other the 9,500 tons/18.8 knots Fujisan Maru.* The IJN was satisfied by Fujisan Maru. The IJN recommended building of the improved Fujisan Maru class tanker.Construction* In 1932, the  ordered two tankers Ta Maru and Kyokut Maru to the Shipbuilding Corporation. In total 17 tankers were built with the same basic drawings, until 1943.* All sisters participated to War II. However, they were not able to survive at all.Ships in classesTa Maru class* First production model of the Kawasaki-type tankers. Their success gave courage to other steamship companies.Tatekawa Maru class* Second production model. They were built by the same as Ta Maru class drawings. However, their details were different by steamship company which they placed an order for (example: Nippon Maru removed one dry cargo hold). Narrow sense of the Kawasaki-type tanker was until the Kyei Maru. Kyei Maru was equipped surplus stocks of the Argentina Maru machinery.Nissh Maru class* One of the variant of the Kawasaki-type tankers. The Mitsubishi used many curves to reduce her air friction strength.Kuroshio Maru class* One of the variant of the Kawasaki-type tankers. Kuroshio Maru was equipped with a La-Mont boiler. Her design was used for the Type 1TL wartime standard ship.Akatsuki Maru class* One of the variant of the Kawasaki-type tankers. The Harima Zsen used the Sulzer diesel.ServiceCharacteristicsPhotosImage:Toa Maru.jpg|Iino Lines Ta MaruImage:Kyokuto Maru.jpg|Iino Lines Kyokut MaruImage:Toho Maru.jpg|Iino Lines Th MaruImage:Nippon Maru-1941.jpg|Yamashita Line Nippon Maru in June 1941Image:Toei Maru-1941.jpg|IJN Tei Maru in February 1941Image:Shinkoku Maru-1941.jpg|IJN Shinkoku Maru in September 1941Image:Kyokuto Maru inWartime.jpg|IJN Kyokut Maru in wartimeImage:HIJMS Tone-1944.jpg|IJN Kokuy Maru on 17 June 1944Footnotes(Bibliography* Tashir Iwashige, The visual guide of Japanese wartime merchant marine,  (Japan), May 2009* Monthly Armor Modelling special issue, Navy Yard Vol.8 Tora! Tora! Tora!, Dainippon Kaiga (Japan), July 2008* Kunio Matsumoto, The Lives of the Japanese Tankers,  (Japan), January 1995* Shinshichir Komamiya, The Wartime Convoy Histories,  (Japan), October 1987* The Maru Special, Japanese Naval Vessels No.53, Japanese support vessels,  (Japan), July 1981* 60 Years of the Iino Lines,  (Japan), June 1959* Instruction sheets from 1/700 scale resin model kit AX-02 Nippon Maru, AX-03 Tei Maru and AX-05 Shinkoku Maru, Kikakushitu Kuroshio (personal resin kit manufacture)
23207375
Santa_Mara_Atzompa
footnotes               Santa Mara Atzompa is a town and municipality located in the Mexican state of Oaxaca, about five km from the state capital of Oaxaca.It is part of the Centro District in the Valles Centrales region.(  ) The town was founded between the 7th and 9th centuries as a satellite of the ancient Zapotec city of Albn. Since its founding, pottery making has been a major economic activity and the town is currently known for its green-glazed pottery. This pottery used to be shipped all over Mexico and exported to the United States but today most of this pottery is sold locally. Beginning in  2009, there has been excavation at the Atzompa archeological site, leading to the discovery of a 45-meter ball court, which has been determined to have been on the principal one for Monte Alban.(  ) Today, the town is rustic with the smoke of wood-fired pottery kilns ever present. Poverty has been a concern for the town, but innovations such as the use of lead-free glazing and a communal crafts market have been implemented to improve the crafts prospects.(  )HistoryThe town was founded between 650 and 850 C.E. as a satellite city to Monte Alban, along with other nearby communities such as Cerro del Gallo, El Plumaje, Monte Alban Chico and El Mogollito. These communities were created as a result of the expansion of the large Zapotec city, but were considered to be separate units, rather than neighborhoods of the city proper. The Atzompa community was established on a hill for strategic reasons, overlooking the fertile Valley of Etla below, partly as a bulwark against the neighboring Mixtec. There is also evidence that the town served as the last way station for quarried stone making its way to the construction of the last buildings in the city of Monte Alban. Objects found at the site include local negro pottery as well as obsidian and other objects showing trade connections with areas such as Teotihuacan, Sierra de las Navajas in Hidalgo and Guatemala.(Atzompa has been a major producer of pottery since the Monte Alban period. Most of it at that time was the gray pottery typical of the surrounding area although there is a greater diversity of shapes, including jaguar heads and eagle claws.(  After the Spanish conquest, Santa Maria was added to its native name of Atzompa (high water mark in Nahuatl),( and lead glazing techniques were introduced in the 16th century.(In the mid 20th century, Atzompa was the main producer of ceramics for the region, and its products were shipped to all parts of Mexico and exported to the United States.( However, concerns about the lead content in the glaze pummeled the Mexican pottery market.(  ) Today, most of the communitys distinctive green-glazed pottery is sold in neighboring Oaxaca city, with most families here making a subsistence living through that and by growing corn.(Recently, several innovations have been devised to try and help revive the pottery market. In the 1990s, the Mexican government developed lead-free glazes to be mass marketed.( In the 2000s, a cooperative pottery market was created in the town,( and the efforts of potter Dolores Porra, who created new designs and colors, has been recognized.(  )Until the end of the 20th century, only men were permitted to be on the municipal council. The first women were elected to serve in 1999.(The townThe center of the town of Santa Maria Atzompa has a rustic church with two towers, a main plaza with kiosk, one school, and a half built municipal palace in this center. A new crafts market was built here to promote the towns wares. The humble houses are made of adobe and boards and the sidewalks are not paved.( All around town, one can see black smoke rising from the pottery kilns firing jars, pots, comals, plates and other dishes. Most of these are sold in the markets of Oaxaca city, but it is also widely available in the streets of the town in makeshift stalls.( Foods that can be found in markets here include various moles, barbacoa, tamales, nopal soup, with beef and chicken being the most common meats.(Despite being close to the city of Oaxaca, Atzompa is a very poor community which subsists mostly on the production of its signature green pottery.( In very poor neighborhoods such as Colonia Forestal, schools are shacks made from cardboard, wood and boards with dirt floors. Sinks, windows and bathrooms are often missing. These buildings can be very hot or very cold depending on the year and often leak when it rains. In the Colonial Forestal kindergarten, 85 children receive their education in a construction of this type. It was founded in the 1990s, by the Instituto Estatal de Educacion Publica de Oaxaca. The land on which it sits is only loaned to the school.(  )The town is attracting an increasing number of Mexican and international tourists because of its pottery, which is helping the towns economy. The new crafts market has done much to attract these tourists. The market is not only a central location for the sale of the pottery, it is also set up to allow communal selling of the products and allow the artisans to spend less time selling and more time making pottery. The pieces are labeled as to the artisan and the artisans rotate shifts at the market.(It is a very traditional town which, Sundays are still a day of rest when no pottery is worked on.( There are also a large number of celebrations here, the roots of which go back centuries. Weddings are celebrated in the houses of both the bride and the groom, generally taking place on Sunday. On Sunday morning, the grooms parents, accompanied by family, arrive early in the morning to the brides house with a musical band, flowers and an incense burner. They will accompany the bride to the church. The brides dress is usually paid for by the grooms family, but if not, the grooms family will sponsor the lunch. The wedding proper takes place after this lunch. After the wedding ceremony, the bride returns home to receive the blessing of her parents, which is celebrated by fireworks. Another meal is served for family and guests. After this, the grooms family brings three or four live turkeys to the brides house as a symbolic bride price, accompanied by a band. Sometimes this traditional offering is replaced by dishes, clothes, other animals or other gifts. After this, the wedding is further celebrated with drinks and wedding cake. At weddings and other festivals, there is a person designated as the Chigule. This person is an older, respected member of the community, who acts as a master of ceremonies, asking guests to enjoy the food and beverages prepared for the occasion.(Guelaguetza is celebrated each year in July, with food drink and dance. Posadas are celebrated  in December with a local style of atole called champurrado.(  Carnaval is a two-day celebration here, celebrated at the house of a mayordomo, who is chosen each year. The mayordomo is in charge of an image called the Seor del Coro which is a crucifix to which has been attributed miracles. On the second night, a new mayordomo is chosen for the coming year and when the process is concluded, fireworks are set off to allow the village to know. Then a procession to the new house takes place, bringing food, mezcal and a live turkey.(The feast of Our Lady of the Assumption is celebrated in August, beginning with a novena. Processions are held where youths carry litters adorned with crepe paper, bougainvillea flowers and other things. There are also fireworks castles (structures laden with small rockets which move parts), music and a large supper, usually based on beans and rice. On the 15th of August, there is a special Mass, and another communal meal served by the young people of the town. Municipal authorities are present and the evening concludes with a dance and amusement rides.(   Week celebrations here are a mixture of Christian and pagan elements. Holy Tuesday is celebrated at home with family and friends. The traditional drink for this day is called tejate and is prepared by a designated man and either his mother or his wife. The traditional meal s fish with white beans, with a sweet called maja blanca made from ground rice, milk, cinnamon and sugar for dessert. On Holy Thursday, a staging of the Last Supper takes place, which is usually done by the town elders. On Good Friday, streets are cleaned and prepared for Easter Sunday, when the day is celebrated with food, drink and dance on the street. This celebration lasts into Monday.(of the Dead celebrations begin on midnight 31 October, when those with deceased loved ones gather in the cemetery to light the tombs with candles and decorate them with marigolds and other flowers. These people are greeted on the morning of 31 October by municipal authorities who bring a musical band and offer tea and coffee. Religious brotherhoods also arrive with banners and standards. On November 1st, the dead continue to be honored in the home, with a traditional meal of mole, tamales and beans. On 2 November, is called the day of godchildren, co-parents (compadres), friends and family as the dead are often referred to. On this day are eaten bread, hot chocolate and fruit, with the aim of saying goodbye to the deceased who have been visiting. Late in the day, another meal with mezcal or beer may be served.(The Fiesta del Nacimiento (Feast of the Birth) occurs at the house of the mayordomo of a Christ child image. This mayordomo serves for a year and there is a minimum of a five-year wait to be the mayordomo. A daughter of the mayordomo is chosen to sing a lullaby to the image. The event extends from the 24th to the 26th of December. On the 24th, a large number of children gather at the house of the mayordomo to participate in the lullaby. The mayordomos daughter leads this event and is called the madrina del Nio Dios (godmother of the Christ Child). After the lullaby, a meal is served to all the participants, which is usually fish with white beans, hot chocolate and bread. After this, there is a procession in the streets with a musical band towards the church where Mass is held. The 25th and 26th are mostly celebrated at home, with food and drink.(Green glazed pottery of AtzompaAbout 90% of the people in the town proper are dedicated to making pottery, making it the basis of the towns economy. Most of this pottery is created for kitchen use such as for cooking, baking and serving.( The clay is mined from an area called San Lorenzo Cacautepec, four km from the town center. It is still carried by burro along paths used by the towns grandfathers. After the clay arrives at the workshop, the men break and work to make the clay uniform, mixing it and adding water. All members of the family, including the children work. The potters wheels are operated by foot, and date back to the pre-Hispanic era. After a piece is molded, it is set aside for eight days before firing. The color and shine is due to the glazing process, which was introduced in the 16th century by cleric Alonso Figueroa and has remained mostly unchanged since then. The first firing with without the glaze, with the pieces emerging in their natural color and can be used in this form. However, very few pieces of this type will sell and sell at a low price. While the glaze is not inexpensive, it has become necessary to make the pottery acceptable to the market. The second firing to harden and adhere the glaze.(The green color and shine of the pottery is a result of a lead monoxide glaze, which can leach into the foods that the pottery holds. The local people here have been warned of the dangers of the continuous use of the lead pottery but the warnings are unheeded.  Studies have shown that people in potters communities such as Atompa, where lead glaze is used have unusually high levels of the substance in their blood. The exposure comes not only from the making of the pottery, but the use of it to simmer sauces and stews. With time and repeated use, the lead leaches from the glaze into the food. In the 1990s, the Mexican government devised a glaze for pottery which is lead free as a response to lead poisoning problems in the country. A 1995 study showed that 44% of children under five years of age in working class families had high levels of lead in their bloodstreams. Much of the push towards lead-free pottery has been due to economics rather than health when the U.S. restricted imports of Mexican pottery due to lead concerns. Making pottery is a matter of culture and survival for Atompa and many other poor communities in Mexico.(While almost all of Atzompas pottery is of the traditional green-glazed variety, since the 1980s, a potter by the name of Dolores Porras has created the first glazed natural color and multicolored glazed pottery.( Porras developed a white translucent glaze on which to paint colors such as bright oranges, blues, greens and yellows. Each of her pieces are done by hand and are decorated with figures such as borders, mermaids, flowers and iguanas. She has been invited to give workshops in the United States, where she learned about lead-free glazes and has applied these to her work. She has not been able to work for the last years due to Parkinsons disease and diminished sight. She remains poor and dependent on her family for support. In 2010, a ceremony to honor her innovative work was organized by the Arden Rothstein of the Friends of Oaxacan Folk Art Association.( Archeological siteSince 2009, archeological work has been taking place in an area just south of the town center. A number of significant constructions have been excavated including structures called the Casa de Oriental (East House) and Casa de Altares (House of the Altars) and the Central Shrine of Atzompa which is larger than its counterpart in Monte Alban proper. Next to these is a complex of domestic units, sunken patios and a pyramidal platform.(However, the main find has been a 45-meter-long Mesoamerican ball court with two smaller courts next to it. These courts are surrounded pyramidal structures.  The 45-meter court is the largest ever found in the Monte Alban area and investigations indicate that this was the principal ball court for the city, rather than any of the ball courts that are in the Monte Alban site itself. This ball court is situated such that players would have full view of the city located above them. The two smaller courts are secondary and probably used for training ball players.(The site was initially explored in the 1930s by Jorge Acosta. He was only able to examine the ends of the large ball court. He speculated that the constructions at this site were ceremonial and defensive in nature, constructed in the 7th to 9th centuries to protect a growing Monte Alban.( Formal excavation was not considered for the site until recently due to its distance from the main Monte Alban site. The site is still being excavated with plans to open it to the public in 2012.(  ) Starting in 2010, work has intensified in building the infrastructure needed for the Santa Maria Atzompa archeological site, to be opened to the public in 2012 as an adjunct to the Monte Alban site. A laboratory and security booths have been built, paid for by the INAH. The laboratory is for the testing and dating of ceramic pieces and other artifacts. Walking paths are being constructed by the state government.(  ) The archeological work displaced about 100 people from their homes, but the promise of tourism in the future has satisfied the community.(The municipalityAs municipal seat, the town of Santa Mara Atzompa is the local governing authority for itself and the communities of Montealbn, San Jernimo Yahuiche, San Jos Hidalgo, Santa Catarina Montao, La Soledad, La Caada, Rancho Concepcin, La Caadita, Loma del Puente, La Raya de Yahuiche, Salida a San Lorenzo, Los Sibaja (Calle del Canal), Colonia Odisea, El Rincn, Paraje Ro Chiquito, Loma del Paredn and Paraje Loma de la Virgen.(   ) The municipality has a total population of 19,876, 85% of which live in the town proper,(inegi) and covers an area of 22.96km2.( 1,726 people speak an indigenous language. The municipality borders the municipalities of Etla, Jacinto Amilpas, Lorenzo Cacaotepec, Pablo Etla, Pedro Ixtlahuaca and Oaxaca de Jurez .(Main elevations include   Cerro Apazle, Cerro del Bonete, Cerro de la Golondrina, Loma de San Isidro and Loma del Paderon.  There is one river called the Chiquito River, which flows only during the rainy season.   It has a temperate climate.  Natural vegetation includes jacaranda, guaje, mesquite, sapote and American pepper.   Wildlife includes rabbits, hares, frogs, lizards and a wide variety of birds and insects.(   Agriculture employs about 7% of the population, industry, construction and mining 40% and   commerce, tourism and services employ 50%.(ReferencesMara AtzompaMara Atzompa (komunumo)
23218594
Timeline_of_Malaysian_history
This is a timeline of the history of Malaysia. For more detailed annual listings, see Years in Malaysia.Before 1800* 60,000&ndash;2,000 BCE - Malaysia may be traced back as far as 200,000 years ago from stone tools found at Perak, the Man dating 11,000 years old and Perak Woman aged 8000 years.* 2nd&ndash;11th century CE - Reign of Negara founded by Mahawangsas son Raja Ganjil Sarjuna of Kedah.* 2nd&ndash;14th century - Reign of the ancient Hindu Malay kingdom of Langkasuka.* 3rd&ndash;7th century - Reign of the small Hindu Kingdom of Pan.* 7th&ndash;13th century - The ancient kingdom of Srivijayas influence on the Southeast Asia.* 630 - Kingdom founded by Maharaja Derbar Raja of Gemeron of Persia.* 1136 - Maharaja Derbar Raja founds the Sultanate and the Hinduism dynasty ended when Phra Ong Mahawangsa converted to Islam.* 1290 - Srivijaya falls to the Majapahit empire.* 1402 - Sultanate founded by Parameswara.* 1450 - At its peak, the Sulu Sultanates rule stretched to Borneo (now the modern Malaysian state of Sabah).* 1528 - Sultanate was founded by Malaccan Sultan Mahmud Shahs son, Sultan Alauddin Riayat Shah.* 1511 15 August - Malacca came into Portuguese rule after falling to the army led by de Albuquerque.* 1641 - The Dutch with their local allies assaulted and wrestled Malacca from the Portuguese.1800-1899* 1824 March - The Treaty of 1824 was signed by the Kingdom and the Kingdom of the Netherlands to address issues regarding the rights to trade in the Spice Islands.* 1826 - Treaty was signed between Siam and the British to claim ownership over northern Malay states.* 1826 - Settlements were established as part of the territories controlled by the East India Company.* 1831 - Dol Saids opposition of the British taxation policy in Naning led to the Naning War.* 1841 18 August - of Sarawak established by Sir Brooke by receiving independent kingdom status from the of Brunei.* 1861 July - Start of Wars fought among local Malays and Chinese secret societies over the control of mining areas in Perak.* 1867 1 April - Settlements came under direct British control as a crown colony.* 1867 - Raja Mahadis challenge to Raja Abdullah for the authority of Klang led to the War.* 1874 20 January - The Treaty of 1874 signalled official British involvement in the policies of the Malays and start of Malaya.* 1879 25 October - Civil War was triggered when Alam Shah refused to give Muar to the temporary administration of Sultan Abu Bakar of Johor .* 1882 - Borneo became a British protectorate under the sovereign Borneo Chartered Company.* 1895 - Selangor, Perak, Sembilan and Pahang became a federation of states to form the Malay States.* 1896 - Disputes between North Borneo Company and locals led to the Salleh Rebellion.1900-1939* 1909 10 March - Treaty of 1909 between the Kingdom and Thailand effectively dissected the northern states.* 1914 28 October - A naval action named the in the of Penang occurred on the of Malacca, in which the German cruiser  sank two Allied warships.1940s* 1941 December 7 -  In an extensive three-pronged attack, Japan opens hostilities with the Allies and their colonies. The Japanese Army invades Malaya.* 1941 - Japanese occupation.* 1941 December 10 - The British battleship HMS Prince of Wales and battlecruiser HMS Repulse are sunk by Japanese bombers.* 1941 8 December - of Malaya fought by Allied and Japanese forces in Malaya.* 1942 14 January - The last major battle of the Malayan campaign was fought in the of Muar.* 1942 23 January - The Sulong Massacre was committed against Allied soldiers by members of the Imperial Guards Division of the Japanese Army.* 1942 February 9 - The Japanese cross the of Johor by inflatable boats and land in Singapore during the of Singapore.* 1942 February 13 - The Malay regiment, led by Lt. bin Saidi, fight bravely against the Japanese at Panjang Ridge in the of Pasir Panjang.* 1942 18 October - Kedah went under Siamese rule as Syburi.* 1945 June 27 - of North Borneo fought between the Australian 24th Brigade and Japanese.* 1945 January&ndash;June - Death Marches were executed by the of Japan.* 1945 August 14 Japan surrenders, and there is anomie and looting for nearly a month when the British do not return immediately.* 1945 September 5 - The British return after the end of World War II and begin a military administration of the Straits Settlements.* 1945 23 September - Kedah and the three other states were returned to the British.* 1946 1 April - The Straits Settlements is dissolved and the Union was conceived to unify the Peninsula under a single government.* 1948 June 18 - Rubber plantations and tin mines in Malaya are destroyed by communists, and the British declare a state of Emergency over Malaya.* 1948 31 January - Opposition from Malay nationalists forced the Malayan Union to disband and was replaced by the of Malaya, which restored the symbolic positions of the rulers of the Malay states.* 1949 8 October - The of Malaya is formed following the merger of College and Edward Medical College.1950s* 1950 23 February - An armed encounter which took place between the police and the Malayan Communists in the Kepong Incident.* 1956 18 January - A constitutional conference proposed the appointment of the Commission to devise a constitution for a fully self-governing and independent of Malaya.* 1957 21 February - The Reid Commission submitted its working draft to a Working Committee.* 1957 August 15 - The new Federal Constitution was passed by the Legislative Council.* 1957 August 31 - Formal independence of the Federation of Malaya was achieved.1960s* 1961 May 27 - Abdul Rahman, the Prime Minister of Malaya, proposes a merger between Singapore, Malaya, Sabah and Sarawak.* 1962 8 December - The Revolt led by Yassin Affandi began coordinated attacks on oil installations, police stations and government facilities around the protectorate.* 1963 20 January - Indonesian Foreign Minister Subandrio announced that Indonesia would pursue a policy of Konfrontasi with the Federation of Malaysia, Sabah and Sarawak.* 1963 July 9 - The Malaysia Agreement is signed between leaders of Malaya, Singapore, Sabah and Sarawak.* 1963 September 16 - Malaysia is formed. Indonesia carries out its konfrontasi campaign.* 1965 May - Kuan Yew begins campaigning for a Malaysia* 1965 August 7 - Singapore and Malaysia sign the separation agreement.* 1965 August 9 - The Malaysian Parliament votes to expel Singapore from the Federation; Singapore becomes independent after separating from Malaysia.* 1967 February - The Insurgency War was conducted by the Communist Party (CPM) against Malaysian armed forces.* 1969 10 May - The third general election since independence was held in West Malaysia.* 1969 May 13 - Ethnic riots between Malays and Chinese took place in Kuala Lumpur.* 1969 May 14 and May 16 - A of emergency and accompanying curfew was declared throughout the country.1970s* 1971 - A socio-economic restructuring action program known as the New Economic Policy was launched by the Malaysian government.1980s* 1987 27 October - Lalang was carried out by the Malaysian police to crack down on opposition leaders and social activists.* 1988 - A series of events that led to the eventual removal of the Lord President of the Supreme Court that became known as the Malaysian constitutional crisis.1990s* 1993 - The parliament passed amendments to the Constitution of Malaysia with the aim of stripping the royalty of legal immunity.* 1997 - Malaysia slips into recession during the Asian financial crisis.See also*External links* Timeline of Malaysias History, compiled by the Malaysia Tourism Promotion Board, New York.* A History of the Malay Peninsula by Sabri Zain.* Malaysia Timeline by the BBC News Channel.
23234516
Belfort,_California
footnotes               Belfort is an unincorporated community in Mono County, California.( It is located  east-northeast of Fales Hot Springs,() at an elevation of 10210 feet (3112 m).(The place was a mining camp in the 1880s.(References(California)
23254795
Monroe_Abbey
nationality  Monroe Abbey,  (1904 &ndash; November 28, 1993) was a Canadian lawyer specializing in mining law and a Jewish civic leader in Montreal.He was president of Jewish Congress from 1968 to 1971.()He was married to Minnie Cummings. His daughter, Finestone, was a Member of Parliament and Senator.In 1978, he was made a Member of the of Canada in recognition for being devoted community worker who has held office in every important Jewish organization in Montreal.()ReferencesAbbeyAbbey
23277743
Zion__Mount_Carmel_Highway
 refnum86003709The Zion  Mount Carmel Highway was proposed by the Utah Parks Company, which managed tourist concessions in National Park, as a means to link Zion with Canyon National Park and other attractions in northern Arizona. The road runs from the entrance to Zion eastward to Mount Carmel Junction with 89 as a portion of State Route 9. The road became part of a loop tour of Zion, Bryce Canyon, Cedar Breaks and the North Rim of Canyon National Park.()The route was surveyed in 1923 by B.J. Finch, district engineer of the US Bureau of Public Roads, Howard C. Means, a Utah state engineer, and John Winder, a local rancher. The Park Service evaluated alternative routes, including one that used Parunuweap Canyon, but settled on the Pine Creek route, which required a tunnel through the Great Arch. Detailed design work on the road was carried out by the Bureau of Public Roads. Details including bridges, retaining walls, culverts and other features were designed by the National Park Service Branch of Plans and Design under the supervision of Chalmers Vint. Work began in 1927 on a total of  of road, which was completed in 1930.()TunnelThe highway features a  tunnel that follows the profile of the Pine Creek Canyon wall at a consistent distance of  from the outside face of the rock to the centerline of the tunnel. The west portal is framed by a masonry facade of cut sandstone, while the east portal is a naturalistically formed hole in the rock, entered directly from a bridge. Construction proceeded using mining techniques rather than traditional tunneling techniques, starting from a stope and working outward to the portals.() The tunnel uses galleries to provide light and ventilation through the canyon wall to the outside air.  The galleries also provided a place to dispose of rock generated during construction, which was dumped through the galleries into the canyon.  Parking spaces were originally provided at the galleries, but were discontinued due to safety concerns. Some galleries have been repaired and partially closed with concrete due to damage from rockslides. The interior of the tunnel is rock-faced, with concrete reinforcement at selected locations. Work on the tunnel was started in 1927 by the Nevada Construction Company and was completed in 1930 at a cost of $503,000.( At the time of its completion it was the longest non-urban road tunnel in the United States.(New Mountain Highway Has Mile Long Tunnel Popular Mechanics, June 1930, pages 926 and 927) The tunnels restricted dimensions require that vehicles over  in height or  in width give advance notice so that two-way traffic can be shut down in the tunnel, allowing oversize vehicles to proceed down the center of the tunnel. Vehicles over  tall and semi-trailers as well as bicycles and pedestrians are prohibited in the tunnel.()Other significant structures include the Pine Creek and Virgin River Bridges and a second, short tunnel through a rock spur.The Zion  Mount Carmel Highway was placed on the Register of Historic Places in 1987.(See also*of the Valley Road*Entrance Sign (Zion National Park)ReferencesExternal links*Video of vehicle passing through Zion Tunnel*Zion-Mount Carmel Highway, Springdale vicinity, Washington County, UT: 51 photos, 56 data pages, 4 photo caption pages, 3 color transparencies, at American Engineering Record*Zion-Mount Carmel Highway, Tunnel, Two miles east of Zion Canyon Scenic Drive, Springdale vicinity, Washington County, UT: 3 drawings, 43 photos, 32 data pages, 5 photo caption pages, 2 color transparencies, at American Engineering Record*Zion-Mount Carmel Highway, 62-foot Concrete Arch Pine Creek Bridge, Spanning Clear Creek, Springdale vicinity, Washington County, UT: 10 photos, 13 data pages, 2 photo caption pages, at American Engineering Record*Zion-Mount Carmel Highway, Short Tunnel, Passing through Rock Spur on Zion-Mount Carmel Hig, Springdale vicinity, Washington County, UT: 15 photos, 6 data pages, 2 photo caption pages, at American Engineering Record*Zion-Mount Carmel Highway, Virgin River Bridge, Spanning North Fork of Virgin River on Zion-Mount , Springdale vicinity, Washington County, UT: 2 drawings, 16 photos, 16 data pages, 3 photo caption pages, 3 color transparencies, at American Engineering Record*Parkitecture in the Western Parks: Transportation Systems National Park Service
23295818
Beanland_Mine
Beanland Mine, also known as Clenore and A.E. Perron, is an abandoned gold and silver producing underground mine, located in the Temagami region of northeastern Ontario, Canada. It is one of the several mines within the greenstone belt, a belt characterized by felsic and mafic rocks.(Geology and petrogenesis of the Kanichee layered complex, Ontario) The site is in a wooded area and is only accessible by its heavily forested mine road.The mine contains a tunnel where at least a mile of underground mining took place. The entrance to this tunnel is circled with a wire fence and has now partly collapsed from erosion which has blocked the entrance with rock. A long east-west trending trench exists near the partly collapsed tunnel entrance where quartz veins are exposed at the surface. Remnants of buildings include rotten wood and a large rusty tank-like structure cemented with bricks.See also*Mine*Mine*Mine*Mine*Dan Mine*Mine*Mine*Bay Mine*Mine*of mines in OntarioReferencesExternal links*
23316758
Mount_Prindle
 easiest_route  Mount Prindle is a granitic mountain in the Yukon-Tanana Uplands, and is located approximately  north-northeast of Alaska. The plutons that form the core of the Mount Prindle massif are Cretaceous or early Tertiary age. These plutons intruded older (Precambrian to Paleozoic) rocks. Mount Prindle exhibits classic glacial landforms, unlike most of the surrounding Yukon-Tanana Uplands. It is in the Circle Mining District and many of the surrounding creeks have been or are being mined for gold. The area has also been prospected for tin and rare earth minerals. Mine roads and hiking trails provide access to the mountain. A  granite wall on an eastern spur of the massif is an attraction for rock climbers.()The mountain is named for Louis Marcus Prindle (18651956), a U.S. Geological Survey geologist, who worked in in the Fairbanks, Circle, and Fortymile areas of Alaska from 1902 through 1911.()References
23340803
Benair_C._Sawyer
Benair Clement Sawyer, sometimes incorrectly referred to as Benjamin Sawyer (October 18, 1822  March 13, 1908), was the Mayor of Pennsylvania from 1862 to 1864.(A Century and a Half of Pittsburg (sic) and her People, Vol.4, edited by John Newton Boucher. Lewis Publishing (1908))LifeHis family was in the making business. While he was mayor the Civil Wars single worst civilian accident occurred when, on September 17, 1862, the Arsenal exploded and claimed the lives of seventy-eight people. Most of the fatalities were young women. ()After his political career, the of 1873 decimated Sawyers assets, forcing him to move to Colorado. He would later prosper there from investments in mining. He died in California.References(
23372357
Coeur_Alaska,_Inc._v._Southeast_Alaska_Conservation_Council
Coeur Alaska, Inc. v. Southeast Alaska Conservation Council, 07-984 (2009), is a United States Supreme Court case that was decided in favor of Coeur Alaskas permitted right to dump mine waste in a lake. The case addressed tailings from the mine, an underground mine located  in Alaska. The gold mine had not operated since 1928, and Coeur Alaska obtained a permit in 2005 from the States Army Corps of Engineers (USACE) to dispose of up to 4.5 million tons of tailings in Slate Lake, which is located in a National Forest.  The suit was brought by environmental groups citing the Water Act, who wanted the dumping blocked and required a determination of which rules applied and which agencies had jurisdiction. Background In 2005 Coeur Alaska Inc., a subsidiary of dAlene Mines, successfully applied for a tailings disposal permit permit from the USACE. The permit allowed Coeur Alaska to dispose of 4.5 million tons of tailings from the Kensington gold mine (inactive since 1928),  north of Juneau into Lower Slate Lake. The lake is  away from the mine, within the National Forest.()()()The discharge of material into waters of the States is regulated under the Clean Water Act by either the USACE or the Environmental Protection Agency (EPA), depending on what the material is. Discharge of fill material falls under the jurisdiction of the USACE; discharge of other pollutants falls under the jurisdiction of the EPA.() In 2005 Coeur was granted their permit to dispose of their tailings into Lower Slate Lake by the USACE under section 404 of the Clean Water Act on the basis of a definition of fill material which had been revised in 2002 under the administration of W. Bush. This new definition allowed some contaminants to be included in mine waste, while still allowing the mine waste to be classified as fill.( The permit allowed for dumping 4.5 million tons of a combination of waste rock and tailings of ten years, which would result in the floor elevation of Lower Slate Lake to rise by .(Following the Army Corps permitting of the tailings disposal, the Alaska Conservation Club, the Club, and Canal Conservation Inc. filed suit. The suit claimed that the permit was issued in violation of sections 301(a), 301(e), and 306(e) of the Clean Water Act. The States District Court for the District of Alaska found that the USACE was correct in its application of section 404 of the act, because the permit was for fill material, and therefore not covered under or in violation of sections 301(e) and 306(e).In May 2007 the District Courts 2006 decision was overturned by the U.S. 9th Circuit Court of Appeals. The Circuit Court found in favor of the non-governmental organizations, ruling that the discharge was not permitted under the EPAs Source Performance Standard.( Opinion of the Court The Supreme Court found in favor of Coeur Alaska by a vote of 6-3, agreeing that the USACE is indeed the appropriate body for the permitting of mine waste discharge into Lower Slate Lake. In her dissent, Justice Bader Ginsburg stated that currently discharging pollutants into a lake is permitted provided there is enough material to raise the lakes floor elevation, thereby turning it into a waste disposal site.  Ginsburg voiced concern about the potential for pollution regulation to not apply to several industries (mining included) on the basis of this loophole.( Subsequent developments The decision was praised by the Mining Association, which stated that it would provide employment and greater economic certainty for all those involved in the project.( Alaska Governor Palin also welcomed the ruling, calling it a green light for responsible resource development. The environmental groups that originally filed suit against Coeur Alaska were unhappy with the decision. Environmental groups stated that the proposed material includes aluminum, lead, and mercury (among other metals), and that discharging into Lower Slate Lake will have a detrimental effect on the lake and surrounding waters.()   Following the courts decision share prices of dAlene Mines rose over 5%.( See also *of United States Supreme Court cases, volume 557*of United States Supreme Court cases References 
23378803
U.S._v._Utah_Constr._&_Mining_Co.
#REDIRECT States v. Utah Constr. & Mining Co.
23391477
Water_resources_management_in_Honduras
Water resources management (WRM) in Honduras is a work in progress and at times has advanced; however, unstable investment and political climates, strong weather phenomenon, poverty, lack of adequate capacity, and deficient infrastructures have and will continue to challenge developments to water resource management. The State of Honduras is working on a new General Water Law to replace the 1927 Law on Using National Waters and designed to regulate water use and management. The new water law will also create a Water Authority, and the National Council of Water Resources which will serve as an advising and consultative body.() Initiatives such as the new 2009 General Water Law and The Water Framework Law (2003) along with international monetary and technical assistance and an increasing global focus on Water Resources Management (IWRM) provide hope that Honduras will be able to protect and manage well, their water resources. Honduras has abundant water resources as the country is located in the tropics but there in lies another major challenge, Honduras must constantly prepare for and recover from frequent heavy storms and flooding. This became all to evident in 1998 when Mitch made land fall on Honduras killing 7,000 people. Surface water drains into Honduras two primary drainage basins; the Atlantic sloping basin representing 82% of the country, and the Pacific sloping basin accounting for the remaining 13% of Honduras. Together, these two basins drain 106,714 km2 per year. Honduras has ample water availability with annual renewable water resources at 13,766 m3 per capita; well above the world per capita average of 8,467 m3 per year or other Latin American countries at 6,739 m3 per year.( And finally, and of critical importance, the Global Climate Risk Index ranked Honduras as the worlds most vulnerable country to change. This is in large part due to its geographic location in the direct path of many tropical storms and hurricanes.(Water management history and recent developmentsOf a historical note, research and subsequent literature of Water Resources Management in Honduras from the Late Classic period (A.D. 600-900) in Copn, a water-rich region of western Honduras, have suggested that lagoons located in Copns urban residential sectors may have been conceptualized, utilized, and maintained by the inhabitants of surrounding domestic groups. These lagoons, thought to be forms of communal property, created an economic and ideological basis for social integration. Because the lagoons were seen as a shared communal resource, it was difficult for community elites and power brokers to centralize power and monopolize water resources.() Presumably, management of water resources continued to evolve among these native communities until the Spanish conquest. Honduras later declared independence from Spain in 1821; however, information regarding water resource management until 1927 has not been located for this overview. thumb|350px|left|Map of HondurasEarly 20th century developments in Honduran water resources management were in some ways a response to an expanding export market for bananas during the twenties. The need for irrigation within Honduras banana farming operations became important for economic development. These irrigated banana fields were located in the fertil valleys of Sula, Agun y Ceiba along the Atlantic coast.( And today, irrigation is still very important for the agriculture sector of Honduras as it provides for internal consumption and seeks to amplify exports in non-traditional crops.In 1927, the Law on Using National Waters (Ley Vigente de Aprovechamiento de Aguas Nacionales) was passed to approve measures addressing water use, irrigation, industrial use, and hydropower. Furthermore, the 1927 law marked the beginning of policy measures designed specifically to manage water resourcesalbeit not yet integrating sectoral policies. Around 1957, Honduras was mostly under military rule until a freely elected government came to power in 1982. It is unclear how military rule sought to manage water resources during this period. The next major water resources policy measures were signed in 2003 as the Water Framework Law which, among many aspects, aims to reduce poverty through better water resources management.( In August 2009, a new General Water Law was passed to replace the 1927 water law. Within the new water law a National Water Authority was created to oversee the work of sector institutions. .()In spite of ongoing efforts to improve water resources management in Honduras, many challenges continue to exist such as insufficient employment generation, unfavorable investment climate, overvalued currency, lack of credit, high commercial interest rates, deficient infrastructure (water delivery, electricity, communications, and roads), weak legal institutions, inadequate education and workforce productivity, burdensome bureaucratic obstacles, and an unstable political climate.( As Honduras and the international community work together to address these hurdles, Honduras will improve water supplies, quality of water, efficiency in irrigation, important freshwater wildlife habitats, and reduce annual flood damage.()Water resource baseSurface and groundwater resourcesHonduras is divided into two large drainage basins each consisting of watersheds and rivers that drain towards the oceans. The Atlantic sloping side of Honduras is home to 13 watersheds including Honduras largest rivers by volume such as the Ro Patuca, Ro Ulua, and Ro Aguan. Together, the watersheds and rivers on the Atlantic slope account for 87% of the countrys surface water runoff.(accessdate2009-07-01) The Pacific slope side of Honduras has five major watersheds. The important rivers on the Pacific side of the country include the Ri Choluteca which supplies water to the capital city of Tegucigalpa, and the Ri Lempa. All together, the rivers on the Pacific slope convey the other 13% of surface water runoff in Honduras. Total surface water runoff is estimated to be 87 km3 per year with 16% of this water leaving Honduras for neighboring countries of Salvador, Nicaragua, and Guatemala.( Image:Rio cangrejo.JPG|thumb|right|310px|Cangrejal in CeibaSource for tables above: FAO 2000  Groundwater availability is not precise in Honduras, however, wells located in the lowlands of the Atlantic coast historically have good yields and are able to sustainably supplement water needs there.( In 1973, CEPAL (La Comisin Econmica para Amrica Latina), estimated that 9.09 km3 of renewable groundwater could be sustainably exploited for use.( Most of this water (8.02 km3 per year) recharges groundwater on the Atlantic drainage basin of Honduras while the smaller Pacific side basin is recharged by an annual 1.07 km3 of water flowing towards the Pacific.( Groundwater use has been important in the valleys of interior highlands such as Choluteca, Tegucigalpa, and Comayagua where agriculture and irrigation are important to local economies; however, groundwater resources are in significant decline and availability of groundwater for irrigation has subsequently been adversely affected.(Water qualityWater pollution to both surface and groundwater is primarily due to agricultural run-off and untreated effluents from mining activities. Honduras produces coffee for export along the Atlantic coast and many of the pesticides used become toxic effluents that contaminate rivers and seep into groundwater tables. Heavy metals that escape from mining operations along the of Fonseca have become a problem and untreated wastewater originating from large towns and cities has often been discharged into nearby waterways, especially in the case of Lake Yojoa. As of 2000, there were no systematic records of pollution levels in lakes, rivers, and reservoirs.(Natural and artificial storage capacityApart from numerous small lakes, Honduras counts Yojoa as its largest natural lake and is nationally significant for its fish resources and the surrounding diversity of flora and fauna that it supports. Lake Yojoa is important for drinking water and irrigation of fruits, grains, and vegetables as well.() Yojoa has an approximate surface area 90 km2. In addition to Yojoa, there are five dams and reservoirs with the purposes of storing water for consumer consumption, irrigation, and hydroelectric power operations. These dams regulate the flow of 4.21 km3.( The largest of the reservoirs is the El Cajon with a surface area of 94 km2, slightly larger than Lake Yojoa.( Total capacity of the El Cajon reservoir is 5600 million m3 (BCM).()Water resources management by sectorPotable water and sanitationData on water and sanitation in Honduras varies by resource as already pointed out in supply and sanitation in Honduras, however WHO/UNICEF reported in 2006 that sanitation coverage was 69% (broadly defined) with a substantial majority proportion being located in urban settings. Water system coverage was 87% (also broadly defined) with a small majority of this being urban.( )  Water For People works in Honduras and they report water service in rural areas is ~44%. Furthermore, much of this water is not properly disinfected posing serious health risks from water-borne diseases.Irrigation and drainageThe General Directorate of Water Resources (La Direccin General de Recursos Hdricos (DGRH) is responsible for the development, operation, and maintenance of irrigation systems. Honduras could potentially irrigate 500,000 ha of agricultural land; however, as of 2000, only 73,000 ha were under irrigation. About 56,000 ha of the irrigated land is held in private arrangements of which about 47,000 ha is actually being watered. The remaining 17,000 ha is publicly held land.( The move to privatization began in the 1990s when the Honduran government adopted a policy of privatization and decentralization that included an eventual transfer of irrigation systems to users.( These irrigation system transfers are not being eagerly adopted as farmers have a high preference towards privatization and do not want the added responsibility of system maintenance.() The Cortes, Yoro, and Choluteca  provinces are the most developed representing ~50,000 ha of irrigated area.( In response to the continuous increase in water utilization, a 25-year master plan is being promoted by the Honduran government for both irrigation and drainage with total investment of US $143 million.(Drainage in Honduras is of utmost importance to the health of citizens, livestock, and agriculture. Geographically situated in the tropics, Honduras receives large totals of rain from powerful storms and hurricanes, and flooding is an important concern. This constant flooding prompted a 1973 program to build canals and aqueducts in an effort to control flood waters and recuperate agricultural land.( Figures from 1991 show that construction of canals to convey floodwater away from valuable land have recuperated 42,000 ha in the Sula Valley and 20,00 ha in the Agun Valley. Drainage problems in Honduras are most prevalent in the Patuca, Agun, Pltano, Ula, and Chamelecn river basins and cover approximately 340,000 ha.(HydropowerInstalled capacity of electricity generation in Honduras is ~1,500 MW, while hydroelectric output accounts for about 500 MW (33%) of total output. There is large potential for hydropower generation amounting to about 5,000 MW. This growth in hydropower potential resulted from the efforts of former president, Ricardo Mauduro, whom set up a Special Commission for the Development of Hydroelectric Projects.()Notable hydroelectric plants in Honduras include: El Nspero (22.5 MW), Caaveral (28.5 MW), Ro Lindo (80 MW), and El Cajn (300 MW). There are 16 hydro projects that should be commissioned by 2011 and will provide an output of 206.5 MW. Some of the notable projects include: Cangrejal (40 MW), Patuca 3 (100 MW), Los Llanitos (50 MW), and the Jicatuyo (170 MW).( El Cajon, as of 2001, was the largest civil engineering project ever undertaken and produced between 45 and 50 percent of the consumed electricity (650-700 kW in 2000) within Honduras.(Water pricingJon Strand, professor of economics at the of Oslo in Norway, released a paper in 1998 on water pricing in Honduras and its capital city of Tegucigalpa. Professor Strand then presented the papers thesis and findings at a World Bank workshop on water pricing implementation, in Washington D.C. Strands central argument also takes issue with low water tariffs in Honduras and primarily Tegucigalpa. Strand writes, A key problem is water pricing policy, whereby the price charged of those households with access to piped water is only about 20% of long-run marginal cost (LRMC) of supplying this water. The report also discusses in detail other consequences of low prices in Honduras such as: 1)adverse distributional consequences where the poor pay more than the affluent; 2)leading to wasteful water use among those with access; 3)low revenues for the water administration implies that its ability and incentives to improve and maintain the water system is low.()Water privatizationprivatization in Honduras has been a means to development; however, only the Municipality of San Pedro Sula, the largest industrial and commercial area of Honduras with a population of approximately 527,000, opened a bidding process to national and international companies to partake in the privatization process involving a 30-year concession contract. The project aimed to transfer water services of the city of San Pedro Sula from the municipal division, (Divisin Municipal de Agua (DIMA)), into private hands.  In August 2000, the consortium named Acea y Otros won the Concession.  The consortium consisted of a group of Italian companies (Acea, Agac, Astaldi, Carlo Lotti, and Ghella) and a Honduran company, Terra, that served as representative of various international firms.()Legal and institutional frameworkThe 1927 Law on Using National Waters (Ley Vigente de Aprovechamiento de Aguas Nacionales) was a major step for Honduras in water resource management (WRM). This law however, did not recognize multi-sectoral uses of water, therefore, water use in each WRM sector became regulated by their own respective sectoral law. Furthermore, major institutions such as SANAA, CONASA, and ERSAPS have operational functions in both water and sanitation services. As of August 2009, Honduras has passed a new General Water Law with a National Water Authority to provide regulation and oversight to institutions responsible for distinct sectors of water resource management. The General Water Law is discussed below.Water lawsWater Framework Law (Ley Marco Del Sector Agua Potable Y Saneamiento) and decree No. 118 of 2003 constitutes a jurisdictional framework for planning and organizing the management and integrated use of national water resources. A notable strategy of the framework is to reduce poverty through proper management of water resources and by promoting sustainable development. The framework also decentralized management of water away from SANNA to the municipalities.(accessdate2009-07-12)The new General Water Law, (la Ley General de Aguas) was approved by the Honduran Congress on August 18, 2009 and will replace the 1927 Law on Using National Waters discussed below. There are a total of 101 articles in the law and the newly created National Water Authority (Autoridad Nacional de Agua) was the principal decision by legislators. This decentralized water authority will replace the Directorate General of Water Resources, a unit of the Secretariat of Natural Resources (SERNA).(accessdate2009-08-25)The now replaced Law on Using National Waters (Ley Vigente de Aprovechamiento de Aguas Nacionales) was first approved in 1927 and later modified in 1932 and 1945. This water use law enacted special rules in the use of potable and domestic use water, irrigation, navigation, industrial use, fishing, and hydropower. This law also provided for water ownership and use. No special provisions for groundwater were made under this law.(accessdate2009-07-10) Chapter 8 of the 1927 law outlines in fifteen articles how the water of a Honduras shall be used for irrigation. Special note to irrigation is also made in Chapter 3, Art. 10, and Chapter 5, Art. 25 which lists an order of preference for how national waters should be used. Irrigation is listed third after domestic and railway supply respectively.(accessdate2009-07-30)  General Law of the Environment (Reglamento General del Ambiente) or decree No. 104 of 1993. Article 32 names the Public Health Secretary, National Defense of natural resources, and public security responsible for control of illegal sewage dumping on inland waters. Article 74, with special focus on clean water, guaranties a safe and appropriate environment for the population.(Institutional frameworkSERNA (La Secretara de Recursos Naturales y Ambiente)- SERNA, the Ministry of Natural Resources and Environment is charged with responsibly utilizing water resources and sectoral management of water resources. SERNA oversees DGRH and CESCCO (both described below).(accessdate2009-07-09)*The General Directorate of Water Resources (La Direccin General de Recursos Hdricos (DGRH)), a former unit of SERNA, was charged with the development, operation, and maintenance of irrigation systems. DGRH also mapped water use concessions and follows up on hydrological data.() *The Center for Contaminant Control (Centro de Estudios y Control de Contaminantes (CESCCO) studies water quality.(The newly created National Water Authority, (Autoridad Nacional de Agua) replaces the General Directorate of Water Resources and will oversee separate institutions responsible for the administration of water resources, regulating their use, water distribution development, conservation, and maintenance. One objective of the new decentralized separation of institutions is to avoid administrative and sectoral conflicts between the institutions themselves.(accessdate2009-07-30) AJAMs (Asociaciones de Juntas de Agua Municipales) AJAMs are municipal association of boards representing rural communities. The national association of these local boards is the AHJASA (La Asociacin Hondurea de Juntas Administradoras de Agua) or The Honduran Association of Water Board Administrators. Membership is made up from 8 departments and includes 500 members that represent 380,000 users. About 50 AJAMs exist throughout Honduran municipalities.(WSP Field Note 2004, p. 9 WSP - New roles for rural water associations and boards in Honduras)The Honduras water platform (Plataforma del Agua de Honduras) is a group jointly formed by civil society, the international community and the central government. Its fundamental purpose is to promote integrated water resources management in Honduras. This type of management promotes administration of water, its land and related resources, so as to maximize social and economic well-bring. Ideally, this is done in an equitable way without compromising the sustainability of the ecosystems.(accessdate2009-07-10)RAS-HON (La Red de Agua y Saneamiento de Honduras)- This network aims to improve communication between and among institutions, share best practices and experiences, and promote appropriate technologies. The network is made up of members of social society and the government.(accessdate2009-07-09) SANAA (Servicio Autonomo Nacional de Acueductos y Alcantarillados)- SANAA is the countrys national utility for moving water and providing drainage and sewage systems. SANNA is responsible for the operation of about half of the countrys urban water and sewage systems including that of Tegucigalpa. In 2003, a new Framework Law for water supply and sanitation was passed that included service decentralization from SANAA to the municipalities.(accessdate2009-07-09) CONASA (Consejo Nacional de Agua Potable y Saneamiento)- CONASA is the national advisory council office of SANAA on potable water and sanitation. A major component of the CONASA mission is to set national policy, strategies, and plans regarding coverage of water services.(accessdate2009-07-09) ERSAPS (Ente Regulador de los Servicios de Agua Potable y Saneamiento)- ERSAPS serves as the regulator of water and sanitation services.(accessdate) FHIS (El Fondo Hondureo de Inversin Social)- FHIS channels a large proportion of the funding from national funds and donors for water projects.(accessdate2009-07-09)International agreementsthumb|Sunset over the Lempa riverHonduras shares rivers and watersheds with its neighbors and 16% of the surface water in Honduras leaves the country by river towards El Salvador, Guatemala, and Nicaragua. For Example, the Lempa (3.87 km3) and the Goascorn (1.2 km3) together convey 5.07 km3 of water per year to El Salvador. No international agreements exist with the aforementioned countries to regulate the joint utilization and management of shared water resources. There exists only treaties marking geographical limits that do not take into consideration shared water resources.(Environmental issuesProtected areasAlong with the Ramsar sites below, UNESCO recognizes the Maya Site of Copan and the Ro Pltano Biosphere Reserve as Heritage Sites.() These protected areas offer ecosystem services such as protection from floods, and natural water purification. Deforestation, poor water resource management and climate change may all factor into the future health of these protected areas. Ramsar sites in Honduras: 1) de Cuero y Salado - 13,225 ha; 2) de Bacalar - 7,394 ha; 3) Nacional Jeanette Kawas - 78,150 ha; 4) Refugio de Vida Silvestre Punta Izopo - 11,200 ha; 5) de Humedales de la Zona Sur de Honduras in Tegucigalpa - 69,711 ha; 6) del Lago de Yojoa - 43,640 ha.   Source: (Ramsar) 2005.Potential climate change impactsThe Global Climate Risk Index 4 constructed for the period between 1997 and 2006 and covering both human and economic impacts, ranks Honduras 1st in the world, underscoring the countrys very high vulnerability to climate related events, mostly to storms.( ) This vulnerability was evident when Mitch struck Honduras in 1998 causing $4 billion in damage and claiming 7,000 lives.( Yet climate change is expected to bring even greater weather variability to Honduras with less precipitation overall but more powerful storms and heavy rain during hurricane season spawning landslides and floods. Tegucigalpa and neighboring Comayagela (which together form the Honduran capital) are the most affected, due to deforestation and the increased vulnerability to landslides.According to the first national communication to the Nations Framework Convention on Climate Change, the following future impacts from climate change are expected in Honduras: 1) Temperature increases will occur that may alter precipitation patterns and irrigation schedules with the highest temperature increases in May and June. 2) Reduction in precipitation totals with the largest reductions occurring between November and April.Source: World Bank Climate Change country note on Honduras.(ErosionIn an effort to increase exports under global demand for wood, Honduras has cut down forest at an increasing rate and by 1996, annual deforestation was at 108,000 ha. About 170,000 ha of land in Honduras are subject to soil erosion.( Without forest in place, rains have eroded large areas of land and rivers are carrying valuable topsoil downstream. Where dams are built, they have began to silt up with the possible effect of reducing their hydroelectric potential.External assistanceMultilateral cooperationIn 2007, The Bank approved a US$30 million loan for the Water and Sanitation Sector Modernization Project in Honduras.() Relevant water resource management objectives include: 1) Reinforce the national sector actors to fulfill their new roles as a necessity for successful decentralization of the services; and 2) Reduce water in selected areas of Tegucigalpa to provide immediate impact on the service quality.( Jane Armitage, World Bank Director for Central America, says,The Water and Sanitation Sector Modernization Project will not only enable an environment that develops and strengthens service providers, but also will foster transparency and improve their effectiveness in the water sector.() The Development Bank (IDB) also approved a 40 year US$30 million loan to Honduras in 2006 that is now (09) in implementation phases. The soft loan targets improvements in potable water and supports decentralization, improved service management and finance infrastructures. The program also finances studies for transferring Tegucigalpas potable water, currently managed by SANAA, to the Municipality of the Central District of Tegucigalpa. Most of the resources from this IDB loan are being used to finance expansion of potable water.()A US$ 4.6 million grant by the Finance Corporation (IFC) and the Dutch government is benefiting 40,000 low-income households in rural and urban areas of Honduras by improving the financing of water and wastewater infrastructure projects.(At the initiative of the Nations Development Programs country office in Honduras, the Honduran Water Platform (HWP) was established in 2003 with the aim of implementing more suitable management of the countrys water resources.() This led to the 2004 collaboration of the Geological Survey of Denmark and Greenland (GEUS) with the Kvistgaard Consult. Together, these two entities carried out a project that supported the Honduran Water Platform (HWP) in its preparation of a water resource strategy and action plan.(Bilateral CooperationSupport by Canada and a project from the United States with USAID are selected and summarized here.The Canadian International Development Agency is supporting the Honduran water sector in the following avenues: 1) PASOS water project by CARE International (20062011) with a project cost of US $15 million is opening sustainable access to potable water in the Northern coast, strengthening local government mechanisms that are providing services and protections to local watersheds; 2) (UNICEF), with financing from Canada is working to improve water quality and basic hygiene habits, advocate for those with low coverage of safe water, and help prepare for future water emergencies. The project is being implemented in 40 municipalities and 15 neighborhoods in the capital of Tegucigalpa; 3) Canada is planning three new projects with a focus on river basin management for the Choluteca, Nacaome, Lancetilla/Baaderos, Tocoa and Mejocote Rivers; 4) Canada assisted in the aftermath of Hurricane Mitch in 1998 to repair water service and recently, Canada has come to the aid of Honduras after tropical depression 16 in 2008.Sources: (SERNA) 2007; (Canadian International Development Agency (CIDA) 2007.USAID has implemented a four year, US $23 million program called MIRA (Manejo Integrado de Recursos Ambientales) or Integrated Management of Environmental Resources. MIRA is aimed at strengthening the local capacity to create and administer watershed management plans. The program will also stimulate policy reform related to the integrated management of natural resources. MIRA promotes stakeholder dialogues that involve local authorities, private businesses, other donors, NGOs, and the beneficiary communities. The objective here is of building consensus on the vision and priorities needed to achieve that vision. USAID/MIRA is working in 12 out of the 21 watersheds in Honduras. Four of these watersheds (Choluteca, Cangrejal, Patuca and the Bay Islands) had been previously designated by USAID as priority watersheds. An additional eight watersheds were selected based upon bio-physical, socio-economic and institutional criteria.()References
23409980
Royal_Dutch_Shell
 intl              yesRoyal Dutch Shell plc (, ), commonly known as Shell, is a global oil and gas company  headquartered in Hague, Netherlands and with its registered office in London, Kingdom.() It is the fifth-largest company in the world (and the second-largest energy company) according to a composite measure by Forbes magazine and one of the six oil and gas supermajors.()() It is vertically integrated and is active in every area of the oil and gas industry, including exploration and production, refining, distribution and marketing, petrochemicals, generation and trading. It also has major energy activities, including in biofuels, hydrogen, solar and power.Shell has operations in over 90 countries, produces around 3.1 million barrels of oil equivalent per day and has 44,000 service stations worldwide.() Oil Company, its subsidiary in the United States, is one of its largest businesses.()Shell has a primary listing on the Stock Exchange and is a constituent of the 100 Index. It has secondary listings on Euronext Amsterdam and the York Stock Exchange.HistoryImage:COLLECTIE TROPENMUSEUM Afscheepsteiger Tarakan 14 TMnr 10010382.jpg|thumb|left|200px|Royal Dutch Petroleum dock in the East Indies (now Indonesia)File:Shell kantoor Den Haag.JPG|thumb|left|200px|Headquarters in Hague20th centuryThe Royal Dutch Shell Group was created in February 1907 when the Royal Dutch Petroleum Company (legal name in Dutch, N.V. Koninklijke Nederlandsche Petroleum Maatschappij) and the Shell Transport and Trading Company Ltd of the United Kingdom merged their operations(Royal Dutch Shell: History)  a move largely driven by the need to compete globally with the then dominant American petroleum company, D. Rockefellers Oil. The terms of the merger gave 60% ownership of the new Group to the Dutch arm and 40% to the British.Royal Dutch Petroleum Company was a Dutch company founded in 1890 by Baptiste August Kessler,( along with Deterding, when a Royal charter was granted by King III of the Netherlands to a small oil exploration and production company known as Royal Dutch Company for the Working of Petroleum Wells in the Dutch Indies.()The Shell Transport and Trading Company (the quotation marks were part of the legal name) was a British company, founded in 1897 by Marcus Samuel and his brother Samuel.( Their father had owned a company, importing and selling sea-shells, after which the company Shell took its name.() In 1925, he  became 1st Bearsted.  Lord Bearsted was also awarded an Honorary Doctorate of Law (LLD) from the of Sheffield during his lifetime.( Initially the Company commissioned eight tankers for the purposes of transporting oil.In 1919, Shell took control of the Eagle Petroleum Company and in 1921 formed Shell-Mex Limited which marketed products under the Shell and Eagle brands in the United Kingdom. In 1932, partly in response to the difficult economic conditions of the times, Shell-Mex merged its UK marketing operations with those of Petroleum to create and BP Ltd,(Reference and contact details: GB 1566 SMBP Title:Shell-Mex and BP Archive Dates of Creation: 19001975 Held at: BP Archive GB 1566 SMBP) a company that traded until the brands separated in 1975.Around 1953, Shell was the first company to purchase and use an electronic computer in the Netherlands.(The Ferranti Mark 1* that went to Shell labs in Amsterdam, Netherlands (Dutch only)) The computer, a Ferranti Mark 1 Star, was assembled and used at the Shell laboratory in Amsterdam. In 1970 Shell acquired the mining company Billiton, which it subsequently sold in 1994 and now forms part of Billiton.()21st centuryIn November 2004, following a period of turmoil caused by the revelation that Shell had been overstating its reserves, it was announced that the Shell Group would move to a single capital structure, creating a new parent company to be named Royal Dutch Shell plc, with its primary listing on the Stock Exchange, a secondary listing on the Stock Exchange, its headquarters and tax residency in Hague, Netherlands and its registered office in London. The unification was completed on 20 July 2005. Shares were issued at a 60/40 advantage for the shareholders of Royal Dutch in line with the original ownership of the Shell Group.(Shell shareholders agree merger BBC News, 2005) In December 2009 a consortium led by Shell was awarded a production contract for the Majnoon field in the south of Iraq, which contains an estimated  of oil.()In February 2010 Shell and Cosan formed a 50:50 joint-venture comprising all of Cosans Brazilian ethanol, energy generation, fuel distribution and sugar activities, and all of Shells Brazilian retail fuel and aviation distribution businesses.() In March 2010, Shell announced the sale of some of its assets, including its liquid petroleum gas (LPG) business, to meet the cost of a planned $28bn capital spending programme. Shell invited buyers to submit indicative bids, due by 22 March, with a plan to raise $23bn from the sale.() In June 2010, Royal Dutch Shell agreed to acquire all of the business of East Resources for a cash consideration of $4.7 billion. The transaction included East Resources tight gas fields.(Shell Acquires East Resources Tight Gas Fields)Corporate affairsManagementOn 4 August 2005, the board of directors announced the appointment of Ollila, chairman and CEO of Nokia at the time, to succeed Aad Jacobs as the companys non-executive chairman on 1 June 2006. Ollila is the first Shell chairman to be neither Dutch nor British. Other non-executive directors include van den Bergh, Kok, Nina Henderson, Lord Kerr, van Roxe, and Christine Morin-Postel.As of 1 July 2009, Voser is CEO of Shell.(Shell press release) Peter, who is Swiss, is the first non-Dutch, non-British CEO of the company.Name and logoFile:Raikkonen test Ferrari F60.jpg|thumb|right|A Shell-sponsored F60 One racing carThe name Shell is linked to The Shell Transport and Trading Company.( )  In 1833, the founders father, also Marcus Samuel, founded an import business to sell seashells to London collectors. When collecting seashell specimens in the Sea area in 1892, the younger Samuel realized there was potential in exporting lamp oil from the region and commissioned the worlds first purpose-built tanker, the Murex (Latin for a type of snail shell), to enter this market; by 1907 the company had a fleet. Although for several decades the company had a refinery at Haven on the Thames, there is no evidence of this having provided the name.The Shell logo is one of the most familiar commercial symbols in the world. This logo is known as the pecten after the sea shell maximus (the giant scallop), on which its design is based. The yellow and red colours used are thought to relate to the colours of the flag of Spain, as Shell built early service stations in California, which was an early Spanish colony. The slash was removed from the name Royal Dutch/Shell in 2004, concurrent with moves to merge the two legally separate companies (Royal Dutch and Shell) to the single legal entity which exists today.(Royal Dutch Shell Group .com)Operationsplatform.jpeg|thumb|right|The upstream provides two thirds of Shells revenuesImage:HK Shell depot.JPG|thumb|right|upright|Shell oil depot in Kowloon, Hong KongShell has five core businesses: exploration and production (the upstream), gas and power, refining and marketing (the downstream), chemicals, and trading and shipping. Shell has operations in over 140 countries.Shell is a signatory participant of the Voluntary Principles on Security and Human Rights.Oil and gas related activitiesShells primary business is the management of a vertically integrated oil company. The development of technical and commercial expertise in all stages of this vertical integration, from the initial search for oil (exploration) through its harvesting (production), transportation, refining and finally trading and marketing established the core competencies on which the company was founded. Similar competencies were required for natural gas, which has become one of the most important businesses in which Shell is involved, and which contributes a significant proportion of the companys profits. While the vertically integrated business model provided significant of scale and to entry, each business now seeks to be a self-supporting unit without subsidies from other parts of the company.Traditionally, Shell was a heavily decentralised business worldwide (especially in the downstream) with companies in over 100 countries, each of which operated with a high degree of independence. The upstream tended to be far more centralised with much of the technical and financial direction coming from the central offices in Hague. Nevertheless. there were very large exploration and production companies in a small number of major oil and gas production centres such as the United Kingdom (Shell Expro, a Joint Venture with Exxon), Nigeria, Brunei, and Oman.Downstream operations, which now also includes the chemicals business, generates a third of Shells profits worldwide and is known its global network of more than 40,000 stations and its 47 oil refineries. The downstream business, which in some countries also included refining, generally included a retail station network, lubricants manufacture and marketing, industrial fuel and lubricants sales and a host of other product/market sectors such as LPG and bitumen. The practice in Shell was that these businesses were essentially local and that they were best managed by local operating companies  often with middle and senior management reinforced by expatriates. In the 1990s, this paradigm began to change, and the independence of operating companies around the world was gradually reduced. Today, virtually all of Shells operations in various businesses are much more directly managed from London and The Hague. The autonomy of operating companies has been largely removed, as more global businesses have been created.AfricaShell began drilling for oil in Africa during the 1950s. Shell began oil production in Nigeria in 1958.() Shell operates in the upstream oil sector in Algeria, Cameroon, Egypt, Gabon where is the giant Rabi-Kounga oil field, Ghana, Libya, Morocco, Nigeria, South Africa and Tunisia; and in the downstream sector in 16 other countries.()In Nigeria, Shell told US diplomats that it had placed staff in all the main ministries of the government.()In April 2010, Shell announced its intention to divest from downstream business of all African countries except South Africa to Vitol and Helios.() In several countries such as Tunisia, protests and strikes broke out. Shell denied rumors of the sellout.(Shell Denies Rumours of Planned Market Exit) Shell continues however upstream activities/extracting crude oil in the oil-rich Delta as well as downstream/commercial activities in South Africa.AustraliaDocker Street.jpg|thumb|Shell petrol station in Wagga Wagga, New South Wales.In Australia, retailer Group (now part of Wesfarmers) purchased the rights to the retail business from the existing Australia multi-site franchisees in 2003 for an amount less than A$100 million.  The purchase was made in response to a popular discount fuel offer by rival Limited launched some years earlier.Express only affiliation with Shell is that Shell is the exclusive supplier of fuel and lubricant products, leases the service station property to Coles, and maintains the presence of the pecten and other Shell branding on the price board and other signage. Coles Express sets fuel and shop prices and runs the business, provides convenience and grocery merchandise through its supply chain and distribution network, and directly employs the service station staff.Royal Dutch Shell is currently developing the first liquefied natural gas facility, which will be situated 200 km off the coast of Western Australia and is due for completion in around 2017.(ft.com) When it is finished, it will measure around 488m long and 74m wide, and when fully ballasted will weigh 600,000 tonnes.(gastoday.com.au)IrelandShell first started trading in Ireland in 1902.(Book Down Many a Road, the story of Shell in Ireland from 1902 to 200  Bob Montgomery Dreoln Publications 2002 ISBN 1-902773-11-X) Shell E&P Ireland (SEPIL) (previously Enterprise Energy Ireland) is an Irish exploration and production subsidiary of Royal Dutch Shell. Its headquarters are on Street in Dublin.  It was acquired in May 2002.(Shell in Ireland) Its main project is the gas project, a large gas field off the northwest coast, for which Shell has encountered controversy and protests in relation  to the onshore pipeline and licence terms.  In 2005 Shell disposed of its entire retail and commercial fuels business in Ireland to Topaz Energy Group. This included depots, company-owned petrol stations and supply agreements stations throughout the island of Ireland.(Making a big deal: the movers and shakers in Irish business) The retail outlets were re-branded as Topaz in 2008/9.(Topaz spending 50m re-branding Shell and Statoil stations nationwide)Image:Shellgasstationlosthills.jpg|thumb|right|Service station near Hills, CaliforniaNew ZealandShell has had a long-time presence in New Zealand, and partly owns the Maui and Kapuni natural gas fields. In 2011 it completed the sale of its petrol retail division to Infratil and the Zealand Superannuation Fund, which rebranded the stations as Energy. Shell still operates in New Zealand via oil exploration and infrastructure.North AmericaThrough most of Shells history, its business in the United States, Oil Company was substantially independent with its stock (Shell Oil) being traded on the NYSE and with little direct involvement from the groups central offices in the running of the American business. Such practice also changed in the 1990s when Shell first bought out the shares in Shell Oil that it did not own and then took a more hands-on approach. In Canada, also previously very independent, Shell has completed its purchase of the shares in Canada that it did not own, to apply the new global business model.The PhilippinesRoyal Dutch Shell operates in the Philippines under its subsidiary, Pilipinas Shell Petroleum Corporation. Its headquarters is in Makati City and it has facilities  in the Pandacan oil depot and other key locations.(Pilipinas Shell Petroleum Corporation)On January 2010, the bureau of customs claimed 7.34 billion pesos worth of unpaid taxes against Pilipinas Shell for importing cracked gasoline (CCG) and catalytic cracked gasoline (LCCG) stating that those imports are bound for tariff charges.(Nasdaq.com) Pilipinas Shell  denied the claim stating that those imports are materials for making their products. The company later emphasized that they are considering to close their local refinery if the case continues. Pilipinas Shell informed the public that they will exhaust all necessary steps to meet the demand for fuel.ScandinaviaOn 27 August 2007, Royal Dutch Shell and Group, the owner of the 7-Eleven brand in Scandinavia, announced an agreement to re-brand some 269 service stations across Norway, Sweden Finland and Denmark, subject to obtaining regulatory approvals under the different competition laws in each country.() On April 2010 Shell announced that the corporation is in process of trying to find a potential buyer for all of its operations in Finland and is doing similar market research concerning Swedish operations.()()Other activitiesOver the years Shell has occasionally sought to diversify away from its core oil, gas and chemicals businesses. These diversifications have included power (a short-lived and costly joint venture with Oil in the USA); coal (Shell Coal was for a time a significant player in mining and marketing); metals (Shell acquired the Dutch metals-mining company Billiton in 1970) and generation (a joint venture with Bechtel called Intergen). None of these ventures were seen as successful and all have now been divested.In the early 2000s Shell moved into energy and there is now an embryonic Renewables business that has made investments in power, power, hydrogen, and forestry. The forestry business went the way of nuclear, coal, metals and electricity generation, and was disposed of in 2003. In 2006 Shell sold its entire solar business() and in 2008, the company withdrew from the Array which is expected to become the worlds largest offshore wind farm.(Shell pulls out of key wind power project, Times, 1 May 2008)Shell also is involved in large-scale hydrogen projects. HydrogenForecast.com describes Shells approach thus far as consisting of baby steps, but with an underlying message of extreme optimism.()In September 2010, Shell agreed to a $12 billion joint venture with Brazilian sugarcane producer Cosan to develop sugarcane-based ethanol and power.(Shell and Cosan join forces for $ 12 billion ethanol venture)ControversiesImage:ShellgebouwAmsterdam.JPG|thumb|upright|Former Shell Research and Technology Centre, AmsterdamShells compliance to corporate social responsibility also includes its UK and international LiveWIRE programmes. This initiative has over 26 years experience of encouraging young people to start and develop their own businesses in the UK and 26 other countries in the world.()Shell has been criticised for its businesses in Africa, notably in relation to protests of the Ogoni in 1995.(The My Hero Project  Ken Saro Wiwa)In the 1990s, protesters criticized the companys environmental record, particularly the possible pollution caused by the proposed disposal of the Spar platform into the North Sea. Despite support from the UK government, Shell reversed the decision under public pressure but maintained that sinking the platform would have been environmentally better.(Brent Spars long saga BBC News, 1998) Shell subsequently published an unequivocal commitment to development, supported by executive speeches reinforcing this commitment.()2004 overstatement of oil reservesIn 2004 Shell overstated its oil reserves, resulting in loss of confidence in the group, a 17 million fine by the Services Authority and the departure of the chairman Watts. A lawsuit resulted in the payment of $450 million to non-American shareholders in 2007.()()()Canadian oil sandsShell is one of numerous firms who are extracting oil from Canadian sands.(Shell in Canadian oil sands deal)(Shell wants to produce five times more oil from tar sands)Corporate communicationsImage:Shell Centre, London, UK, June 2004.jpg|thumb|upright|Centre building in London, UKShells advertising regarding its energy business has been described as a greenwash by some environmental lobbies,() though its renewable energy activities have been praised by other commentators.()In August 2008, the British Advertising Standards Authority (ASA) ruled that Shell had misled the public in an advertisement when it claimed that a $10 billion oil sands project in Alberta, Canada was a sustainable energy source.()Environmental pollutionThe presence of companies like Shell in Niger-Delta has led to extreme issues in the Niger Delta. Many pipelines in the Niger-Delta owned by Shell are old and corroded. This has resulted in many oil spills in this area that have degraded the environment, killing of vegetation and fish. Shell has acknowledged its responsibility for keeping the pipelines new but has also denied responsibility for environmental causes.(Shell International Petroleum Company, Developments in Nigeria (London: March 1995)) This has led to mass protests from the Niger-Delta inhabitants and Amnesty International against Shell. It has also led to action plans to boycott Shell by environmental groups, and human rights groups.()In Magdelena, Argentina: Shell was responsible for the largest oil spill that has ever occurred in freshwater in the world. On 15 January 1999, a Shell tank ship in Magdalena, Argentina collided with another tanker, emptying its contents into the lake, polluting the environment, drinkable water, plants and animals.(Petroleo en Magdalena  Repblica Argentina www.petroleomagdalena.com (spanish))Health and safetyA number of incidents over the years led to criticism of Shells and safety record, including repeated warnings by the UK Health and Safety Executive about the poor state of the companys North Sea platforms.()Human rightsIn the beginning of 1996, several human rights groups brought cases to hold Shell accountable for alleged human rights violations in Nigeria, including summary execution, crimes against humanity, torture, inhumane treatment and arbitrary arrest and detention. In particular, Shell stood accused of collaborating in the execution of Saro-Wiwa and eight other leaders of the Ogoni tribe of southern Nigeria, who were hanged in 1995 by Nigerias then military rulers.(Shell pays out $15.5m over Saro-Wiwa killing) The lawsuits were brought against Royal Dutch Shell and Brian Anderson, the head of its Nigerian operation.(The case against Shell) In 2009, Shell agreed to pay $15.5m in a legal settlement.( Shell has not accepted any liability over the allegations against it.()In 2009, Shell was the subject of an Amnesty International report into the deterioration of human rights as a consequence of Shells activities in the Delta. In particular, Amnesty criticised the continuation of flaring and Shells slow response to oil spills.(Amnesty.org) In 2010, a leaked cable revealed that Shell claims to have inserted staff into all the main ministries of the Nigerian government and know everything that was being done in those ministries, according to Shells top executive in Nigeria. The same executive also boasted that the Nigerian government had forgotten about the extent of Shells infiltration.() Documents released in 2009 (but not used in the court case) reveal that Shell regularly made payments to the Nigerian military in order to prevent protests.()Sakhalin-II projectProblems have also occurred with the Sakhalin-II project in Russia and the controversial Gas Field development in Ireland. In 2007 of the Earth alleged that the damage caused by Shells oil activities to local communities and the wider environment could be assessed at $20 billion.() Accusations have also been made about the conduct of Shell in Nigeria.(Curse of the Black Gold)Tom Corbett campaign donationsFrom 2009-2010, Shell, acting under East Resources, donated more than $300,000(Tom Corbett, Republican) to current governor of Pennsylvania, Corbett, which some believe was a payoff in exchange for no severance tax and the repeal of environmental policies created to protect the environment from natural gas drilling.(Corbett repeals policy on gas drilling in parks)WhistleblowersShell has set up a global internet-based facility for whistleblowers to report alleged violations of the law or the Shell general business principles, a voluntary code of ethics pledging transparency, integrity and honesty in all of Shells business dealings.()The introduction at the global helpline website says Reporting and addressing suspected violations of the law or the Shell General Business Principles (SGBP) is of critical importance in protecting our reputation and the value of the Shell brand. Whistleblowers are asked to provide identity details but anonymous reports are also accepted. The  Global Helpline operated by Global Compliance, Inc. is available to customers, suppliers, partners, advisers and employees of Shell.(Shell Global Helpline)See also*fuel*Lensbury*royaldutchshellplc.com*Guides, a series of guidebooks*V-PowerReferencesBibliography* A Century in Oil by Stephen Howarth 1997 ISBN 0 297 82247 0.  A History of The Shell Transport and Trading Company.* A History of Royal Dutch Shell by Stephen Howarth and others 2007. ISBN 978 0199298778* Seven Sisters by Anthony Sampson (1981) ISBN 978 0553234695* Shell Shock: The secrets and spin of an Oil Giant by Ian Cummins and John Beasant 2005. ISBN 1 84018 941 XExternal links***corporate criticism aggregator  Critics of Shell websitelist1  Dutch ShellDutch Shellda:ShellDutch ShellDutch ShellDutch ShellDutch Shell (entreprise)ga:Shell (perusahaan)Dutch ShellDutch Shellhe:Dutch ShellDutch Shell ms:ShellDutch Shellja:Dutch ShellDutch ShellDutch ShellDutch ShellDutch ShellDutch ShellDutch ShellDutch Shellsv:Shell Dutch ShellDutch ShellDutch Shellzh:
23435580
Mining_in_Djibouti
Mining and manufacturing in Djibouti accounted for 3 percent of the domestic product (GDP) in 2004, which stood at around $1.6 billion.Djibouti has been known to produce occasional small quantities of clays, granite, limestone, marble, salt, sand and gravel, and crushed and dimension stone for domestic construction projects.There was no cement production in the country; most imports came from Gulf countries. Other mineral occurrences of potential economic interest included diatomite, geothermal fluids and mineral salts, gold, gypsum, perlite, petroleum, and pumice.Salt was the only mineral produced in 2004. Extracted from evaporated pans by artisanal miners in the marshes of Tadjoura, salt production fell sharply from the 173,099 metric tons produced in 2001 to an estimated 30,000 metric tons in 2004. The government hoped to establish, by the end of 2002, a fiscal, institutional, and legal framework to support the development of domestic natural resources. The government also planned to promote the use of local materials in construction and public works. The outlook for the mineral industry was for little growth in the short run; constraints included small domestic markets, minimal known natural resources, and slow GDP growth.See also*of DjiboutiReferencesExternal links* La Mancha - Ity Mine
23445656
Sagittaria_secundifolia
Sagittaria secundifolia (Krals water plantain, Little River arrowhead) is an plant, growing on or below the water, on rocky creek beds and nearby slopes. It is found only along the Little River of Alabama,(12. Sagittaria secundifolia Kral, of North America) and is endangered.  It is often found in association with azaleas, mountain laurel and holly. Perennial, aquatic herb with an underwater, thick horizontal root about 510 centimeters (24 in) long and 6 millimeters (0.25 in) thick. This particular plantain grows in the cracks in stream beds. Each leaf arches upward and is 510 centimeters (24 in) long with a pointed tip. This particular plantain is found in the Little River drainage in DeKalb and Cherokee counties, the Town Creek drainage in DeKalb County, and in the West Sipsey Fork in Winston County in Alabama. Krals Plantain is known to be in the southeast of the United States..(http://www.fs.fed.us/wildflowers/rareplants/profiles/tep/sagittaria_secundifolia/index.shtml)  Both threatened and endangered species and poached species are critical resources to several parks.   The last known population of Krals Water Plantain is in the Little River system (USFWS 1991), and the endangered Green Pitcher Plant and Harperella are also found there (LIRI). The Lookout Mountain (CHCH) population of the federally endangered Mountain Skullcap is listed as one of the last ten remaining population. The Tennessee Coneflower population at STRI is one of five remaining (USFWS 1989).  (http://ecos.fws.gov/speciesProfile/profile/speciesProfile.action?spcodeQ2VT)Some of things that Krals plantain is endangered because of things like;Erosion-related water quality degradation, siltation and turbidity, resulting from development residential -recreational, surface mining, agriculture, and forest conversion. Another thing that cause the plantain to be endangered is water pollution from garbage dumping and leaking sewage systems. Water impoundments and off road vehicle traffic also causes great harm towards the Plantain.(http://plants.usda.gov/java/profile?symbolSASE9)ReferencesExternal links*http://ecos.fws.gov/speciesProfile/profile/speciesProfile.action?spcodeQ2VT*http://www.fs.fed.us/wildflowers/rareplants/profiles/tep/sagittaria_secundifolia/index.shtml*http://plants.usda.gov/java/profile?symbolSASE9
23461325
Banksula_californica
Banksula californica is a species of harvestman in family Phalangodidae. The animal is less than 2 mm in length. It is possibly extinct because the type locality, the place from where the type specimen of the species was collected, Cave in Dorado County, California, has been partially destroyed due to mining and has been sealed by concrete, making surveying impossible. References* * * 
23473149
El_Cobre
El Cobre may refer to:* Copper, 29th chemical element in language* Mining town of El Cobre in Cuba. Famous as the pilgrimage location for the Lady of Charity.* El Cobre cigars, manufactured in Nicaragua by Oliva companyCobre
23493896
Jindal_Group
The Jindal group is a US$ 15 billion conglomerate, which over the last three decades has emerged as one of Indias most dynamic business groups. Founded in 1952 by O.P. Jindal, a first-generation entrepreneur, it is today a leading steel producer, with interests spanning across the spectrum, from mining iron ore, to manufacturing value-added steel products.External links *     
23505170
Hale_Tharp
Hale Dixon Tharp was a miner during the Gold Rush, and the first non-Native American to enter Forest, in what is now National Park.Gold CountryTharp was born in Michigan in 1828. In 1851, a widow from Illinois, Chloe Ann Smith Swanson, hired Tharp to take her and her four sons to California in a wagon with two teams of oxen. They settled in Placerville, where Tharp married Swanson.(Challenge of the Big trees) Tharp then began mining in Californias Country.(ancestry.com)SequoiaIn the summer of 1856, Tharp went to Tulare County to establish a preemption homestead, with the intent to return later to ranch cattle. He built a shake and brush shack near the confluence of the River and Horse Creek, east of Visalia and south of Three Rivers. He then returned to Placerville.(Two years later, Tharp, along with his brother-in-law John Swanson, returned to his homestead and built a log cabin and barn, Cabin. Tharp then sought cattle summer pasturage. Led by the local Yokut Indians, Tharp discovered Meadow and Log Meadow near the Forest.  He claimed grazing rights there for several years.(  Log is a home Tharp built in a hollowed Giant sequoia (Sequoiadendron gigantuem) log at Log Meadow. It is restored and visited by tourists in National Park today, and is on the Register of Historic Places.Hale Tharp, along with stepsons George and John Swanson, were the first non-Native Americans known to ascend the granite dome Rock.(kaweahcommonwealth.com)References
23520345
Fairmount_Cemetery_(Denver,_Colorado)
political  Political GraveyardFairmount Cemetery in Colorado was founded in 1890 and is Denvers second oldest operating cemetery after Riverside Cemetery.()() It was designed by German landscape architect Schuetze.() The cemetery is 280 acres with over 3800 trees.() The cemetery contains many fine monuments, including works by Garrison, John Paulding, Ronnebeck, Coppini and others.(Kvaran, Einar Einarsson Cemetery Sculpture in America, unpublished manuscript)The cemetery also contains 3 structures which have been designated as official historic landmarks by the City of Denver: the Little Ivy Chapel, the Gate Lodge, and the Fairmount Mausoleum. The Little Ivy Chapel and the Gate Lodge were both constructed in 1890, the year the cemetery opened, and were designed by architect Ten Eyck Wendell. The Fairmount Mausoleum, constructed in 1929 and opened in 1930, was designed by architects E. Mountjoy and W. Frewan.(Notable Burials*Llewellyn Allott (19071989), US Senator*Milton Ammons (18601925), Colorado Governor*Ammons (18951972),  Colorado Governor*Crossman Bailey (18601937), Denver Mayor*Pierce Baldwin (18331912), Civil War Union Brevet Brigadier General*Bancroft (19001985), Newspsper reporter, writer*William J. Barker (died 1911), Denver Mayor of Fairmount Mausoleum at Fairmount Cemetery, Denver.JPG|thumb|258px|right|The main entrance to the Fairmount Mausoleum*Davis Begole (18771956), Denver Mayor*Blonger (18491924), Saloonkeeper, gambling house owner and kingpin of Denver underworld*Boettcher (18521948), Businessman, philanthropist*Gilmer Bonfils (18601933), co-founder of the Post*Bonfils (18891972), businesswoman, philanthropist*Cordes Brown (18201906), founder of the Brown Palace Hotel*Sidney Brown (18331913), businessman and railroad developer*Flagg Brown (18271908), businessman and founder of Museum of Natural History*C. Bryan (18521933), Indian Wars Congressional Medal of Honor Recipient*Augustus Buchtel (18471924), Colorado Governor*Hoyne Buell (18951990), Architect*Evans Burney (18931969), US Representative from Colorado*Newton Byers (18311903), founder and editor of the Mountain News in Colorado*Lewis Cass Carpenter (18361908), US Representative from Carolina *Lawrence Carr (18871950), Colorado Governor*Scott Cheesman (18381907), Colorado businessman*Washington Cook (18511916), US Representative from Colorado*Adams Cooper (18431899), Colorado Governor*Prentiss Costigan (18741939), US Senator*Worden Erskine Cranmer (18961984), journalist and author*Schoonmaker Decker (18391903) US District Attorney*Hoyt Dominick (19151981), US Representative from Colorado, US Senator*Wallace Dorsey (18421916), US Senator from Arkansas*Major Jacob Downing (18301907), Lawyer, Civil War Officer*Robb Eaton (18771942), US Representative from Colorado*Edbrooke (18401921), leading architect in Denver*Elitch (18511891), founder of Gardens*Hauck Elitch-Long (18561936), founder of Theatre*A. Falkenburg (18571925), co-founder of the World, Pacific Jurisdiction*Garrett Fisher (18441897), co-founder of Daniels & Fisher*Ford (18711952), medical pioneer*Gates, Sr. (18771961), founder of Rubber Company*Milton Gillespie (18841949), US Congressman*Morrill Gove (18671924), Architect*E Aaron Gove (18391919), first superintendent of Denver Public Schools*Benton Grant (18481911), Colorado Governor*K. Griffith (18681947), Educator *Caldeen Gunter (18581940), Colorado Governor*Leslie Hagaman  (18941966), Kansas Governor*Armstrong Haggott (18641958), US Representative from Colorado*M. Hale (18331901), Educator*Hale (18611930), founder of of Foreign Wars*Hallett (18341913), Chief Justice, US District Judge*Peter Hill (18321900), US Senator*Lee Howsam (19182008), co-founder of the Denver Broncos*Charles James Hughes Jr. (18531911), US Senator*Wesley Iliff (18311878), prominent cattle rancher*L. Johnson (19172000), US Representative from Colorado*Edwin Carl Big Ed Johnson (18841970), Colorado Governor, US Senator*Irving Johnston (18921949), World War I Congressional Medal of Honor Recipient*Jay Joslin (18291926), Founder, Joslins Department Store*Keith (musician) (19332006), Jazz Musician *John Kindel (18551930), US Representative from Colorado*Lee Knous (18891959), Colorado Governor*White Lawrence (19161990), Bishop and the third President and General Superintendent of the of Fire Church()*Londoner (18421912), Denver Mayor*Austin Hamilton Loveland (18261894), railroad entrepreneur and businessman*Francis Brown Lowry (18941918) WWI Officer, Air Force Base was named in honor of him*William Means (18771949), US Senator*Meek (18781946), popular character actor*Donald Millikin (18911958), US Senator*Halliday Moffat (18391911), financier and industrialist*Stanford Moore (19031973), Major League Baseball Player*J. Morley (18691948), Colorado Governor*E. Mountjoy (18701941), architect, co-designer of the Fairmount Mausoleum*Quigg Newton Jr. (19112003) Denver Mayor*Danford Nicholson (18591923), US Senator*M. Orahood (18411915), Civil War Union Army Officer*Orr (18321926), US Representative from Colorado*MacDonald Patterson (18391916), US Representative from Colorado, US Senator*Cowle Phipps (18621958), US Senator*Pitkin (18371886), Colorado Governor*H. Platt, Jr. (18371894), US Representative from Colorado*H. Price (18591904), US Representative from Colorado Cemetery (Denver, Colorado).jpg|thumb|258px|right|Francis Brown Lowry monument by John Paulding*M. Porter (18381937), Rancher, banker, donated land and money for Porter Adventist Hospital*MacLeod Raine (18711954), Western Author*Myron W. Reed (18361899), religious leader, social reformer, co-founder of United Way*Sawers Roeschlaub (18431923), architect*Rogers (18431909), Prominent Madam*Rena Sabin (18711953), American medical scientist*Cortlandt Schuyler (18771933), US Senator*Franklin Shafroth (18541922), US Representative from Colorado, Colorado Governor, US Senator*Eamon Shoels (19801999), Columbine High School Shooting Victim*Silks (18461929), Famous madam*Smith (18321906), prominent bank, mine and railroad owner.*W. Speer (18551918),  Denver Mayor*Madeline Bonfils Stanton (18831962), Philanthropist*Gifford Symes (18401893), US Representative from Colorado*Heye Tammen (18561924), co-founder of the Post*Moore Teller (18301914), US Senator, Secretary of the Interior between 1882 and 1885.*H. Teller (18501937), Lawyer, Judge, and Legal Pioneer of Western Judicial System*Addison Thatcher (18381918), Businessman*Spalding Thomas (18491934), Colorado Governor, US Senator*H. Turpin (18461893), Indian Wars Congressional Medal of Honor Recipient*Newell Vaile (18761927), US Representative from Colorado*Cox Vasconcelles (18921950), World War I flying Ace*Van Horn (18371895), Civil War Veteran, Mayor of Denver*D. Ward (18291902), US Representative from Colorado*Ward (18911972), US Army Major General*White Warren (18311912), Bishop of Methodist Episcopal Church*Henry Ernest Waters (18521893), International mining engineer*Thomas James Waters (18431898), International architect*White (18861923), first supreme commander of Woodmen*Bridwell White (18921946), of the of Fire Church()*J. Zang (18561916), owner of Zang BreweryReferencesExternal links*Fairmount Cemetery & Mortuary*Fairmount Heritage Foundation*Images of tombstones
23544631
Dark_River_(Minnesota)
 The Dark River is a DNR designated Trout Stream located approximately 10 miles north of Chisholm, MN.   The stream offersmoderate angling opportunites for Brown Trout, and the occasional Northern Pike has been caught here.   It begins at Dark Lakeand as this is a tributary of the Sturgeon River, it ends where it meets that river.   There is an excellent hiking trail along the North side of the river, which does not offer much in the way of angling opportunities, but it does offer a lot in the way of good back country camping, mushroom hunting and small game.  The SouthTrail offers the Angler Access trail which provides stream-bank access for shore fishermen, and more convenient accessfor those with waders wanting to do fly fishing. There are no designated campsites along this river or trail, but there are many excellent spots to set up.   This river is narrow and quite curvy with little to no drop so it stays level. Canoe access would be difficult on thisriver and is not recommended.  There are many trees down across this river in places, and water navigation is considereddifficult at best.This river is the site of a multi-organizational cleanup and restoration effort.    Area mining is thought to have pollutedsmaller rivers, destroying aquatic invertebrates, and in turn, destroying the fish and wildlife populations.  Efforts in recentyears to turn this around have yielded some moderate success, but citizens continue to keep a watchful eye on the river in hopesfor a restored fishery.  The Dark River is a river of Minnesota.See also*of rivers of Minnesotanotes()References*Minnesota Watersheds*USGS Hydrologic Unit Map - State of Minnesota (1974)
23558678
Environmental_impact_of_the_energy_industry
File:World Energy consumption.png|right|thumb|250px|Rate of world energy usage in terawatts (TW), 1965-2005.()thumb|250px|Energy consumption per capita per country (2001). Red hues indicate increase, green hues decrease of consumption during the 1990s.()The environmental impact of the industry is diverse. Energy has been harnessed by humans for millennia. Initially it was with the use of fire for light, heat, cooking and for safety, and its use can be traced back at least 1.9 million years.() In recent years there has been a trend towards the increased commercialization of various renewable energy sources.In the real world of consumption of fossil fuel resources which lead to warming and climate change however little change is being made in many parts of the world. Chinese oil demand for instance, is projected to grow nearly 20% in the next six years, and that country already imports over half of the  it uses.()  If the oil theory proves out, more explorations of viable alternative energy sources, could be more friendly to the environment.Rapidly advancing technologies can achieve a transition of energy generation, water and waste management, and food production towards better environmental and energy usage practices using methods of ecology and ecology.(Kay, J. (2002). Kay, J.J. On Complexity Theory, Exergy and Industrial Ecology: Some Implications for Construction Ecology. In: Kibert C., Sendzimir J., Guy, B. (eds.) Construction Ecology: Nature as the Basis for Green Buildings, pp. 72107. London: Spon Press. Retrieved on: 2009-04-01.)(Baksh, B. and Fiksel  J. (June 2003) The Quest for Sustainability: Challenges for Process Systems Engineering. American Institute Of Chemical Engineers Journal 49(6):1355. Retrieved on: 2009-04-04.)IssuesClimate changewarming and change due to human activity is generally accepted as being caused by anthropogenic gas emissions. The majority of greenhouses gas emissions are due to burning fuels with most of the rest due to deforestation.There is a highly publicized denial of climate change but the vast majority of scientists working in climatology accept that it is due to human activity. The IPCC report Climate Change 2007: Climate Change Impacts, Adaptation and Vulnerability predicts that climate change will cause shortages of food and water and increased risk of flooding that will affect billions of people, particularly those living in poverty.()Biofuel useBiofuel is defined as solid, liquid or gaseous fuel obtained from relatively recently lifeless or living biological material and is different from fossil fuels, which are derived from long dead biological material. Also, various plants and plant-derived materials are used for biofuel manufacturing.Bio fuels are a energy and can be sustainable (neutral) in terms of greenhouse gas emissions since they are in the cycle for the short term.Bio-dieselHigh use of bio-diesel leads to land use changes including deforestation.FirewoodUnsustainable firewood harvesting can lead to loss of biodiversity and erosion due to loss of forest cover. An example of this is a 40 year study done by the of Leeds of African forests, which account for a third of the worlds total forest which demonstrates that Africa is a significant sink. A change expert, Lee White states that To get an idea of the value of the sink, the removal of nearly 5 billion tonnes of dioxide from the atmosphere by intact tropical forests is at issue.According to the U.N. the continent is losing forest twice as fast as the rest of the world. Once upon a time, Africa boasted seven million square kilometers of forest but a third of that has been lost, most of it to charcoal.()Fossil fuel useImage:Global Carbon Emissions.svg|thumb|right|thumb|Global fossil carbon emission by fuel type, 1800-2007 AD.The three fuel types are coal, petroleum and gas. It  was estimated by the Information Administration that in 2006 primary sources of energy consisted of petroleum 36.8%, coal 26.6%, natural gas 22.9%, amounting to an 86% share for fossil fuels in primary energy production in the world.()The burning of fossil fuels produces around 21.3 billion tonnes (21.3 gigatonnes) of dioxide per year, but it is estimated that natural processes can only absorb about half of that amount, so there is a net increase of 10.65 billion tonnes of atmospheric carbon dioxide per year (one tonne of atmospheric carbon is equivalent to 44/12 or 3.7 tonnes of carbon).()   Carbon dioxide is one of the gases that enhances forcing and contributes to warming, causing the average surface temperature of the Earth to rise in response, which climate scientists agree will cause major adverse effects.CoalThe environmental impact of coal mining and burning is diverse.() Legislation passed by the U.S. Congress in 1990 required the States Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) to issue a plan to alleviate toxic pollution from coal-fired power plants.  After delay and litigation, the EPA now has a court-imposed deadline of March 16, 2011, to issue its report. Petroleum File:Oil-spill.jpg|right|thumb|A beach after an spillThe environmental impact of petroleum is often negative because it is toxic to almost all forms of life. The possibility of change exists. Petroleum, commonly referred to as oil, is closely linked to virtually all aspects of present society, especially for transportation and heating for both homes and for commercial activities.Gasgas is often described as the cleanest fossil fuel, producing less carbon dioxide per joule delivered than either coal or oil.,(Natural Gas and the Environment) and far fewer pollutants than other fossil fuels.  However, in absolute terms it does contribute substantially to global carbon emissions, and this contribution is projected to grow. According to the Fourth Assessment Report,(Fourth Assessment Report (Working Group III Report, Chapter 4)) in 2004 natural gas produced about 5,300 Mt/yr of CO2 emissions, while coal and oil produced 10,600 and 10,200 respectively (Figure 4.4); but by 2030, according to an updated version of the SRES B2 emissions scenario, natural gas would be the source of 11,000 Mt/yr, with coal and oil now 8,400 and 17,200 respectively. (Total global emissions for 2004 were estimated at over 27,200 Mt.)In addition, natural gas itself is a greenhouse gas far more potent than carbon dioxide when released into the atmosphere but is released in smaller amounts.Electricity generationThe environmental impact of electricity generation is significant because modern society uses large amounts of electrical power.  This power is normally generated at plants that convert some other kind of energy into electrical power.  Each such system has advantages and disadvantages, but many of them pose environmental concerns.ReservoirsThe environmental impact of reservoirs is coming under ever increasing scrutiny as the world demand for water and energy increases and the number and size of reservoirs increases. Dams and the reservoirs can be used to supply water, generate hydroelectric power, increasing the water supply for irrigation, provide recreational opportunities and to improve certain aspects of the environment. However, adverse environmental and sociological impacts have also been identified during and after many reservoir constructions. Whether reservoir projects are ultimately beneficial or detrimental&mdash;to both the environment and surrounding human populations&mdash; has been debated since the 1960s  and probably long before that. In 1960 the construction of Celyn and the flooding of Celyn provoked political uproar which continues to this day. More recently, the construction of Gorges Dam and other similar projects throughout Asia, Africa and America have generated considerable environmental and political debate.Nuclear powerThe environmental impact of power results from the fuel cycle, operation, and the effects of accidents such as the disaster (1986) and I nuclear accidents (2011).Wind powerCompared to the environmental effects of traditional energy sources, the environmental effects of wind power are relatively minor. power consumes no fuel, and emits no pollution, unlike fossil fuel power sources. The energy consumed to manufacture and transport the materials used to build a wind power plant is equal to the new energy produced by the plant within a few months. While a wind farm may cover a large area of land, many land uses such as agriculture are compatible, with only small areas of turbine foundations and infrastructure made unavailable for use.( Why Australia needs wind power)MitigationEnergy conservationEnergy conservation refers to efforts made to reduce energy consumption. Energy conservation can be achieved through increased energy use, in conjunction with decreased energy consumption and/or reduced consumption from conventional energy sources.Energy conservation can result in increased capital, environmental quality, security, security, and human comfort.  Individuals and organizations that are direct consumers of energy choose to conserve energy to reduce energy costs and promote security. Industrial and commercial users can increase energy use efficiency to maximize profit.Energy policyEnergy policy is the manner in which a given entity (often governmental) has decided to address issues of development including production, distribution and consumption.  The attributes of energy policy may include legislation, international treaties, incentives to investment, guidelines for conservation, taxation and other public policy techniques.Sustainable energySustainable energy is the provision of energy that meets the needs of the present without compromising the ability of future generations to meet their needs. Sustainable energy sources are most often regarded as including all energy sources, such as hydroelectricity, energy, energy, power, energy, bioenergy, and power. It usually also includes technologies that improve energy efficiency. Economic instrumentsVarious economic instruments can be used to steer society toward sustainable energy. Some of these methods include ecotaxes and trading.economics aims to address some of the interdependence and coevolution of human economies and natural ecosystems over time and space.( ) economics, is the mainstream economic analysis of the environment, which views the economy as a subsystem of the ecosystem, while ecological economics emphasis is upon preserving capital.() ()economics sometimes referred to as thermoeconomics is discussed in the field of economics and relates directly to conversion, which itself is related to the fields of sustainability and development especially in the area of carbon burning.()See also*of environmental issues*Energy*economics*accounting*transformation*Energetics*quality*energetics*ecology*Thermoeconomics*ecology*of energy articles*and Environment*impact of aviation*Venus ProjectReferencesExternal links*United Nations Development Programme - Environment and Energy for Sustainable Development
23575032
Sexual_violence_in_the_Democratic_Republic_of_the_Congo
Democratic Republic of the CongoRights Watch defines sexual violence as an act of a sexual nature by force, or by threat of force or coercion, and rape as a form of sexual violence during which the body of a person is invaded, resulting in penetration, however slight, of any part of the body of the victim, with a sexual organ, or of the anal or genital opening of the victim with any object or other part of the body.() In the eastern Republic of the Congo, the prevalence and intensity of rape and other forms of violence has been described as the worst in the world.() Background Since 1996, sexual violence as described above has been used to intimidate, humiliate, and torture hundreds of thousands of women and girls in the Republic of the Congo.(DRC Rape Survivors Break Their Silence: Call for an End to Sexual Violence in the DRC | V-Day: A Global Movement to End Violence Against Women and Girls Worldwide. V-Day (2008-09-22). Retrieved on 2011-10-01.)  Rape in the Republic of Congo has frequently been described as a weapon of war, and the Nations officially declared rape a weapon of war in 2008.(Kristof, Nicholas D., and Sheryl WuDunn. Half the Sky: Turning Oppression into Opportunity for Women Worldwide. New York: Alfred A. Knopf, 2009. Print.) Rape makes a particularly effective weapon in genocide because not only does it destroy its physical victims, but entire communities as well.(Rape: Weapon of war. Ohchr.org. Retrieved on 2011-10-01.)  Today, the Republic of the Congo, particularly the eastern region of the country, is known as the rape capital of the world.(Half the Sky Kristof, Nicholas D., and Sheryl WuDunn. Half the Sky: Turning Oppression into Opportunity for Women Worldwide, p. 84. New York: Alfred A. Knopf, 2009. Print.) While the law specifically prohibits and provides penalties of 10 to 20 years imprisonment for child and forced prostitution, pimping, and trafficking for sexual exploitation....There were no reported investigations or prosecutions of traffickers during the year 2007. ( United States State Department, Country Report on Human Rights Practices: DR Congo, 2007), 5; as cited in www. womanstats.org ) There is no law against spousal sexual assault. (  United States State Department, Country Report on Human Rights Practices: DR Congo, 2005), second paragraph. As cited in www. womanstats.org. )Rape is simply a fact of life in the DRC.  As Noel Rwabirinba, a sixteen year old who had been a militiaman for two years said, If we see girls, its our rightwe can violate them(Half the Sky Kristof, Nicholas D., and Sheryl WuDunn. Half the Sky: Turning Oppression into Opportunity for Women Worldwide, p. 86. New York: Alfred A. Knopf, 2009. Print.)  This casual statement reflects a generally callous attitude towards the female sex as well as the normalization of rape in the DRC.The unimaginable cruelty of sexual violence reported in the DRC conflict includes public rape in front of the family and community, forced rape between victims, the introduction of objects into the victims cavities, pouring melted rubber into womens vaginas, shooting women in the vagina and inducing abortions using sharp objects.( Geneva Centre for Democratic Control of Armed Forces, Global Report on Sexual Violence in Armed Conflict, 2007) Africa, 17. As cited in www.womanstats.org. ) Rape statistics In October 2004 the rights group International said that 40,000 cases of rape had been reported over the previous six years, the majority occurring in Kivu. This is an incomplete count, as the humanitarian and international organizations compiling the figures do not have access to much of the conflict area; only women who have reported for treatment are included.  It is estimated that there are as many as 400,000 surviving rape victims living in the Democratic Republic of the Congo today.()()  Tens of thousands of women and girls in the DRC have become victims of sexual violence over the past fifteen years.  The Nations Population Fund (UNFPA), a Nations agency specializing in sexual violence in the DRC has reported that 15,996 new instances of sexual violence were recorded across the nation in 2008.  There were 4,820 new cases in Northern Kivu alone.  UNFPA also reported that over 65% of victims during that time were children.  The majority of this percentage was adolescent girls and roughly 10% of child victims are said to be under 10 years old.(Soldiers Who Rape, Commanders Who Condone | Human Rights Watch. Hrw.org (2009-07-16). Retrieved on 2011-10-01.)Again, because the majority of rapes are not reported due to victims shame and fear of social repercussions, these statistics should be taken as the bare minimum.The rape of men is also common. A 2010 study found that 22% of men (as compared to 30% of women) in Eastern Congo reported conflict-related sexual violence. Men who admit to being raped risk ostracism by their community and criminal prosecution, because they may be seen as homosexual, which is a crime in 38 African countries.() Medical ramifications The medical repercussions of the sexual assault in the DRC vary from severed and broken limbs, burned flesh, fistulas, STIs, pregnancy, and incontinence to death.(DRC Rape Survivors Break Their Silence: Call for an End to Sexual Violence in the DRC | V-Day: A Global Movement to End Violence Against Women and Girls Worldwide. V-Day (2008-09-22). Retrieved on 2011-10-01.)  Adequate medical care for these injuries is very hard to come by, and many survivors remain ill or disfigured for the rest of their lives.(Countries | Amnesty International USA. Amnestyusa.org. Retrieved on 2011-10-01.)These are all more severe the younger the victim is.  Young girls who are not fully developed are more likely to suffer from obstructed birth, which can lead to fistulas or even death.  On a young girl, a pelvis hasnt yet grown large enough to accommodate the babys head, a common occurrence with young teenagersgirls end up in obstructed birth, with the baby stuck inside their birth passagesthey cant walk or stand, a consequence of nerve damage that is a frequent by-product of fistulae.(Kristof, Nicholas D., and Sheryl WuDunn. Half the Sky: Turning Oppression into Opportunity for Women Worldwide, p. 94. New York: Alfred A. Knopf, 2009. Print.)Sexual assault has also contributed to the HIV rate. Before hostilities erupted in 1997, 5 per cent of the population was HIV positive. In 2002, that number had climbed to 20 per cent in the eastern parts of the country where conflict was most intense. ( UNFPA, A Passage to Hope: Women and International Migration, UNFPA, Publication date 2006, Access date November 3, 2009, http://www.unfpa.org/swp/2006/english.introduction.html) ch. 4, section 3, para 3. As cited in www.womanstats.org) The rapists often infect women with HIV and other sexually transmitted diseases. The Provincial Synergy for South Kivu estimates that 22 per cent of rape victims in the province are HIV-positive. (United Nations Human Rights Council, Report of the Special Rapporteur on violence against women, its causes and consequences, Yakin Erturk: Mission to the Democratic Republic of the Congo, 2008) 14. As cited in www.womanstats.org. ) Psychological and social ramifications There are also many psychological and social consequences to being the victim of sexual violence.  Victims often suffer from Stress Disorder (PTSD), depression, and suicide.  This can be particularly severe in cases in which men have been forced at gunpoint to sexually assault their daughters, sisters, or mothers.(Legacy of War: An Epidemic of Sexual Violence in DRC. UNFPA (2008-11-26). Retrieved on 2011-10-01.)   The most common social consequence for victims of sexual violence is isolation from their families and communities.( Raped women are seen as impure, frequently leading to their being abandoned by their husbands or having trouble marrying.() The most extreme versions of this stigmatization can lead to killings in which the victim of sexual violence is murdered by her family or community due to the belief that she has brought them shame and dishonor.(Young women and girls who are cast outside of their homes, or leave due to shame will most likely become even more vulnerable to further abuse.( Perpetrators According to Rights Watch, while many of the perpetrators of sexual violence are Militia groups, some of whom have been known to kidnap women and girls and use them as sex slaves,( the Congolese army, Forces Armes de la Rpublique Dmocratique du Congo (FARDC), is the single largest group of perpetrators.(Soldiers Who Rape, Commanders Who Condone | Human Rights Watch. Hrw.org (2009-07-16). Retrieved on 2011-10-01.)  In 2007, the Nations Organization Stabilization Mission in the Democratic Republic of the Congo (MONUSCO) reported that 54% of all recorded sexual violence cases in the first 6 months of that year were committed by FARDC soldiers.  Some commanders have been purported to overlook sexual violence perpetrated by those under their command.(Soldiers Who Rape, Commanders Who Condone | Human Rights Watch. Hrw.org (2009-07-16). Retrieved on 2011-10-01.)    In June 2010, UK aid group Oxfam reported a dramatic increase in the number of rapes occurring in the Republic of the Congo.  Contrary to MONUSCOs 2007 report, The study found that 38% of rapes were committed by civilians in 2008.  Rapes by civilians are increasing, demonstrating that sexual violence is becoming even more widespread throughout the country.  This is a particularly dramatic rise compared to the number of civilian-perpetrated rapes in 2004, which was less than 1%.(Ross, Will. (2010-04-15) DR Congo gang rape crisis spreading, new study suggests. BBC News. Retrieved on 2011-10-01.)(Congo report shows rape is widespread. Guardian. Retrieved on 2011-10-01.) Researchers from Harvard discovered that rapes committed by civilians had increased seventeenfold.(Rapes surge in DR Congo. Al Jazeera (2010-04-15). Retrieved on 2011-10-01.)  Consistent with these studies is a statement from Dr. Margaret Agama, the DRCs Nations Population Fund (UNFPA) representative:Initially, rape was used as a tool of war by all the belligerent forces involved in the countrys recent conflicts, but now sexual violence is unfortunately not only perpetrated by armed factions but also by ordinary people occupying positions of authority, neighbours, friends and family members.  Furthermore, those raped are often intimidated into silence. Thousands of women have been raped, and the people who have done these things want to get off free, says Masika, the co-ordinator of Synergie des Femmes Pour les Victimes de Violences Sexuelles. They threaten people who try to speak out against them, and they seek revenge on those who do. Then they attack more women.(Olivia Ward, Congo: Tortured Women Struggle for Justice, Toronto Star, April 17, 2008) Victim testimonies Rapes have often been performed through the use of foreign objects such as sticks, knives, and even rifles. There have also been cases in which pistols are inserted into a victims vagina, and fired.  These crimes have been inflicted on girls as young as 3 years old.(Kristof, Nicholas D., and Sheryl WuDunn. Half the Sky: Turning Oppression into Opportunity for Women Worldwide, p. 84. New York: Alfred A. Knopf, 2009. Print.)In a 2008 V-Day and UNICEF global campaign, Stop Raping Our Greatest Resource: Power to Women and Girls in DRC, 12 women and 2 girls recounted their sexual abuse before an audience of government and UN officials as well as other international delegates and civil society members.  One of the women, Lumo Furaha, testified:Over 50 armed men took me and another woman to the bush where they raped us over and over again. After, they pulled us like goats to the main road where they left us abandoned.(Another woman, 50 year old Zamuda, described her attack:The men did it with objects, it wasnt from any physical desire. The only answer I have is that they wanted to destroy me; destroy my body and kill my spirit.(Jullienne Chakupewa, a rape counselor in Goma, a city on the DRCs eastern border with Rwanda had a similar sentiment when being interviewed by reporter Kristof:All militias here rape women, to show their strength and to show your weakness.(Kristof, Nicholas D., and Sheryl WuDunn. Half the Sky: Turning Oppression into Opportunity for Women Worldwide, p.84. New York: Alfred A. Knopf, 2009. Print.)Another speaker at the 2008 V-Day and UNICEF event described her assault to the audience:They kicked me roughly to the ground, and they ripped off all my clothes, and between the two of them, they held my feet. One took my left foot, one took my right, and the same with my arms, and between the two of them they proceeded to rape me. Then all five of them raped me.()Claudine Mwabachizi, another survivor at the event described her experience of being kidnapped by bandits, tied to a tree in the forest and gang-raped.  Later, she was forced to watch as her rapist disemboweled a pregnant woman in front of her.( Connection to the Rwandan Genocide After the 1994 Genocide, many gnocidaires fled across Rwandas western border into the DRC in hopes of escaping censure.  Hutu extremist militias were reformed across the border, particularly in Kivu, the DRCs easternmost city, bringing more crime and violence to the DRC.  The self-titled liberation force, Forces Dmocratiques pour la Libration du Rwanda (FDLR), is one example of a Rwandan rebel group compiled of former gnocidaires that has been especially destructive in Kivu.  In 2009, the FDLR amassed a particularly brutal attack on Northern and Southern Kivu, killing, displacing, and raping civilians, and even burning entire villages down to the ground.()   An October 2007 York Times article reported on the increasing numbers of rapes occurring in the Eastern Congo near Rwanda:Eastern Congo is going through another one of its convulsions of violence, and this time it seems that women are being systematically attacked on a scale never before seen here. According to the United Nations, 27,000 sexual assaults were reported in 2006 in South Kivu Province alone, and that may be just a fraction of the total number across the country.()The article also reported on the conclusions of Wilhelmine Ntakebuka, who coordinates a sexual violence program in Bukavu:Instead, she said, the epidemic of rapes seems to have started in the mid-1990s. That coincides with the waves of Hutu militiamen who escaped into Congos forests after exterminating 800,000 Tutsis and moderate Hutus during Rwandas genocide 13 years ago. Mr. Holmes said that while government troops might have raped thousands of women, the most vicious attacks had been carried out by Hutu militias.(A York Times article written a year later reported that U.N officials have stated that the most horrific attacks were committed by Rwandan gnocidaires, whose attacks have left thousands of women with their insides destroyed.( Violence by Angola Congolese women are being systematically raped in Angola as a means of expelling the Congolese living there.() With a booming mining trade, Congolese continue migrating into Angola in search of a living. Among some 26,000 people expelled since April 2011, more than 21,000 cases of serious rights violations, including rape, beating, torture and looting, have been documented by an Italian aid agency that has a UN grant to monitor the border.( Rights Watch says the goal of the abuse is to instill fear.( Preventative efforts Increasing awareness regarding the problem of sexual violence in the DRC has led to both national and international efforts to prevent the continuation of the atrocities taking place.  In 2006, the Congolese government made some headway by passing a law criminalizing insertion of an object into a womans vagina, sexual mutilation, and sexual slavery as well as defining any sexual relation with a minor as statutory rape.(The Congolese governments department, The Ministry of Gender, Family Affairs and Children, is dedicated to dealing with sexual violence within the nation.(Soldiers Who Rape, Commanders Who Condone | Human Rights Watch. Hrw.org (2009-07-16). Retrieved on 2011-10-01.)In September 2009, following her visit to the DRC, U.S Secretary of State Clinton oversaw the adoption of the U.N Security Council Resolution 1888, which details specific efforts that must be taken to protect women from sexual violence in war-stricken regions, and measures taken to bring perpetrators to justice.(Congo Human Rights | Amnesty International USA. Amnestyusa.org. Retrieved on 2011-10-01.)  Clinton has also urged the Congolese government to personally investigate members of FARDC who have committed crimes of sexual violence, and FARDC generals have declared that they will set up new military tribunals to prosecute soldiers accused of sexual violence.(()  Additionally, she has supported a $17 million plan to combat the sexual violence in the DRC.(In addition, Enslers organization, V-Day, has not only been crucial in the growing awareness regarding sexual violence in the DRC, but has also entered into a project with UNICEF and the Foundation to build The City of Joy, a special facility in Bukavu for survivors of sexual violence in the DRC.  The center, which can host up to 180 women a year, has resources such as education courses, self-defense classes, and group therapy, as well as academic classes and courses in the arts.(City of Joy | V-Day Congo. Drc.vday.org. Retrieved on 2011-10-01.) The City of Joy facility opened in February, 2011.(Fighting Congos Ills With Education and an Army of Women  by Jeffrey Gettleman, New York Times, February 7, 2011 )See also*Greatest Silence: Rape in the Congo  documentary film*Genocide*(play)  by Nottage, winner of 2009 Prize for Drama.*violence in South AfricaReferencesExternal links*The Advocacy Project 2009 Peace Fellow Elisa Garcia in partnership with BVES*Heal Africa*http://www.hrw.org/en/publications/reports?filter0728&filter196seksual di Republik Demokratik Kongo
23600566
Stern_Hu
Stern Hu (; born 1963, in Tianjin) is an Australian businessman of Chinese origin. He was formerly an executive of Rio Tinto mining group in Shanghai, China prior to his trial.( He graduated from University before obtaining Australian citizenship in 1994.(Matt OSullivan (11 July 2009) Stern Hu thrown to the wolves , Sydney Morning Herald) Arrest in China Hu was detained on 5 July 2009 with three other Chinese colleagues by the Chinese government.(Foreign Minister Media Release-Mr Stern Hu, Department of Foreign Affairs, 9 July 2009)  After pleading guilty, on 29 March 2010 he was sentenced to 10 years jail by a Chinese court for stealing commercial secrets and receiving bribes.(John Garnaut & Sanghee Liu (29 March 2010) Stern sentenced to 10 years by Chinese court , Age, Retrieved 29 March 2010)The issue has made a heavy impact in both China and Australia, making front-page appearances in most major media across the two nations.(Chinese Sina News) Information found stored on Hus personal laptop, seized by investigators, allegedly contains confidential business information of several dozen major business partners of Rio Tinto, including storage levels and sales plans, deemed much too specific and precise to have been acquired through legal means,( but rather through bribery,(Zhang Qi & Tong Hao (15 July 2009) Bribery is widespread in Rio case , Daily) where access to such information is limited even to employees within these companies.  Hu is thus accused of  having obtained such information through bribery and other illegal means, for massive corporate and personal benefits.(Chinese Sina News 14 July 2009)The Australian government called in the Chinese Ambassador to Australia to discuss the situation, with Prime Minister Rudd, a former diplomat to China, under pressure to intervene on the issue on a higher profile.(Rachel Pannett & Alex Wilson (14 July 2009) Australia Presses China Diplomat on Worker Held , Street Journal) Rudd refused to intervene on a personal level, and criticised the media and the opposition party for adding political bias to the issue. Nevertheless, Australian authorities were granted access to the arrested businessman. After the visit, Foreign Minister Stephen Smith declared that Hu is in good health. His arrest came a month after Rio Tinto rejected Chinese aluminium firm Chinalcos bid to double its stake in the miner to 18 per cent. However, Chinalco has denied any linkages between the two events.(AAP (11 July 2009) Stern Hu in good health , The Sydney Morning Herald)TrialFollowing the trial, Stern Hu was sentenced to 10 years jail.(AAP, 29 March 2010, Hu given tough sentence, says Smith, Yahoo!7 News) Hu and other convicted executives have also had their employment terminated by Rio Tinto Ltd.(AAP, 29 March 2010, Rio Tinto fires Hu, other jailed execs, Yahoo!7 News) It is reported that the motive behind the terminations is in regards to a breach of conduct, with Rio Tinto accepting the evidence provided showing instances of bribery. Rio Tinto also states that the trial will not affect business ties, according to its chief executive.(AAP, 29 March 2010, China bond wont be broken: Rio Tinto Yahoo!7 News)Official PRC government reactionsForeign affair spokesperson Qin GangOn 15 July 2009 Chinese official foreign affair spokesperson Qin Gang, when  Qin Gang was referring to Australias Prime Minister Kevin Rudds reaction towards the alleged Spy case, in which Kevin Rudd warned the Chinese government of possible economic consequences:Ive noticed that in Australia recently some people have been making noise about this case....This is an interference in Chinas judicial sovereignty.It cannot change the objective facts nor can it have influence on the relevant Chinese authorities which are dealing with the case according to our lawWere firmly opposed to anyone deliberately stirring up this matter....This is not in accordance with the interests of the Australian side.()NAPSS (Jiangsu Province) official  Jiang RuqinJiang Ruqin()(chief of the Secret Protection Bureau of Huaian city, Jiangsu Province) ran an essay on China Secrecy On-Line, a Chinese-language Web site affiliated with the National Administration for Protection of State Secrets, or NAPSS,over the weekend (8 August 2008) that said Rio employees had engaged in deceit over six years that had led to Chinese steel mills overpaying for iron ore by CNY700 billion, or US$102 billion.() But other NAPSS official stated: NAPSS didnt authorize anyone to release comments (on the Rio case)...We cant say his essay represents views of the administration...It is his own essay...()Jiang Ruqin wrote:The large amount of intelligence and data from our countrys steel sector found on Rio Tintos computers and the massive damage to our national economic security and interests are plainly obvious...()()Rio Tintos Media ReleaseShanghai employees - Update 211 August 2009Sam Walsh chief executive iron ore acknowledged the second visit to detained Rio Tinto employee, Stern Hu, by Australian Consular officials.  Mr Walsh said, We are pleased to hear that Stern appeared well and that he raised no welfare or medical concerns. Mr Walsh said the company remained surprised and concerned over the detention of its four employees, and said the company had still not been informed of any charges against them. He said, We are still not aware of any evidence that would support their detention. Rio Tinto is committed to high standards in business integrity and takes its ethical responsibilities very seriously.We continue to be concerned for the health and welfare of our three other employees detained at the same time as Stern Hu, he said.  Mr Walsh thanked the Australian Government for the attention it is giving to this case and to Stern Hus welfare.Australian media reactionsAustralian Broadcasting CorporationOn 14 July 2009 Sales of the ABC, during the popular TV program Lateline  interviewed two Australias leading international-relations expert- Professor Hugh White, of  the National University, and Dr.Paul Monk, of Austhink Consulting, in which Hugh White said:Paul Monk:Its not unusual for the simple reason that the Chinese Government is one of the most secretive in the world. There is no free press over there. Anybody who tries to get this kind of information can be charged with stealing state secrets, just as Stern Hu has been. This is the kind of thing Im pointing to. Its - this is not a Chinese way of governing, let me emphasise. This is an arbitrary party-rule problem that we are talking about.Its odd, let me say in the context of the bilateral relationship, that the Chinese Government is not choosing to talk candidly with the Australian Government about this. If it has a problem with what Mr Hu did, and values the relationship, I would have expected that theyd go to our officials and say, Look, we are concerned about this, this could be a problem. That they are not doing that reeks of bad faith.()The AustralianOn 11 July 2009 Jennifer Hewett, National affairs correspondent of Australian reported:This is an arrow shot into the heart of Australias most vital trading relationship. It rips open the usual diplomatic cover of a polite and mutually beneficial political and economic relationship between the two countries.( )See also*Tinto espionage case*FengReferencesExternal links*China iron and steel Association* Experts discuss Chinas rise, an Australian ABC Lateline TV program (video)Huzh:
23623439
Aligarh_Muslim_University
Image:Sir Syed1.jpg|thumb|upright|thumb|Syed Ahmad Khanthumb|Victoria gate, a prominent building at the universitythumb|Maulana Azad Library (viewed from Kennedy Lawns)thumb|Kennedy House, museum (left); auditorium (right)thumb|Bab-e-syed, the gateway to AMUthumb|University CanteenAligarh Muslim University (AMU) (   ,   ),is a residential academic university, established in 1875 by Syed Ahmed Khan as Mohammedan Angelo-Oriental College and later granted the status of University by an Act of the Parliament in 1920. Spread over 468 hectares in the city of Aligarh, India,(http://www.amu.ac.in/aboutamu.htm)  it is one of the first institutions established during the British Raj. It has played a pioneering role in the independence of India. The university is one of the two in India to have earned the epithet of the East in its past.()()Aligarh Muslim University offers more than 300 courses in the traditional and modern branches of education. Sir Syed Ahmed Khan, a social reformer, felt the need for education and started a school in 1875 which later became the Mohammedan Anglo Oriental College and finally Aligarh Muslim University in 1920. It draws students from all corners of the world, especially Africa, West Asia and South East Asia. In some courses, places are reserved for students from SAARC and Commonwealth countries. The university is open to all irrespective of caste, creed, religion or gender. It ranks 8th among the top 20 research universities in India. Alumna of the university are popularly known as Aligarians. This is to be distinguished from the more generic Aligarhiya which is to be used exclusively to refer to those who are inhabitants of Aligarh, but have not, indeed, studied at AMU.().About Aligarh Muslim UniversityThe establishment of Mohammedan Anglo Oriental (MAO) College in 1875 marks one of the most important events in the educational and social history of modern India. Its establishment is considered as the first significant response of the Indian Muslims to the challenges of post 1857 era. It was an important catalyst in a process of social change among Muslims. An epoch in the social progress of India - with these words on his lips Lord Lytton laid the foundation stone of the Mohammadan Anglo Oriental College on January 8, 1877. Nearly eight years later, when the noted Orientalist Sir Hamilton Gibb looked back at the history of Muslim Transition from the medieval to the modern way of life, he characterized this College as the first modernist institution in Islam.The M.A.O. College was originally affiliated with Calcutta University, and was transferred to the Allahabad University in 1885.It was also around this time that a movement began to have it develop into a university to stand on its own. In 1920, the Act of Indian Legislative Council elevated the Mohammedan Anglo Oriental College to the status of a Central University and it became the principal Muslim Institution in India. Section 2(1) of the AMU Act says the university means the the educational institution of their choice established by the Muslims of India.AMU occupies an exalted position among Indian Universities and its contribution to nation building is in no way inferior to the best among the lot. AMU is perhaps the only University in the country, which has high schools in its domain. It has as many as five high schools including one for the visually handicapped, and two senior secondary schools for boys and girls. With more than 30000, students, about 1400 teachers and some 6000 non-teaching staff on its rolls, it has 12 faculties comprising a wide spectrum of academic disciplines (95 departments, 5 institution and 13 centres) and 18 halls of residence with 73 hostels. The University offers 325 courses.The University has the Z.H. College of Engineering and Technology, Jawaharlal Nehru Medical College, Dr.Ziauddin Dental College, Institute of Ophthalmology and Food Craft Institute, Interdisciplinary Biotechnology Unit, Centre of Advance Study in History, Centre of West Asian Studies, Centre of Wildlife, Academic Staff College, Womens College, Ajmal Khan Tibbiya College, University Polytechnic for boys and girls, separately and Computer Centre. The University has a campus spread over 467.6 hectares of land.It attracts students from all over the world, especially Africa, West Asia and South East Asia. The language taught here includes English, Urdu, Hindi, Arabic, Persian, Sanskrit, Telugu, Tamil, Bengali, Malayalam, Marathi, Punjabi, Kashmiri, French, Turkish, German and Russian. The medium of instruction is primarily EnglishHistoryThe university grew out of the work of Syed Ahmad Khan who in the aftermath of the War of Independence of 1857 felt that it was important for Muslims to gain education and become involved in the public life and Government Services in India. Raja Jai Kishan helped Sir Syed in establishing the university.The British decision to replace the use of Persian in 1842 for government employment and as the language of Courts of Law caused deep anxiety among Muslims of the sub-continent. Sir Syed saw a need for Muslims to acquire proficiency in the English language and Western Sciences if the community were to maintain its social and political clout, particularly in Northern India. He began to prepare for the formation of a Muslim University by starting schools. In 1864, the Scientific Society of Aligarh was set up to translate Western works into native languages as a prelude to prepare the community to accept Western education. Sir Sultan Mahommed Shah, The Khan III has contributed greatly to Aligarh Muslim University with financial support.In 1875, Sir Syed founded the Anglo Oriental College in Aligarh and patterned the college after Oxford and Cambridge universities that he had visited on a trip to England. His objective was to build a college in tune with the British education system but without compromising its Islamic values. Sir Syeds son, Mahmood, had studied at Cambridge and contributed a proposal for an independent university to the Muhammadan Anglo-Oriental College Fund Committee upon his return from England in 1872. This proposal was adopted and subsequently modified. Mahmood continued to work alongside his father in founding the college.It was one of the first purely residential educational institution set up either by the government or the public in India. Over the years it gave rise to a new educated class of Muslims who were active in the political system of the British Raj. When Viceroy to India, Lord Curzon visited the college in 1901, he praised the work which was carried on by the College and called it of sovereign importance.(Curzon in India. Being a Selection from his Speeches as Viceroy amp ... By Sir Thomas Raleigh, pg474)The college was originally affiliated with the of Calcutta, and was transferred to the University in 1885. Near the turn of the century it began publishing its own magazine, and established a law school.It was also around this time that a movement began to have it develop into a university. To achieve this goal, expansions were made and more programs added to the curriculum. A school for girls was established in 1907. By 1920 the college was transformed into Muslim University.The first chancellor of the university was a female, Sultan Shah Jahan Begum. In 1927, a school for the blind was established, and the following year, a medical school was attached to the university. By the end of the 1930s, the university had developed an Engineering faculty. Zafarul Hasan, joined the Aligarh Muslim University in early 1900s as Head of Philosophy Department, Dean Faculty of Arts. He was a pro-Vice Chancellor prior to his retirement.Important Landmarks*24 May 1875 : Inauguration of the School (Madarsatul Uloom) at Sami Manzil, Jail Road, Aligarh presided by Maulvi Mohd. Karim, President of the Managing Committee. Maulvi Samiullahs son Mr. Hamidullah Khan admitted as the first student.*1 June 1875 : Boarding House started with seven students on the roll with a budget of Rs. 989/- per month. Managing Committee consisted of Maulvi Samiullah, Chiragh Ali, Sir Syed Ahmad Khan, Syed Mahmud, Raja Jaikishan Das, Nawab Ziauddin Khan and Maulvi Ahsan Nanotavi etc.*28 June 1875 : Mr. H.G.I. Siddons took over as Head Master of the School on a salary of Rs. 400/- per month. Mr. Baijnath Prasad was appointed as Second Master along with Maulvi Abul Hasan, Maulana Mohd. Akbar, Syed Jafer Ali, Maulvi Najaf Ali etc.*12 November 1875 : Sir William Muir, Lt. Governor of U.P. visited the institution. He was presented with an address of welcome on behalf of the School in which the scheme of the College was described in detail.*6 December 1875 : H.H. Mahindra Singh, the Maharaja of Patiala, accompanied by his Chief Minister Khalifa Muhammed Hasan, paid a visit to the School and announced a grant of Rs. 1,800/- per annum. He was appointed the first Visitor of the institution.*8 November 1877 : Syed Ahmed Khulusi Effendi, the Ambassador of Turkey visited the College.*8 January 1877 : Lord Lytton, the Viceroy and Governor General of India laid the foundation stone of the M.A.O. College. Raja Shambhu Narayan Singh, Raja Jai Kishan Das, Rao Kishan Kumar and others, were also present.*1 January 1878 : Intermediate classes started and the college affiliated to the Calcutta University for F.A. Examination.*12 January 1878 : Sir Richard Temple, Governor of Bombay paid a visit to the college.*10 December 1880 : Sir John Strachey, the Lt. Governor of U.P. paid a visit on the eve of his retirement from ICS.1 January 1881 : Four students appeared in the B.A. Examination. Mr. Ishwari Prasad was the first student to pass the examination.*5 February 1883 : Sir Alfred Lyall, Lt. Governor of U.P. visited the College and declared open the newly constructed classrooms.*26 August 1884 : Students Union (Siddons Union Club) was inaugurated under the presidentship of Theodore Beck. Khwaja Sajjad Husain was declared Vice President and Syed Mohammed Ali Secretary of the Union.*1884 : Foundation Stone of the Victoria Gate was laid.*22 December 1886 : All India Mohammedan Educational Conference was inaugurated.*3 January 1887 : A deputation of the College Fund Committee called upon the Nizam of Hyderabad, Mr. Mehboob Ali Khan, to seek the permission to dedicate the College Museum to him.*16 November 1887 : The College was affiliated to Allahabad University.*1 January 1888 : Sir John Edge, the first Vice Chancellor of the Allahabad University visited the College on the occasion of the anniversary of the Siddons Union Club.*24 July 1888 : Sir Asman Jah Bahadur, Prime Minister of Hyderabad visited the College.*6 February 1889 : Sir Syed along with his friends staged a drama in Aligarh Exhibition to raise funds for the College.*21 December 1889 : Trustee Bill passed and Board of Trustees replaced the College Fund Committee. Sir Syed was elected life Honorary Secretary and Syed Mahmud life Joint Secretary.*November 1890 : Duty Society was inaugurated at the initiative of Sahibzada Aftab Ahmad Khan.*1891 : Aligarh Magazine started its publication under the editorship of Maulana Shibli Nomani.*25June 1891 : The brotherhood or The Ikhwanussafa was set up. Its membership was open to the present and past AMU students and teachers. It was later on converted into Old Boys Association.*29 December 1891 : The Chief Justice of Allahabad Mr. Douglas Straight visited to inaugurate the Law Classes.*12 November 1894: The Lt. Governor, Sir Charles Crosthwait, performed the opening ceremony of the Strachey Hall.*7 August 1895 : Sir Allen Cadell, Governor of U.P. visited the College and presided over the Annual Prize distribution function. (Sir) Ziauddin received the Strachey Gold Medal for securing Honours in Mathematics.*27 March 1898 : Sir Syed breathed his last at 10 P.M. His funeral prayer was performed in the Cricket ground on 28 March.*31 March 1898 : Efforts started to make the College a Muslim University by Sahabzada Aftab Ahmad Khan.*31 January 1899 : Mohsinul Mulk appointed Secretary of M.A.O. College and Syed Mahmud was granted Life Presidentship.*2 July 1901 : H. H. Siyaji Rao Gaikwad of Baroda visited the College.*10 August 1903 : A deputation headed by Mir Wilayat Husain was sent to Iran, on whose persuasion 12 students from the Royal family came to study at Aligarh.*7 March 1906 : Prince of Wales visited the College and Science Section was established. Sir Adamji Peer Bhoi of Bombay donated Rs. One Lakh ten thousand. H.H. Agha Khan and Raja Saheb of Mahmoodabad gave Rs. 36 thousand cash and a grant of Rs. 64,611 per annum to the College.*1 October 1906 : A delegation headed by Agha Khan called upon Lord Minto, the Viceroy and Governor General of India in Shimla to seek help in establishing a Muslim University.*16 January 1907 : His Majesty Habeebullah Khan, Shah of Afghanistan visited the College and announced a grant of Rs. 20,000.*10 February 1907 : Sheikh Mohammed Abdullah established Girls School, which in 1921 became a High School and was recognized as Undergraduate College in 1937.*1907 : Students  strike against European Staff.*1 December 1907 : Nawab Viqarul Mulk was appointed Secretary of the College.*20 July 1908 : Government handed over General Perons residence, Sahib Bagh, built in 1803 to the College, which after some alteration became Sulaiman Hall.*13 November 1909 : Mir Imam Baksh of Talpur, ruler of Khairpur Sindh visited the College and donated a property of Rs 500 per month. So impressed was he by the high standard of the College that he decided to admit his son to this college.*15 December 1909 : Mr J. C. Gupta, Member of the Indian Council visited and was highly impressed by the secular character of the College.*1 January 1910 : Sir Pratap Singh Inder Mahendra Bahadur, Maharaja of Jammu and Kashmir donated Rs 2,000 to the college during his visit.*18 March 1910 : Mr. Chirol, Foreign Editor of the London Times visited the College.*10 January 1911 : A Committee constituted to establish Muslim University with Sir Agha Khan as the President and Nawab Viqarul Mulk as Hony. Secretary. Nawab Muzammilullah Khan, Haji Mohd. Musa Khan, Shaikh Mohd. Abdullah and Mr. Shaukat Ali were appointed Joint Secretaries.*16 February 1911 : University Constitution Committee was formed and held its first meeting at Lucknow.*9 June 1912 : Sir Rameshwar Singh, Maharaja of Darbhanga, who was the President of B.H.U. Committee, visited the College.*21 July 1912 : The Trustees accepted Nawab Viqarul Mulks resignation and unanimously elected Nawab Ishaq Khan as Secretary.*27 February 1914 : Begum Sultan Jahan of Bhopal laid the foundation stone of the Educational Conference Building which she declared open on *19.2.1916.*25 July 1914 : The main gate of the College was named as Victoria Gate.*Feb 1915 : The Mosque was formally declared open.*6 January 1917 : Mrs. Sarojni Naidu delivered a lecture on the glories of Islam and the Hindu-Muslim amity at Strachey Hall.*29 January 1918 : The Nizam of Hyderabad Mir Usman Ali Khan, visited the College and donated Rs one lakh for Arabic teaching and Rs five thousand for renovating rooms of the hostel named later as Osmania hostel.*25 October 1920 : Mahatma Gandhi visited the College and was made the first Honorary Life Member of the Students Union.*29 October 1920 : Inauguration of Jamia Millia Islamia at University Mosque. Shaikh-ul-Hind Maulana Mahmoodul Hasan presided over the function.*16 November 1926 : His Highness Nawab Hamidullah Khan of Bhopal laid the foundation stone of Science College. Government of India donated Rs. 15 Lakh and Nizam of Hyderabad also donated Rs. 10 Lakh to the University.*27 October 1927 : The Chancellor appointed an Enquiry Commission on the University affairs headed by Sir Ibrahim Rehmatullah on the recommendation of PVC. Sir Ziauddin resigned on 27 April 1928.*27 November 1927 : William Marris, Governor of U.P. inaugurated Ahmadi School for the Blind.*24 November 1928 : Allama Iqbal conferred with the life membership of the AMU Students Union.*20 September 1931 : Dr. C.V.Raman, noted scientist conferred with the D.Sc. (Honoris causa)*14 November 1933 : At its 12th Annual Convocation the University awarded its first Doctorate to Dr. Omar Farooq in Chemistry.*1934 : Frontier Leader Khan Abdul Gaffar Khan, an alumnus, visited his alma mater.*1934 : Jawahar Lal Nehru visited Aligarh Muslim University.*30 April 1934 : Sir Ross Masood resigned from the post of Vice Chancellor.*1935 : The Nizam of Hyderabad, Mir Usman Ali Khan elected Chancellor of the University.*1936 : The university acquired Aligarh Fort.*5 February 1938 : Mr. Mohammad Ali Jinnah, President, All India Muslim League visited AMU.*23 January 1938 : Sir Agha Khan laid the foundation stone of Technical Laboratories.*8 March 1941 : Nawab Kamal Yar Jung inaugurated Agha Khan Workshop. B.Sc.(Engineering) classes started.*15 December 1948 : C. Rajgopalacharya, Governor General of India visited the University.*11 October 1951 : The Parliament passed the AMU Amendment Act.*8 December 1951 : The President of India, Dr Rajendra Prasad delivered the Convocation Address.*3 January 1952 : The Health Minister, Raj Kumari Amrit Kaur, laid the foundation stone of the Institute of Ophthalmology.*6 November 1955 : Pandit Jawaharlal Nehru laid the foundation stone of Maulana Azad Library, which was inaugurated by him on 6 December 1960.*3 December 1955 : His Majesty Shah Saud Bin Abdul Aziz of Saudi Arabia visited the University. The University conferred upon him the degree of Doctorate of law (Honoris Causa).*25 February 1956 : In a special Convocation, the University conferred the degree of Doctor of Law (Honoris Causa) upon Shah of Iran, Raza Shah Pehalvi.*21 May 1956 : A delegation led by Dr. Zakir Husain visited Saudi Arabia and Shah Saud donated Rs. one million for the establishment of Medical College.*17 February 1958 : His Majesty Zahir Shah of Afghanistan was conferred with LL.D. (Honoris Causa).*1 April 1960 : Jamal Abdul Nasser, President of United Arab Republic visited the institution.*8 November 1960 : Mr. C.D. Deshmukh, Chairman, University Grants Commission laid the foundation stone of General Education Centre (Kennedy House) with a donation of Rs. 22 Lakhs by Ford Foundation, U.S.A.TodayAligarh Muslim University is a residential academic institution offering 280 courses in traditional and modern branches of education .It has almost thirty thousand students, and over two thousand faculty members with over eighty departments of study. It draws students from a number of countries, especially countries in Africa, West Asia and South East Asia. In some courses, seats are reserved for students from SAARC and Commonwealth countries.(about AMU)The 12 faculties are:* Faculty of Agricultural Sciences* Faculty of Arts* Faculty of Commerce* Faculty of Engineering and Technology* Faculty of Law* Faculty of Life Sciences* Faculty of Management Studies and Research* Faculty of Medicine* Faculty of Science* Faculty of Social Sciences* Faculty of Theology* Faculty of Unani Medicine* Faculty of SportsThe university maintains interdepartmental research centres such as:* Interdisciplinary Unit of Biotechnology* Centre of Excellence in Material Science/Nanotechnology* Centre for Comparative Study of Indian Languages and Culture* Centre of West Asian Studies* Centre of Woman Studies* Centre of Nehru Studies Schools * Abdullah Girls High School* Abdullah Nursery School* A.B.K. Union High School (boys)* A.B.K. Union High School (girls)* City High School (boys)* City High School (Qazi Pada) (girls)* S.T.S. High School (Circle) (boys)* Senior Secondary School (boys)* Senior Secondary School (girls)* Ahmadi School for the Visually Challenged Colleges * Hussain College of Engineering and Technology* Nehru Medical College* Ajmal Khan Tibbiya College* Abdullah Womens College* UGC Academic Staff College* Sir Ziauddin Dental College* University Boys Polytechnic* University Womens PolytechnicZakir Hussain College of Engineering and TechnologyThe Zakir Hussain College of Engineering & Technology, Aligarh is one of the oldest and prestigious engineering colleges in India.The college is affiliated to Aligarh Muslim University, Uttar Pradesh. Founded on 21 November 1938.()The College offers courses at undergraduate as well as postgraduate level. The language of instruction in all these courses is English. There are eight academic departments associated:#Department of Engineering#Department of Engineering#Department of Engineering#Department of Engineering#Department of Engineering#Department of Engineering#Department of Architecture#Centre for StudiesThe college has a Bank, with 1,500,000 books and journals. All the enrolled students get books issued for the academic year. Apart from that all the departments have the facility of online subscription to desired journals.Admission to Undergraduate Programmes are done through a national level Engineering Entrance Exam conducted at Aligarh, Lucknow, Kolkata, Hyderabad, Kozhikode and Bhopal.Whereas Admission to PostGraduate programmes are done on the basis of Score Secured in Graduate Aptitude Test in Engineering (GATE) conducted by India Council For Technical Education.()Jawaharlal Nehru Medical CollegeIt has always been ranked in Top 25 Medical colleges in India.() In 2009,government of India decided to Upgrade it to the level of AIIMS like Institutions Under Pradhan Mantri Swasthya Suraksha Yojna.()Maulana Azad LibraryAzad Library is considered one of the Major Libraries of the world, with glorious past and promising future. It was established with the foundation of Madarsatul-Uloom Musalmanan at Aligarh in 1877.It stands as the largest University library in India and Second largest in Asia with more than 11.5 lakh books/documents.The foundation stone of the Library was laid by Lytton, the then Viceroy of India. That is why, the Library was originally named as Lytton Library.The present grand seven storied building surrounded by 4.5 acres of land was inaugurated by Late Jawaharlal Nehru, the then Prime Minister of India in 1960 and was named as Maulana Azad Library, after the name of Abul Kalam Azad, the great Educationist, Statesman & the first Education Minister of independent India.The library performs the functions of a National Library so far as its collection of Oriental manuscripts are concerned. It is because of these rich collections of immense research value that the Library is reckoned among the major libraries of the world. The oldest manuscript owned by the library is more than fourteen hundred years old - a fragment of the Quran transcribed by Hazrat Ali, the fourth  caliph of Islam and is written on parchment in Kufi script. Another rare collection is the unique Halnama of Beyazid Ansari.The Library has a collection of early printed books in various languages. Among the large collection of Mughal paintings is the painting of Red Blossom, by Mansoor Naqqash, the court artist of Emperor Jahangir. Some Sanskrit works translated into Persian have also been preserved in the library. Other possessions include the Ayurved in Telugu and the Bhasas in script written on palm leaves. Abul Faiz Faizi, a scholar of Akbars court translated several Sanskrit works into Persian, such as Mahapurana, Gita, Mahabharat and Lilavati, these are also available.The library provides the whole university campus wide access to online journals through a well-equipped Computer Lab. Digital Resources on many subjects are made accessible through a Digital Resource Centre.All the issue able books in the Library are bar coded for automated check in and check out.The library has started Data mining in a recently developed Information Centre, where free e-resources from the web are tapped for the benefit of university community. A list of such resources is given under the link E-Resources.()()Halls of residenceThere are 16 Halls of residence comprising 69 hostels:* Abdullah Hall (for women)* Aftab Hall* Allama Iqbal Hall* Hadi Hasan Hall* Indira Gandhi Hall (for women)* Mohsinul Mulk Hall* Mohammad Habib Hall* Nadeem Tarin Hall* Ross Masood Hall* Sir Syed Hall (North)* Sir Syed Hall (South)* Sir Shah Sulaiman Hall* Sir Ziauddin Hall* Sarojini Naidu Hall (for women)* Viqarul Mulk Hall* Sherwani Hall(RCA)* Sultan Jahan Begum Hall (for women)* Dr. Bhim Rao Ambedkar HallIn addition, there is a Students Centre (NRSC) which caters for non-resident students academic and extracurricular activities.(History of Non Resident Students Centre (19102000), Aligarh Muslim University. Ed. Ziaur Rahman, Ibn Sina Academy, Aligarh, 2000)Current venturesThe university held its 58th annual convocation on June 18, 2008. Its chief guest was the former president of India, APJ Abdul Kalam and business tycoon Azim Hashim Premji, the chairman of Wipro Technologies Limited. Both of them were conferred with an honorary degree of Doctor of Science. Former chief justice of India, Justice Ahmadi was present. 55 gold and 135 silver medals were awarded and more than 4500 degrees were conferred.Alumni meetingsAMU World Alumni SummitAMU World Alumni Summit was organised on 1819 October 2008. Alumni from 26 countries participated in the programme. Aligarians met their old friends, classmates and teachers. Hamid Ansari was part of the meet. The vice chancellor, Professor K. Abdul Aziz welcomed the alumni and proposed an AMU Alumni Endowment Fund for the activities of Alumni in the University.RankingAligarh Muslim University has been ranked 8th among top 100 research institutions in India by National Institute of Science Communication And Information Resources (NISCAIR) and it was published in Current Science,Vol. 96,No. 12,25 June 2009.Notable alumni Heads of State and Government politicians*Rab Nishtar,Pakistani Politician,former Minister for communication in Pakistan and Governor of Punjab, Pakistan.*Ashraf Fatmi, former minister of state, Government of India*Mohammad Khan, Member of Parliament, Former Cabinet Minister - Government of India*Ayub Khan,President of Pakistan (19581969).*Ilahi Chaudhry,President of Pakistan (19731978)*Abdul Ghaffar Khan, freedom fighter, also known as Gandhi*Habibullah Khan Marwat (19011978), jurist and politician, first of the Senate of Pakistan (197277), former Minister. Got his LL.B. Degree from Aligarh in 1927.*Nazimuddin, former Prime minister of Pakistan*Muhammad Ali Jauhar, leader of India Muslim League*Habib, historian and freedom fighter*Hamid Ansari, Vice President of India, academician, former diplomat, and former vice-chancellor of the Aligarh Muslim University*Kidwai, Leader of National Congress party. Member of Rajya Sabha, elected from Chattisgarh*Mohammad Sayeed, founder of the Jammu and Kashmir Peoples Democratic Party, Ex Chiefminister of Kashmir.*Mansur Ali,former Prime Minister of Bangladesh*Liaquat Ali Khan, first Prime Minister of Pakistan and Freedom fighter*Ahmad Kidwai, Freedom fighter and First communication minister of independent India, Government of India*Iqbal Shervani, former Union Minister of State, of India*Abdullah, Prime minister of Kashmir and later served as chief minister of Kashmir*Zakir Hussain, former President of India, freedom fighter and former vice-chancellor of the Aligarh Muslim UniversityOther Notable Alumni*Lais Siddiqui, researcher, critic, linguist, author, scholar of Urdu literature and linguistics* Ali (Professor), novelist, poet, short story writer, educationist, critic, diplomat, scholar and co-founder All-India Progressive Writers Movement & Association.*Mohammed Khan Shahryar, Urdu academician and poet (Umraojaan movie fame)*Kamil, Kashmiri poet*Sinha,  Hindi film director*Peer, journalist, author, and political commentator*Tahil,  Urdu/Hindi film actor*Chand, former field hockey player, team captain and Olympian*Nizami, Director - Oxford Centre for Islamic Studies*Basir Khan, photography and media activist academician, Maulana Azad Chair Professor, AJK MCRC, Jamia Millia Islamia.*Mustafa Khan, researcher, critic, linguist, author, scholar of Urdu literature and linguistics, educator, and spiritual leader of Pakistan*Gulgee, artist and Islamic calligrapher*Tanvir, Indian Urdu/Hindi playwrighter and director, poet and actor*Syed Zillur Rahman, Unani physician and founder of Sina Academy of Medieval Medicine and Sciences*Rashid, Urdu journalist; editor, Inquilab and Blitz(Wrong Link Updated)*Ibn-e-Safi, 19261980, novelist, migrated to Pakistan in 1951*Habib, historian*Hussain Usmani, Pakistani bureaucrat and an atomic physicist,played an important role in Pakistans road to nuclear technology to space technology.*Prasad, historian, first graduate of Muhammedan Anglo-Oriental College*Khwaja, Member of Parliament, 2nd Lok Sabha*Nisar Akhtar, Urdu poet and lyricist.*Akhtar, lyricist and scriptwriter of Salim-Jawed fame of Sholay*Asif, Urdu/Hindi film director of Mughal-e-Azam fame*Ahmad Abbas, Urdu/Hindi movie scriptwriter and director, journalist*Amarnath, former Indian cricketer and team captain*Sayeed Alam PhD, playwright, director and actor in Troupe*Majaz (Asrarul Haq), Urdu poet and writer of AMU Tarana*Sultanpuri, poet and lyricist Hindi/Urdu films*Mohammad Yunus, former diplomat and ambassador to Spain, Turkey, and Indonesia*Burhanuddin Dai of Dawoodi Bohra holds an Honorary Doctorate from the Aligarh University and he was once the Chancellor of the same.*Raza,  academician, freedom fighter, and former vice chancellor Delhi University*Masood, Urdu writer, Pakistani bureaucrat*Hoda, Scientist and pioneer of Technology in India along with F. Schumacher of is Beautiful fame.(http://www.guardian.co.uk/news/2001/mar/05/guardianobituaries2, Guardian obituary, 5 March 2001.)*Hasan, Professor, former vice-chancellor of Jamia Millia Islamia University - Delhi*Ahmad Yusufi, Urdu humorist*Ali, former Indian cricketer*Shah, Hindi/Urdu film actor*Mirza Aqil Hussain Barlas, Persian scholar and diplomat*Ahmad, Professor Emeritus, Persian scholar, critic, linguist, lexicographer and editor*Nazir Ahmed,experimental physicist,assistant director at the Technological Laboratory, Central Cotton Committee of India, first chairman of the Atomic Energy Commission.*Afaqui, author of landmark novel MAKAAN.*Singh Gill, physicist*Muhammad Chaudhry,Nuclear physicist,one of the main wings and instruments of Pakistans nuclear weapons research program.*Masoom Reza, Urdu/Hindi script writer (Mahabharat Teleserial fame)*Rahman, Urdu/Hindi film actor (Waqt, Sahib Bibi aur Ghulam fame)*Rao, Indian English novelist and short story writer*Ahmad Siddiqi, Urdu writer*Jaffrey, Hindi/Urdu film actor*Siddiqui, leading Pakistani scientist in Natural Product Chemistry.*Akhtar, Professor at the Jefferson Medical College*Lateef, Hindi/Urdu film director*Badayuni, Urdu poet, lyricist, and songwriter*Haqqee, Urdu writer, researcher, linguist, lexicographer*Obaid,Founder Director,TIFR National Centre for Biological Sciences, Bangalore*Ali Hasan, cricketer and administrator*Afzal Ali, Bulandshahr*Mahmood Naqvi,Earth Scientist.*Zafar Mahmood, Officer on Special Duty - Government of India, Indian Prime Ministers Committee*Zahoor Qasim, oceanographer and scientist*Ziaur Rahman, Medical Pharmacologist*Mahmood, Member, Commission of India*Mahmood, Ghazal singer and Urdu/Hindi film actor and playback singer*Zafar Iqbal, former field hockey player, Indian team captain and Olympian.*Zubeida, Urdu/Hindi film actress (first Indian talkie - Alam Ara fame)ReferencesAbdul AzizExternal links* Alumni group on linkedin* Aligarh Muslim University official website* Mera Chaman Aligarh Muslim University* Aligarh Muslim University Alumni Directory* Complete Portal on Aligarh Muslim University* Official website of the Maulana Azad Library* Website of the Department of Computer Science* Website of the Department of Museology* Website of the General Education CentreU* Official Website of the Zakir Husain College of Engineering and Technology  Muslim Universityde Aligarh    ja:muslimske universitet  
23629710
VS-35
identification_symbol_2_labelSea Control Squadron 35 (VS-35) Blue Wolves was a carrier-based States Navy squadron based out of Air Station North Island in California. The squadron flew the Lockheed Lockheed S-3B Viking and their mission was mining, undersea and surface warfare, electronic reconnaissance and analysis, over the horizon targeting, and aerial refueling. The squadron was last attached to Carrier Air Wing Fourteen (CVW-14).  VS-35 was disestablished in a ceremony at NAS North Island on March 24, 2005, and officially on March 31, 2005.  HistoryThe squadron was established on January 3, 1961 at Naval Air Station Los Alamitos, California and named the Boomerangers, composing of eleven S2F-1 Tracker aircraft.  In July of 1961, the squadron transition to the S2F-3, which would later be desiginated the S-2D.  In 1962, the squadron was relocated to NAS North Island, California and deployed for the first time as part of Carrier Anti-Submarine Air Group Fifty-Seven (CVSG-57) on board the Hornet (CVS-12) and again in 1963.In August of 1965 to March of 1966, the squadron again deployed aboard the USS Hornet in combat operations in Vietnam.  The Boomerangers maintained surface and subsurface surveillance in the Gulf of Tonkin.  Later that year, they assisted the USS Hornet in the recovery of the first Apollo capsule.  The squadrons fourth and fifth deployments in 1967 and 1968-1969 saw them return to the Gulf of Tonkin for combat operations.  After their fifth deployment, the USS Hornet was decommissioned and VS-35 was reassigned as part of CVSG-53 and in May of 1970 deployed in the Atlantic on the USS Wasp (CVS-18).  On May 17, 1972, VS-35 deployed with CVSG-53 on board the USS Ticonderoga (CVS-14) to the Pacific and participated in the mining of Haiphong Harbor in North Vietnam.  The squadron was officially disestablished on June 30, 1973.  In October 1976, preparations were made to reestablish VS-35 to fly the new turbine powered S-3A, but fiscal constraits prevented completion of this plan and the second VS-35 was disestablished on March 30, 1977.On September 10, 1986, a pre-establishment detachment was set up and the Boomerangers were officially established on March 3, 1987.  They were assigned to the newly created Carrier Air Wing Ten (CVW-10), but fiscal constraints disestablished the 18-month old CVW-10 on September 30, 1988.  After just one brief sea period on board the USS Enterprise (CVN-65), VS-35 was disestablished for the third time on June 1, 1988.  The rebirth of VS-35 began on October 3, 1990 as a pre-establishment detachment with the official establishment on April 4, 1991.  The fourth VS-35 adopted the nickname Blue Wolves, flew the S-3A, and were assigned to Carrier Air Wing Fourteen (CVW-14) on board the USS Carl Vinson (CVN-70) on October 10, 1991.  The Blue Wolves transitioned to the S-3B in December of 1992.For the first time since 1972, the Blue Wolves deployed on February 17, 1994 on board the USS Carl Vinson to the western Pacific in support of Operation Southern Watch.  In 1996, the squadron deployed again on board the USS Carl Vinson and in support of Operation Southern Watch.  In June 1998, Carrier Air Wing Fourteen was reattched to the USS Abraham Lincoln (CVN-72) and deployed in June of 1998 to the Gulf in support of Operation Southern Watch and again in 2000.  In July 2002, the squadron deployed on board the USS Abraham Lincoln in support of Operation Enduring Freedom and Southern Watch.  After an overall period in Perth, Australia for the USS Abraham Lincoln, the Blue Wolves returned to the Persian Gulf to commence combat operations in support of Operation Iraqi Freedom.  The squadron returned home on May 2, 2003, after nearly ten months away, the longest for a United States Aircraft Carrier since the Vietnam War.  Upon returning from Operation Iraqi Freedom, on May 1, 2003, the squadron flew President George W. Bush on board the USS Abraham Lincoln for his Mission Accomplished Speech.  The Blue Wolves have the distinction of being the only Navy squadron with the desiginator One.  In May 2004, VS-35 departed for their final deployment on board the USS John C. Stennis (CVN-74).  Upon returning in October 2004, the squadron began preparations for disestablishment.  Official disestablishment occurred on March 31, 2005.MissionOver land employ the LANTIRN Targeting System to localize enemies and track them until given the authority to kill them. Use laser guided maverick missiles or buddy laze in order for others to use laser guided weapons on enemies.  Pass precise coordinates to allied forces on the ground or in the air to deliver precision guided munitions to bear. Over the sea, use Automated Information System, Data Link, ESM, Radar, ISAR, NVDs, and Infrared systems to find ships.  Pass their position to surface ships who will board and detain the enemy. Overhead the ship, use refueling stores. The maintenance team will get the Vikings airborne and the aircrew will put the jets in position for expeditious rendezvous in the tanker pattern.
23649760
Silesian_Ostrava_Castle
Silesian Ostrava Castle is a castle in Ostrava, in the northeastern Republic. It was originally built in the 1280s near the confluence of the Luina and Ostravice rivers. The castle was built for military purposes due to its proximity to the Polish border.In 1534, the gothic castle was rebuilt into a renaissance chateau. It burned down in 1872 but was rebuilt.(Ostrava.cz) It was restored recently after many years of dilapidation, caused by coal mining under the castle. Today, the castle is one of the most important tourist attraction of the city. The castle held the of Ostrava festival in 2007.Referenceshradburgow lskiej Ostrawie
23662368
Benjamin_Franklin_Tefft
Benjamin Franklin Tefft (1813-1885) was an American Methodist minister, author, newspaper editor, and diplomat.  As the American Consul in Stockholm, Sweden during the US Civil War, he encouraged and facilitated emigration to the United States, particularly his native state of Maine.  This eventually resulted, for example, in the founding of the northern Maine immigrant community of New Sweden and its satellite Maine.    Tefft was born in New York and attended University in Connecticut, graduating in 1835.  In 1839-41, and again in 1858-61, he served as a Methodist pastor in Maine, and later briefly in Portland. In between Tefft became a professor of Greek and Latin at University in Indiana, and then president of College in New York, which later became University.(Appletons Cyclopedia, Benjamin Franklin Tefft)  Consul in StockholmTefft was appointed U.S. Consul in Stockholm in 1861 and Acting U.S. Minister to Sweden in 1862.(http://books.google.com/books?idgawYAAAAIAAJ&pgPA496&lpgPA496&dq%22wesleyan+university%22+and+%22Commissioner+of+%22&sourcebl&otsbIvsJxHewH&sigxPCtL7dpkwD7UgXsHyh_4UzpFw8&hlen&einAbVTLmEE8Gs8Aam7fzKDA&saX&oibook_result&ctresult&resnum2&ved0CBYQ6AEwATgU#vonepage&q%22wesleyan%20university%22%20and%20%22Commissioner%20of%20%22&ffalse) It was largely through Teffts influence and that of fellow Maine native and U.S. Consul in Gothenburg, Sweden, W. Thomas, Jr., that beginning in 1864, a small portion of the soon-to-be-large Swedish migration to North America was directed to Maine.  Teffts lobbying resulted in the first grants by a state legislature in the United States designed to attract Scandinavian immigrants.  Following the war Thomas would head a Maine immigration bureau and personally oversee the founding of the community of New Sweden.  In the eyes of Tefft, Thomas, and the Maine politicians who voted subsidies to settle them, Swedish immigrants were a potential demographic buffer against the Catholic Irish and Francophone populations of Maine at a time when English and American immigration to the state had stopped.  This Protestant and Nordic buffer never materialized, however, as the Swedish colony remained relatively small and isolated, and many of its members ultimately intermarried with Maines French and Irish populations. Tefft also served as immigration agent (while still U.S. Consul) for Lake Superior copper mining companies who also desired Scandinavian settlers.  Teffts son George V. Tefft eventually took over the Stockholm consulate as Tefft devoted increasing energy to private interests related to immigration.(  When America Called for Immigrants by Halvdan Koht)Later careerTefft had returned to Maine by 1873, where he edited the newspaper The Northern Border and continued a literary career that had begun in 1847 with the book Prison Life, and continued with Hungary and Kossuth in 1852 and Webster and his Masterpieces (a biography of Webster) in 1854.  His major postwar book was Evolution and Christianity of 1885.  Teffts son Charles Eugene (b. 1874 in Maine, a suburb of Bangor) would become a noted sculptor, some of whose bronze statues still decorate Bangors parks.( References (
23680523
Gary_Mark_Smith
websiteGary Mark Smith (born April 27, 1956) is an American street photographer.(CNN 24-hour Cable Television News Channel. Jeff Flock/ Bernard Shaw (1992-04-30 to 05-08))(Near, Mitchell J. (2002-01-03) The MAG: Cover Story  The Art of War, A Lawrence artist captures street photography in worlds hot spots. The Art MAG (9-page Illustrated magazine article). http://www2.ljworld.com/news/2002/jan/03/the_mag_cover/)(Near, Mitchell J. (2001-08-30) The Art MAG: Feature Story - Into the Eye of the Storm: Photographer Seeks Lethal Situations for the Perfect Shot. http://www2.ljworld.com/news/2001/aug/30/into_the_eye/ The Art MAG (Illustrated) feature story.) Smith is noted for his empathetic and literal style of photography captured in extremely hazardous environments.(Biles, Jan (1997-03-06) Photographer Takes Global View With Art. The MAG photography column (Lawrence Journal-World) illustrated feature story.)(James R. Hugunin (20002002) Global Wandering as Method, critical foreword to Gary Mark Smiths second street photography book Searching for Washington Square: A celebration of Life on the Global Street, vol. 1 (Lawrence, KS: East Village PhotoArts and the Traver Trust, 2000). http://www.uturn.org/Vita/allpub.htm)(James R. Hugunins Critical Essay on Gary Mark Smith http://www.streetphoto.com/Critical%20Review.htm)(ArtStew Magazine Interview http://artstewmagazine.blogspot.com/2009/05/gary-mark-smith-artstew-magazine-issue.html)Early life and educationBorn in Pennsylvania, Smith took his first serious photographs growing up on his family farm outside Kutztown.In high school he began photographing street life in Washington Square in nearby New York City.(Martin, Sharon L. (2000-July/August) Gary Mark Smith: On the Streets of the World. The Purdue Alumnus Magazine (7-page) feature story (Illustrated).)In 1984 he earned a BS in journalism from the of Kansas at Lawrence.(Popper, Joe (1989-05-28) Guerrilla Rock: Or, How a Tiny, 100-Watt KU Radio Station Caused a Million Watts of Grief. An investigative journalism expose about how Smith and a few thousand of his friends saved a groundbreaking radio station from local and national power freaks intent on spoiling a cultural legacy, KJHK  The Sound Alternative. Kansas City Star Magazine (13-page) (illustrated) cover expose.) In 1996 he earned a Master of Arts degree, the product of a full teaching fellowship provided by University at Lafayette, Indiana.(Lothamer, Jenny (1996-12-02) Photographer to Say Goodbye with Exhibit. Features Editor (illustrated) cover story.)CareerFile:FMLN War Time 1984.png|thumb|War Time, El Salvador FMLN soldier.(American Photo magazine (1991-Nov/Dec issue) American Photo International Career Photographer Competition. (Illustrated) http://www.streetphoto.com/MediaReview1.htm. The American Photo editorial staff Stephanie Dolgoff.)(Kansas Magazine (1992-Spring) Lawrence Photographer Gary Mark Smith Wins International American Photo magazine Career Photographers Competition Kansas Magazine, The Kansas Department of Commerce quarterly magazine.)Between 1982 and 2005 Smith became recognized as an innovative global street photographer and distinguished himself in the field along the way by blurring the line between journalism (documentary) and fine art by gaining access(United Press International (1982-06) Network, Freelance Photographers Taken by FML) and witness to the danger and drama of history for use as visual allure and as an intellectually stimulating supporting character in his work. His most notorious projects included:Cold WarSeveral expeditions to the War inspired guerrilla wars in Salvador and Guatemala, and Nicaragua - moonlighting as a journalist for the Daily Kansan newspaper(Jones, Laurie (1984) Jayhawk Journalist Magazine; spring issue. Gary Smith: Senior Turns Combat Photographer in El Salvador. Illustrated (5-page) feature story.) and selling combat photography he made on the side as a freelance photographer to the Press, Press International and other agencies.(Goldberg, Phil (1982-08-14) El Salvador Ambush Hits Home for Local Photographer. Lawrence Journal-World front-page news feature.) His accounting of the Streets of Cold War Hot Spots garnered Smith a Randolph Hearst Award nomination(Gary Smith (1983-03-01) UDK foreign correspondent (analysis). Suchitoto: Story of a Village Besieged. The University Daily Kansan front page jump, article with 8-photographs on double truck. Article and photographs won Smith a Hearst College Journalism Award nomination from his professors at the William Allen White School of Journalism and Mass Communications at the University of Kansas.)(Gary Smith (1984-02-17) UDK foreign dispatch: San Salvador, El Salvador -- (analysis). Salvadorans Have Choice in March Vote: People Must Choose Between Bloody Fight, Guerrilla Agreement. The University Daily Kansan front-page analysis)(Gary Smith (1984-03-01) UDK lead editorial board editorial. Defining Justice. (A scathing editorial condemning the Reagan administration CIA-sponsored mining of Nicaraguan waterways) Reprinted in the Topeka Capitol-Journal and the Washington Post.) and in December 1991 American Photo magazine named Smith an American Photo Career Photographer in that publications first ever honors competition.Molten MemoirsIn September 1997 Smith gained access to the death zone of Salem, Montserrat in the Antilles in the Caribbean,(Associated Press (1999-10-8) distributed 22-inch (illustrated with three photographs) Montserrat Volcano article. Nationwide. Worldwide.)(Blankenship, Bill (1997-11-02) Clinging to the Edge of Fury: Artist Returns From the Streets of a Volcanic Disaster. Midway Magazine (Topeka Capitol-Journal) illustrated 6-photograph, 1-page cover story with jump.) becoming one of the 200 famous volcano holdouts there who refused to leave until a near-fatal close call eruption of the Soufriere Hills Volcano on September 22, 1997 finally forced the holdouts to flee.(Gordon, Suzanne (1999-Nov. issue) Montserrat Memoirs. http://www.streetphoto.com/MediaReview3.htm Caribbean Travel and Life magazine (Illustrated).) In February 1999 Smith released his first global street photography book, a well-received journal (Molten Memoirs(Austin Chronicle (1999-May) Gary Smith, Volcano Photographer and Author to Give Journal Presentation in Austin.): Essays, Rumors Field Notes and Photographs from the Edge of Fury) about his experience.(Austin Borders News & Events Magazine. (1999-May) Edge of the Fury: Author of Molten Memoirs street photographer Gary Mark Smith to Speak, Read. Austin Borders News & Events Magazine Events Schedule. (Austin, Texas).) In November 2000 Smith was honored for his work in Montserrat as an American Photo magazine champion for the second time, as a winner of the International Readers Competition.(American Photo magazine (2000-December issue) American Photo International Readers Competition. (Illustrated) http://www.streetphoto.com/MediaReview2.htm (The American Photo editorial staff: David Schonauer))(Dunkley, Diana (2000-12-24) Gary Smith Wins Influential and Prestigious Award. http://www2.ljworld.com/news/2000/dec/24/arts_notes96/ Arts Notes: Lawrence Journal-World (Illustrated).)In July 2009 a portfolio of 45 photographs from Holdout Streets of the Montserrat Volcano Disaster was accessioned into the permanent collection of the Montserrat National Trust.(http://www.streetphoto.com/ArtistResume.htm)Tora Bora: An American Global Street Photographers Post 9-11 View of the Streets of the Afghanistan/Pakistan Belt at the Time of Tora Bora.File:NEW-Afghanistan Talabin Escape 12-2001.png|thumb|Only known photograph of a Taliban confederate escaping U.S. bombers at Tora Bora.Smiths Streets of the Post-9/11 World project including work from: Ground Zero in New York City; the Streets under the air war adjacent to the of Tora Bora;( the streets of the Afghanistan/Pakistan border refugee camps; the streets of the Administered Tribal Areas (FATA) in Pakistan at Peshawar; beyond the Khyber Pass (Mohmand and Khyber Agencies); and to the everyday post-9/11 terror war streets of Las Vegas, Nevada, France and Kansas, U.S.A., his hometown and the only city in North America (Kansas) established during a terror war (John Brown; Quantrill), resulted in his third global street photography book White With Foam: Essays, Rumors, Field Notes and Photographs from the Edge of World War III was published online and in June 2009 the journal was released as a Kindle Edition.Katrina File:Katrina Mississippi Ronald McDonaldSurgeScape.png|thumb|Storm surge damage along Highway 90 on the Mississippi Gulf Coast (early September, 2005).On September 1, 2005 Smith was sent by the Red Cross to the aftermath of Katrina and the flood of Orleans, Louisiana, becoming a member of the Red Cross(Maines, Sophia (2005-10-01) Volunteers Return From Gulf Coast. http://www2.ljworld.com/news/2005/oct/01/volunteers_return_gulf_coast/ Lawrence Journal-World (Illustrated) cover story.) first strike team, helping run undermanned rescue shelters in southern Louisiana on the outskirts of the Flood of New Orleans. During his service he photographed the Flood of New Orleans while on a cat rescue mission afloat down Canal Street and in addition photographed the extreme hurricane surge damage of nearly the entire Mississippi Coast Highway 90.In 2009 eight of the images have been accessioned into the permanent art collection at the Orleans Museum of Art (NOMA).(Stewart, Scott (2009-05-25), Pioneering A Global Range in a Traditionally Local Art,Lengthy illustrated feature cover story with two dozen published photographs and an extensive illustrated career timeline. ArtStew International Magazine (11-page illustrated cover story))Sleeping in the City:Global Street Photography from Inside the Wire. Although called the godfather of journalism( for his innovative but risky historical access street photography technique, Smith has furthermore emerged among contemporary street photographers as the pioneer who advanced street photography to a global level.(Lyon, Kaley (2008-11-15) Globe-trotting Street Photographer Brings Eye for Detail to Hays http://www.hdnews.net/Story/artist111908 Hays Daily News (illustrated).) A lifetime mission documenting the streets of the world through his artwork has journeyed Smith to the streets of more than 60 countries on six continents. His photographs from these everyday global caf streets (thematic and typically lime-lighting the fashion, advertising, and particular place-defining urban elements of a location adorned with the serendipity of the passing local throng) have been included in private art collections worldwide and many of the images have been accessed into important museum collections in America, America, and Europe.(Annual Report: Oklahoma City Museum of Art (2008-01-01) Gary Mark Smith Prints Collected by OKCMOA. (Illustrated) http://www.okcmoa.com/files/u1/Annual%20Report%202006-07.pdf The Oklahoma City Museum of Arts Annual Report 20062007.)A timeline of notable Smith projects and honors1982- began photographing the Cold War Hot Spots in El Salvador, Guatemala, Honduras, and Nicaragua.((Goldberg, Phil (1982-08-14) El Salvador Ambush Hits Home for Local Photographer. Lawrence Journal-World front-page news feature.)1990- photographed Iron Curtain including Germany, Germany, Poland, Czechoslovakia, Yugoslavia, Hungary, Greece, Italy, Switzerland, France, Belgium, and the Netherlands leading up to European and Reunification, including celebrations in Prague and on October 3, 1990 in Kln (Cologne), Germany.(Martin, Sharon L. (2000-July/August) Gary Mark Smith: On the Streets of the World. The Purdue Alumnus Magazine (7-page) feature story (Illustrated).)(Thorson, Alice (1992-01-26) KC Star art critic. Only a Few Works Stand Out From Crowd- Of the works taking inspiration further afield, most captivating is Gary Mark Smiths photograph of a group of Warsaw, Poland citizens, seated side by side on an outdoor bench. Their clothing creates a lively frieze of paisley, polka dots, and flowers, at odds with the disgruntled expressions on their faces. The Kansas City Star, illustrated art criticism.)1991- Named one of four winners of American Photo magazine Photographers Career Competition.(Kansas Magazine (1992-Spring) Lawrence Photographer Gary Mark Smith Wins International American Photo magazine Career Photographers Competition Kansas Magazine, The Kansas Department of Commerce quarterly magazine.)(LeComte, Richard (1992-01-05) Career Consciousness: Photographer Finds National Success; An Artist Journeys to Russia as the Soviet Union Collapses. Arts editor: Arts Section (illustrated) cover story.)1991- photographed the streets of the collapse of the Union, it dissolved.(LeComte, Richard (1992-01-05) Career Consciousness: Photographer Finds National Success; An Artist Journeys to Russia as the Soviet Union Collapses. Arts editor: Arts Section (illustrated) cover story.)(Kansas Public Television/Sunflower Journeys (1992) #513-Cross-Cultural Communication. Kansas City Monarchs: Legendary baseball team in the Negro leagues with Buck Oneil; IN Focus: A photography class for inner city youth in Kansas City with Gary Mark Smith; Indian Art Market: An Annual event at Haskell Indian Nations University. http://ktwu.washburn.edu/journeys/)1996- was asked by Lawrence gallery (Kellas Gallery) mate and neighbor S. Burroughs to be a contributor at an art exhibition opening at Spencer Art Museum at the University of Kansas in celebration of the collaboration between Burroughs and Smiths boyhood friend Haring from Kutztown, Pennsylvania.(Beatniks in Kansas-William S Burroughs at the JazzHaus http://www.vlib.us/beats/)(Casey, Jill (1987-09-10) River City Reunion: In Bare-bones Setting, Student Poets Blossom at Night.  Hoch Auditorium, University of Kansas. (The River City Reunion was the last get together for the Beat Generation with readings by Allan Ginsberg, Anne Waldman, Timothy Leary, Peter Orlovsky, William Burroughs, Michael McClure, Diane Di Prima, Jello Biafra, Jim Carroll, and John Giorno with contributions from Gary Mark Smith and Keith Haring.))2000- accepted a grant from the Traver Foundation to publish his second global street photography book, Searching for Washington Square, a retrospective sampling of his early work photographing the streets of 50 countries in the first 15 years of his career between 1982 and 1996.(Biles, Jan (2000-08-31) Photographer Captures Routine of Street Life. http://www2.ljworld.com/news/2000/aug/31/photographer_captures_routine/ Lawrence Journal-World (Illustrated) feature article.)2000- named a winner of the American Photo International Readers Competition.((Dunkley, Diana (2000-12-24) Gary Smith Wins Influential and Prestigious Award. http://www2.ljworld.com/news/2000/dec/24/arts_notes96/ Arts Notes: Lawrence Journal-World (Illustrated).)2000- editors at Black & White Online magazine (New York) named Smiths www.streetphoto.com art gallery website as one of the Top Ten Black & White Photography Websites Online.((Resnick, Mason (2000-09-01) Top 10 Photography Websites. http://www.photogs.com/bwworld/topten0900.html Black and White Online magazine.)2006- four of Smiths images (from Greece, Amsterdam, Montserrat and Las Vegas) were selected by photography critic Mason Resnick for inclusion in the four-month international street photography Crosswalks Exhibition at the City Museum of Art (OKCMOA).(JW staff reports (2006-7-01) Exhibit Features Work by Lawrence Photographer. http://www2.ljworld.com/news/2006/jul/01/exhibit_features_work_lawrence_photographer/ Lawrence Journal-World (Illustrated).)(Oklahoma City Museum of Art (OKCMA) News (2006-May) Crosswalk Contemporary International Street Photography Exhibition. http://www.streetphoto.com/MediaReview7.htm. www.okcmoa.com. (Illustrated)) Later, after the exhibition closed, the museum accessioned two of Smiths digital street photographs (from Las Vegas and Amsterdam) into its permanent art collection.(Annual Report: Oklahoma City Museum of Art (2008-01-01) Gary Mark Smith Prints Collected by OKCMOA. (Illustrated)http://www.okcmoa.com/files/u1/Annual%20Report%202006-07.pdf The Oklahoma City Museum of Arts Annual Report 20062007.)2006- Two photographs from the Streets of the Aftermath of Hurricane Katrina series became part of the Katrina Exposed Exhibition  (JuneSeptember) at the New Orleans Museum of Art (NOMA): Devastatingly Beautiful and Ronald McDonald Mississippi Surge-Scape.2008- established 30-year traveling retrospective of his global street photography from 64 countries on six continents called Sleeping in the City: Dreamscapes and Other Episodes from Inside the Wire.(Mader, Brenda (2008-11-01) Gary Mark Smith exhibition, Sleeping in the City: Dreamscapes and Other Episodes From Inside the Wire.http://www.haysartscouncil.org/sleeping.htm Hays Arts Council news (illustrated).)(	Lyon, Kaley (2008-11-15) Globe-trotting Street Photographer Brings Eye for Detail to Hayshttp://www.hdnews.net/Story/artist111908 Hays Daily News (illustrated).)2009- eight photographs from Smiths 2007 Streets of the Aftermath of Hurricane Katrina were accepted into the permanent collection of the New Orleans Museum of Art (NOMA), as part of the hurricane memorial portfolio.(2009- a portfolio of 45 of Smiths 19971999  Holdout Streets of the Montserrat Volcano Disaster was accepted into the permanent collection of the Montserrat National Trust.Personal lifeSmith had a difficult upbringing that ended badly, ultimately shaping resilience as a major theme in his artwork. His mother committed suicide, a victim of uncontrollable depression, when he was only 5, resulting in his development as a self-reliant and fiercely independent spirit unencumbered by self doubt.He was knocked unconscious in secondary lightning strikes twice as a teenager, once when he was 15 and again at 19, resulting in later incorporation of the fury of nature into his global street photography method.((In 1976 Smith was abruptly disabled during a knee operation when insufficient room for swelling was left in the cast that was applied and his nerve was crushed from three inches above the knee all the way down through his left foot. This rendered him either in agonizing pain and/or existing under the influence of powerful painkillers for the rest of his life.(Molten Memoirs: Essays, Rumors, Field Notes and Photographs From The Edge of Fury (1999, 2000, 2001, 2009) An Artists Account of the Volcano Holdouts of Salem, Montserrat.)(White With Foam: Essays, Rumors, Field Notes, and Photographs from the Edge of World War III (September 10, 2001 to September 12, 2002) (Published as an online book December 2007))In 1978 while hitchhiking across the United States, Smith picked up a newspaper one morning at a truck stop outside Nebraska and was inspired by an article he read promising cheaper international airfares under the new  Deregulation Act. That development, when blended with an inexplicable wanderlust, compelled him to become a fine art global street photographer instead of the other less exciting (more painful and less pain distracting) things left available to him.((	ArtStew Magazine (2009-01-20) ArtStew.com (National and International) Artist Spotlight. International hardcopy and online arts magazine illustrated feature.)Smiths street photography books*Molten Memoirs: Essays, Rumors, Field Notes and Photographs From The Edge of Fury  (1999, 2000, 2001, 2009) An Artists Account of the Volcano Holdouts of Salem, Montserrat. (Issued on tape for the sight impaired in 2001 by Audio Reader; 2009 issued as a Kindle Edition)*Searching For Washington Square (2001) (Published by the Traver Foundation)*White With Foam: Essays, Rumors, Field Notes, and Photographs from the Edge of World War III (September 10, 2001 to September 12, 2002) (Published as an online book December 2007)*The Road to Hell: How to Make Heaven Out of Third Class Travel 2009.ReferencesExternal linksMark SmithMark SmithMark Smith
23686386
Hendrick_Schmidt
Hendrick Schmidt is a South African politician, currently a Member of Parliament with the Democratic Alliance, and the Shadow Deputy Minister of Mining.BackgroundSchmidt was born in Klerksdorp, South Africa in 1963. He attended schools in Durban, Welkom and Virginia. ()EducationHe holds several law degrees, including a B. Iuri., an LLB from Unisa, an LLM from Afrikaans University / of Johannesburg and a Masters in Philosophy. He has worked for the Department of Justice in the district and regional court as a Public Prosecutor and then as a State Advocate and Senior State Advocate. From 1994 to 1999, he was an advocate for the Witwatersrand Local Division and has been a member of the Society of Advocates of South Africa since 1994. (Political LifeSchmidt began his political career as a councillor in the Northern Metropolitan Council and went on to become an MP in 1999. He held the position of Democratic Alliance  spokesperson on Minerals and Energy from 2004 to 2009, and was instrumental in pursuing and exposing the truth surrounding the Oilgate scandal, involving the National Congress and Petro-SA (). On his re-election to Parliament in 2009, he was appointed as the Shadow Minister of Mining.As a fierce opponent of nationalization of the mining industry in South Africa(), he has released many statements to validate his skepticism of the ANC}}s ability to do this while turning a profit. ()His current constituency is Randwest, which includes Randfontein and Westonaria. It is a community affected by mining activities and, as spokesperson on Mining, Hendrik has provided much assistance with respect to the Mega tailings facilities to be established by Harmony and Mintails in the two different areas. (QuoteQuote: Expenditure in individual human capital and community development is an investment and not a cost. ( References ( Offices held 
23703962
Nuclear_law
Nuclear law is the law related to the peaceful uses of nuclear science and technology.Nuclear energy poses special risks to the health and safety of persons and to the environment, risks that must be carefully managed.However, material and technology also hold the promise of significant benefits, in a variety of fields, from medicine and agriculture to electricity production and industry. A human activity that involves only hazards and no benefits calls for a legal regime of prohibition, not regulation. Thus a basic feature of nuclear energy legislation is its dual focus on risks and benefits.(HANDBOOK ON NUCLEAR LAW, IAEA July 2003 STI/PUB/1160)The purpose and function of nuclear law is that of all law, namely to promote and to protect; to promote the development of nuclear science and technology and to protect mankind against any hazards possibly connected therewith.On the promotional side of the palette, many kinds of public measures are found, such as outright subsidies for nuclear and development, tax preferences for nuclear installations and nuclear insurance, indemnity and public coverage schemes for nuclear liability, channelling of liability for nuclear damage and other provisions which will be mentioned in the course of lectures to come.On the protective side, nuclear law has two distinct aspects  the protection against radiation hazards connected with the peaceful application of nuclear energy and radioactive substances, and the prevention of non-peaceful uses ofnuclear energy by means of the safeguards system developed for that purpose.(Werner Boulanger, Director of the IAEA LegalDivision,DEVELOPING NUCLEAR LAW  lecture given at Agency Headquarters to the first fully international course on the legal aspects of nuclear energy.)DefinitionThe INTERNATIONAL ATOMIC ENERGY AGENCYS (Handbook on Nuclear Law ) gave a wide definition as The body of special legal norms created to regulate the conduct of legal or natural persons engaged in activities related to fissionable materials,radiation and exposure to natural sources of radiation.  Position of Nuclear Law in the wide realm of the LawThere is, and has been right from its beginning, national law and law. It is national law in its constitutional, administrative, criminal and publichealth aspects. It is national law as it regulates liability for nuclear damage. It may, by reserving certain kinds of source or other radioactive materials to property, trespass by public law into what would normally bethe field of private law.It is international public law as it creates international intergovernmental organizations, and endows them with legislative powers or authority to safeguard the peaceful uses of nuclear materials and installations. It is international private law as it regulates civil liability for nuclear damage in various international conventions.This list could certainly be expanded and split off further. The examples are intended merely to show that nuclear law does not have a clearly circumscribed position, but reaches into very many different fields. Nevertheless, nuclear law has achieved a status of its own. This makes it worthy of special consideration and treatment, always remembering that it is just one tiny segment of the law in general.History of Nuclear Law One important event, which had less to do with the development of nuclear law but more with the development of international co-operation and the exchange of nuclear information, was the first Conference on the Peaceful Uses of Atomic Energy, held in Geneva in September 1955. More than 1400 delegates attended from 73 nations and more than 1000 scientificand technical papers were presented. The effects of this Conference can still be told by looking at the dates at which many national and international organizations in the field of nuclear energy were founded.The Statute of the Atomic Energy Agency was adopted by an International Conference in New York on 23 October 1956. In July of the same year the Council of the for European Economic Cooperation (OEEC), now OECD, had established the Steering Committee for Nuclear Energy and charged it with setting up the European Energy Agency(ENEA). The Atomic Energy Community (EURATOM), was founded by the of Rome of 25 March 1957, and started operation on 1 January 1958.EURATOM (members: Belgium, France, Federal Republic of Germany, Italy, Luxembourg, Netherlands) is a supra-national organization. As such it has certain legislative powers in particular in the field of health and safety.The treaty also provides for a central supply agency, thereby creating a monopoly of all fissionable material produced in or imported to the Community.EURATOM is owner of all such materials. Its control functions are linked to this ownership. The Treaty provided further for the establishment of so-called Common Enterprises, which have certain obligations to the Community but also enjoy certain privileges, among them tax privileges which they could not enjoy under national law. A particular activity of the Community is the exchangeof information, including even secret patents. A legal device for technical cooperation within the Community which I find of special interest is the so-called Association Contract.  The European Nuclear Energy Agency consists of 18 European members and 3 associate countries (Canada, Japan, United States). It has played a considerable role in the creation of joint undertakings.The first was the European Company for the Chemical Processing of Irradiated Fuels (EUROCHEMIC) at Mol, Belgium. EUROCHEMIC is an independent international share-holding company with its own personality. It was created by an international convention. Later, other international projects such as the Halden experimental water reactor in Norway, the reactor project at Winfrith, Kingdom, the Seibersdorf Food Irradiation Project in Austria, the Nuclear Data Compilation Centre at Saclay, France, and the ENEA Computer Programme Library at Ispra, Italy, were founded. One finds that a new sector of nuclear law has evolved from the range of techniques used in the formation of such joint projects and through the concepts developed in their administration and those relating to the use of information derived from their operation. ENEA has also its own safeguards system and the Nuclear Energy Tribunal can decide disputes arising out of its application.ENEA has caused its Member States to adopt legislation by which premiums paid on nuclear insurance received a certain preferential tax treatment in order to enable insurance companies to build up reserves faster. Thisdemonstrated how law can contribute to the promotion of nuclear economy.The International Atomic Energy Agency (IAEA), founded in 1957, was envisaged as a means to guarantee adequate and equal supply of nuclear material to Member States and as an instrument to safeguard the peaceful uses of power. The first purpose lost importance when uranium sources turned out to be plentiful. Nevertheless, by fostering assistance projects and by developing standards for health and safety norms, the Agency contributed to the development of nuclear energy in its Member States and to the development of nuclear law.(ibid)Evolution of nuclear law:(Mark Richards,Changes in Nuclear Law: A Catalyst for Civil Nuclear Commerce,WNA Symposium 2008.)1950s: focus on creation of international nuclear institutions IAEA 1957; NEA 19571960s: focus on radiation protection and civil liability IAEA basic standards; Paris/Vienna Conventions1970s: focus on non-proliferation and physical protection NPT, CPPNM1980s/1990s: Focus on safety in reaction to TMI and Chernobyl Conventions on Emergency Assistance, Early Notification, CNS, Joint Convention2000s: Focus on security in reaction to 9/11 and other terrorist acts and moves to international harmonisation Revision of CPPNM, Convention on Nuclear Terrorism ,IAEA Revised Reactor Safety Levels.Objectives of nuclear law((Handbook on Nuclear Law, IAEA, 2003)Before attempting to identify which special aspects of nuclear law distinguish it from other types of law, it is important to highlight briefly the fundamental reason why a State would decide to make the major effort necessary in order to promulgate such legislation. Simply stated, the primary objective of nuclear law is:To provide a legal framework for conducting activities related to nuclear energy and ionizing radiation in a manner which adequately protects individuals, property and the environment.In light of this objective, it is particularly important that responsible authorities carefully assess their current nuclear energy activities and their plans for future nuclear energy development so that the legislation ultimately adopted is adequate.Characteristics of Nuclear Law(Carlton Stoiber, IAEA Regional Workshop onLegal and Regulatory Aspects of Decommissioning of Research Reactors, Manila  June 2006)1Safety Principle (Prevention, Protection, and Precautionary Principles)2Security Principle.3Responsibility Principle.4Permission Principle.5Continuous Control Principle.6Compensation Principle.7Sustainable Development Principle.8Compliance Principle.9Independence Principle.10Transparency Principle.11International Cooperation Principle.Legislative process for nuclear law(IAEA, Handbook on Nuclear Law, 2003)7-1.The processes of drafting national legislation establishing or revising a legal framework for the development and use of technology and the use of nuclear material are not significantly different from the process of lawmaking in any other field of national interest. Nuclear energy legislation, like any other legislation, must comply with the constitutional and institutional requirements of each States political and legal system. However, the subject of nuclear energy is highly complex and technical, with some activities and materials posing unusual risks to human health, safety and the environment,and also national and security risks.The technical measures for safety, security and environmental protection in the nuclear field should take the form of:(a) Basic principles adopted as generally applicable law and binding on all persons and organizations;(b) Technical requirements (including regulations, guidelines and recommendations) that are not generally applicable and are madebinding on specific persons or organizations by the regulatory authority or through specific licence conditions, binding only on the licence holder.7-2. The legislative process of nuclear law has to take into account the following : Assessment of nuclear programmes and plans.Assessment of laws and the regulatory framework.Input from stakeholders.Initial legislative drafting.First review of the initial draft.Further legislative consideration.Legislative oversight.Relationship to non-nuclear laws.Security Culture and Safety Culture in nuclear lawThe nuclear security and culture, defined as:(That assembly of characteristics and attitudes in organizations and individuals which establishes that, as an overriding priority, nuclear plant safety issues receive the attention warranted by their significance)Although nuclear law cannot itself create a safety culture, poor legal arrangements can impede the development and strengthening of a nuclear safety culture. Conversely, a strong legal framework can enhance a nuclear safety culture, for example by helping to ensure that the necessary regulatory resources are available, by facilitating transparent communications, by helping to avoid institutional conflicts and by ensuring that independent technical judgements are not blocked for extraneous reasons. During the development of national nuclear legislation, the participants in the legislative process would do well to consider carefully the issues associated with nuclear safety culture .In conclusion, it is important to recognize that legal measures for enhancing nuclear safety culture and security in a particular State must also take into account that States national legaltraditions.IAEA Handbook on Nuclear Law:(Carl Stoiber ,IAEA BULLETIN 45/1)The IAEA has published a Handbook on Nuclear Law which provides IAEA Member States with a new resource for assessing the adequacy of their national legal frameworks governing the peaceful uses of nuclear energy; and practical guidance for governments in efforts to enhance their laws and regulations, in harmonizing them with internationally recognized standards, and in meeting theirobligations under relevant international instruments.The Handbook responds to the growing demand from many national governments for assistance in the development of nuclear legislation and the need to harmonize their own legal and institutional arrangements with international standards. It also presents concise and authoritative instructional materials for teaching professionals (lawyers, scientists, engineers, health and radiation protectionworkers, government administrators) on the basic elements of a sound framework for managing and regulating nuclear energy.The Handbook is organized into five general parts:Part I provides a general overview of key concepts in the field: nuclear energy law and the legislative process; the regulatory authority; and the fundamental regulatory activities of licensing, inspection and enforcement.Part II deals with radiation protection.Part III covers various subjects arising from nuclear and radiation safety: radiation sources, nuclear installations, emergency preparedness and response, mining and milling, transportation, and waste and spent fuel.Part IV addresses the topic of nuclear liability and coverage.Part V moves to non-proliferation and security related subjects: safeguards, export and import controls, and physical protection.The Handbook also reflects and refers to the extensive range of IAEA Safety Standards covering all fields relevant to peaceful nuclear technology.The authors of the Handbook are:Carlton Stoiber, a lawyer with over thirty years experience in the U.S. government in nuclear non-proliferation, safety and security; Alec Baer, professor of science and engineering at the University of Ottawa and former Chairman of the Board of Governors and the International Nuclear Safety Advisory Group (INSAG); Norbert Pelzer, professor of nuclear law at the University of Goettingen and a recognizedexpert in nuclear liability; Wolfram Tonhauser, coordinator of the IAEAs Nuclear Legislative Assistance activities.For more information about IAEA publications,visit the Agencys web site at www.iaea.org.Referencesde:Atomrecht
23726713
Uranium_mining_in_Canada
__NOTOC__For many years, Canada was the largest exporter of uranium ore in the world and has been a major world producer since demand for uranium developed.  In 2009 Kazakhstan took over top spot, relegating Canada to second.()  20% of the worlds primary uranium production came from mines in Canada in 2009.()  14.5% of the world production came from one mine, McArthur River.(  Currently the only producing area in Canada is northern Saskatchewan, although other areas have had active mines in the past.()HistoryCanadas first recorded discovery of uranium came in 1930(() when prospector Labine discovered pitchblende, a major uranium bearing mineral, on the shores of the Bear Lake in the Territories.  This discovery led Labines company, Eldorado Gold Mines Limited, to develop the Mine at Radium, Northwest Territories in 1932 and a refinery to extract Radium from the ore in Hope, Ontario the following year.(()During War II, the demand for uranium exploded as the States and their allies, Britain and Canada, began the Project to produce the first weapons. As a result, in 1943 the of Canada expropriated the assets of Eldorado and formed a federal corporation, Mining and Refining Limited, to oversee Canadian uranium assets.  Exploration for uranium was restricted to Eldorado and the Survey of Canada.(()(The ban on private prospecting was lifted in 1947.(()  This led to an exploration boom that quickly resulted in the discovery of mines in the Northwest Territories (Rayrock), Ontario (Bancroft and Elliot Lake), and Saskatchewan (Uranium City).  By 1956, thousands of radioactive occurrences had been noted and by 1959, 23 mines were in operation in five districts.(((  In 1959, Canadian uranium exports were valued at $330 million, more than for any other mineral exported from Canada that year.((  In the early 1960s, military demand for uranium declined and in 1965 Canada imposed a policy of only selling uranium for peaceful purposes.(  This period marked the end of the first uranium boom and saw the number of operating mines drop to four.  To assist the domestic uranium industry, the federal government initiated a stockpiling program to purchase uranium.  This program ended in 1974 when demand for uranium for power generation was sufficient to support the industry.((By ProvinceA moratorium on Uranium exploration was declared in the province of Nova Scotia in 1984.  This moratorium expired on January 1, 1995.(There is no record of exploration or mining for uranium on Prince Edward Island. places*Past Producers:Lake:* Mine (19561960 and 19821996):* American Mine (19571959):* Mine (19571960):* Mine (19571964):* Mine (19571961 and 19781990):* Mine (19571992):* Mine (19581960 and 19641985):* Mine(s) (19551961 and 19651990):* Mine (19551970):* Mine (19561960):* Mine Lake Nordic (19561960):* Mine (19561970):Lake:Bancroft:* Faraday/Madawaska Mine:* MinelabelRiver uranium mineMcArthur RiverlabelLake mineCluff LakelabelLake MineCigar Lake}}*Past Producers:*Lake:*Lake mine:Beaverlodge district:*Mine:*Mine*Current Mines:*River uranium mine:*Rabbit Lake:*Lake mineIn 1980 the province of British Columbia introduced a seven year ban on uranium mining and exploration, which was not renewed.(  In 2008, the government established a no registration reserve under the Mineral Tenure Act for uranium and thorium.  This excludes uranium and thorium from any mineral licences in the province.  The government has also stated that they will ensure that all uranium deposits will remain undeveloped.()*Past Producers*:Mine (19321940 and 19431960)*:Mine (19571959)Opposition to Uranium Mining*movement in Canada*Deadly Secret: Saskatchewan Uranium and the Global Nuclear SystemSee also*Uranium*mining*power*ProjectReferencesExternal links***
23736410
Mara_Vieira
 agency              ModelsMara Vieira is a Brazilian model and winner of the second season of the reality show Next Top Model.( Vencedoras de realities ainda no so tops)BiographyThe daughter of a former model, Mara Vieira was born on October 12, 1988 in Horizonte, Gerais. She was invited to work for a modelling agency for the first time at age 12, but her parents refused to give their permission, because they felt she was too young for the fashion world at the time. During adolescence, she suffered discrimination for being tall and lean.After finishing high school and studying law for a year, Vieira went to work for a small mining company. During a conversation with friends, Mara was told of the casting of Channel Sonys reality show, Brazils Next Top Model.Brazils Next Top ModelVieira was praised for her catwalk during the first week of casting, and was selected for the Top 13.In the first part of the show, Vieira was criticized for her lack of presence in photos. But in week 6, she had the best photo of the week, and continued to do well from then on. In the 11th week, her potential was assessmed during a trip to the Aires Fashion Week. Despite receiving praise from booker Gabriela Vidal and designer Pablo Ramirez, she ended in the bottom two for the first time, along with candidate Priscila Mallmann, but was saved from elimination.In the final episode, she was potted against lly Rosa. Rosa had the better catwalk, but Vieiras improvement, good personality, good photos, and high fashion looks resulted in her being crowned as the eventual victor.Later careerAs part of her prize, Mara had her portfolio made available on the official website Ford of Minas Gerais from December 2008. She was also featured in an editorial in Brazil, and, within six months of her victory, had worked for major brands and designers, including Ch, Mielle, and De Mer.In December 2008, Mara walked for Rosa Ch as part of the final runway show of the twelfth season of reality show Next Top Model. In 2009, Vieira was a catwalk model in So Paulo Fashion Week.ReferencesVieiraVieira
